_	The incident even drew reactions from then-Prime Minister of the United Kingdom Tony Blair and Sports Minister Richard Caborn, with the latter making the claim that the behaviour of Spanish fans was 20 or 30 years behind that of their British counterparts.
_	On 25 February, he made another speech at Shipley, again urging a vote for Labour, saying he did not believe the claim that Wilson would renege on his commitment to renegotiation, which Powell believed was ironic because of Heath's premiership:
_	Despite the post-measurement state being entirely stochastic in formulations of quantum mechanics, a link to the thermodynamic arrow has been proposed, noting that the second law of thermodynamics amounts to an observation that nature shows a bias for collapsing wave functions into higher entropy states versus lower ones, and the claim that this is merely due to more possible states being high entropy runs afoul of Loschmidt's paradox.
_	The level of competition, numerous All-Americans, undefeated teams, and dominant scoring also support the claim that Lafayette was national champions in the 1920s.
_	Douglas Heggie casts doubt on Thom's suggestion as well, stating that his careful analysis uncovered "little evidence for a highly accurate unit" and "little justification for the claim that a highly accurate unit was in use".
_	There was consensus that the claim that Jager had called the President a murderer was false, and that neither a conviction for disorderly conduct and a short prison term, nor membership in the Socialist Party, were barring anybody from public office.
_	A book published in 2006 by C.H (Kit) Bennetts, the SIS officer who had first observed Sutch, reasserted the claim that he was guilty.
_	The administration additionally took exception to the claim that they had misled the nation in the
_	There are eyewitness accounts that support the claim that Saad Haddad's troops were involved in the massacres of Sabra and Shatila in 1982.
_	The U.S. Supreme Court has distinguished between the sovereignty of the states and the federal government regarding some principles, but they have rejected the claim that the separation of sovereignty is so far that double jeopardy need not be acknowledged by the states.
_	While at Motown in 1968, Gladys Knight was the first person to suggest that Berry Gordy sign the up-and-coming group called The Jackson Five (though Bobby Taylor of the Vancouvers also had a role), after appearing with them on a concert held in Gary, Indiana to help elect Mayor Richard Hatcher, despite the claim that Diana Ross discovered them.
_	Lacan's concepts concern the "mirror stage", the "Real", the "Imaginary", and the "Symbolic", and the claim that "the unconscious is structured as a language".
_	Arthur C. Clarke in "" (1968) has the claim that "Behind every man now alive stand 30 ghosts, for that is the ratio by which the dead outnumber the living", which was roughly accurate at the time of writing.
_	Simon Dunstan mentions the claim that the air strike resulted in a total of five Egyptian aircraft losses (although without specifying which air bases were attacked), yet nevertheless places Egyptian losses for the opening strike at "nearly 40 aircraft".
_	The Committee also filed a counterclaim challenging the Party Expenditure Provision as a whole, with the claim that the provision violated the First Amendment as it applied to advertisements.
_	Suman replied to the claim that it was not a publicity act and the latter apologized to Kumar for it.
_	The data, he argues, prove false the claim that multinational corporations are "inexorably, and inevitably, abandoning their ties to their country of origin".
_	Throughout the years, some antisemitism within the Christian community has focused on the claim that Jews either dislike Christianity or are trying to destroy it.
_	This projected date of death is based on the claim that the first written statement referring to Oxford as deceased was in January 1609, followed by the publication of the sonnets ascribed to the "ever-living" poet.
_	The "Hot Hand in Basketball" study questioned the theory that basketball players have "hot hands", which the paper defined as the claim that players are more likely to make a successful shot if their previous shot was successful.
_	Because the first jury, by its verdict, had rejected the claim that Ashe was one of the robbers, the Supreme Court held that the State could not "constitutionally hail him before a new jury to litigate that issue again."
_	He also rejected the claim that Jordan's King Hussein warned Meir about the impending Arab attack on Israel in 1973.
_	They point to histories of the past 50 years and especially the past 20 years and make the claim that even in good economic eras and especially in bad ones, the effects of poverty have been disproportionally transferred to children.
_	Marx's critique of the ideology of the human rights thus departs from the counterrevolutionary critique by Edmund Burke, who dismissed the "rights of Man" in favour of the "rights of the individual": it is not grounded on an opposition to the Enlightenment's universalism and humanist project on behalf of the right of tradition, as in Burke's case, but rather on the claim that the ideology of economism and the ideology of the human rights are the reverse sides of the same coin.
_	The Serbian Academy of Sciences and Arts ranks him among the 100 most prominent Serbs, based on the claim that he is of ethnic Serb paternal ancestry.
_	A cause of significant controversy is the claim that the sack was relatively "clean", in that there was little murder and violence, and the Vandals did not burn the buildings of the city.
_	Two other articles, Edwards & Livermore, "The Pitfalls of Empirical Studies That Attempt to Understand the Factors Affecting Appellate Decisionmaking", 58 Duke L.J.1895 (2009) and "The Effects of Collegiality on Judicial Decision Making", 151 U. Pa. L. Rev. 1639 (May 2003), explain how appellate judges decide cases and refute the claim that the personal ideologies and political leanings of the judges are crucial determinants in the decision-making process.
_	In 2011, the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) reported that there was very little evidence to support the claim that green tea consumption may reduce the risk of breast and prostate cancer.
_	In response to the claim that uses have been found for "junk" DNA, proponents note that the fact that some non-coding DNA has a purpose does not establish that all non-coding DNA has a purpose, and that the human genome does include pseudogenes that are nonfunctional "junk", with others noting that some sections of DNA can be randomized, cut, or added to with no apparent effect on the organism in question.
_	Most of it is concerned with the claim that suicide is an affront to God.
_	It specifically rejects the claim that primitivism is a form of anarchism.
_	Jones made the claim that he was attacked for being gay.
_	Critic Ian Birch, writing in 1981, called "stupid" the claim that the Sex Pistols "had any political significance...
_	More recently, linguist John McWhorter contested the modern classification of Vedda as a creole, supporting instead the claim that Vedda is a dialect, "a kind of Sinhalese with Vedda decorations."
_	Simon Porritt makes the claim that he is "one of Australia's television icons" and has now "busted into the music scene with a funky electro/hip-hop album that's getting heaps of airplay on both commercial and community radio stations.
_	His assurance to developers was made on the claim that the cost of new homes in the GTA and Hamilton area could be reduced if additional land were made available.
_	Hoffmann has declared that the non-historicity thesis should no longer be ignored, but must be confronted head-on: "I have often made the claim that it has been largely "theological interests" since Strauss’s time that "ruled the historicity question out of court.""
_	Henrik Selin, head of the Department for Intercultural Dialogue at the Swedish Institute, noted that allegations of a surge in immigrant crime after the intake of more than 160,000 immigrants in 2015 have been “highly exaggerated... there is nothing to support the claim that the crime rate took off after the 160,000 came in 2015.”
_	Several popular dictionaries of angels, such as Gustav Davidson "A dictionary of angels: including the fallen angels" (1967) repeat the claim that Jehoel was (in unidentified Jewish texts) the chief angel of the Seraphim.
_	Anecdotally, it has been reported to produce effects similar to nootropics, however, there is no research to support the claim that it is any different or more effective than other psychostimulants in this respect.
_	He ends the article with the claim that the brutal collectivization campaign was motivated by the "hope or promise of a subsequent raising up" of Asian-minded masses in the Soviet Union which only history could judge.
_	Noori disputes the claim that the first Muslims came to India along with Alauddin Khalji between 1296–1316 AD and points out that according to renowned historian, Henry Miers Elliot, ("The History of India as told by its own Historians", Part I) the first ship bearing Muslim travellers was seen on the Indian coast as early as 630 AD.
_	When the "Killian memos" (which were allegedly created during the 1970s) were shown during a CBS News broadcast, a Republican lawyer going by the pseudonym of "Buckhead" mentioned the memos' proportional spacing and made the claim that such printing was "not widespread until the mid to late 90's".
_	Sam Mbah and I. E. Igariwey in "African Anarchism: The History of a Movement" make the claim that:
_	There is no evidence among the canons of the First Council of Nicaea of any determination on the canon, however, Jerome (347-420), in his "Prologue to Judith", makes the claim that the Book of Judith was "found by the Nicene Council to have been counted among the number of the Sacred Scriptures".
_	A little over thirty years later, in early July 1947, his nephew William "Mac" Brazel gained certain fame in the so-called Roswell UFO incident when he allegedly found strange debris on his ranch some 70 miles northwest of Roswell, sparking the claim that a flying saucer crashed on the ranch where Brazel was foreman and that the government subsequently instituted a cover-up.
_	However, Frank Knight, founder of the Chicago school of economics, disputes the claim that "Freedom under Planning" contradicts "The Road to Serfdom".
_	In a 2005 speech the Lord Chief Justice of England and Wales, Lord Woolf, repeated the claim that Cromwell had referred to Magna Carta as "Magna Farta".
_	However, many scholars argue that the claim that tribals are an egalitarian society in contrast to a caste-based society is a part of a larger political agenda by some to maximise any differences from tribal and urban societies.
_	Tolga Akyıldız, a popular columnist for "Hürriyet", made a comment on "Metamorfoz" only two months after the release, saying that he wanted to wait until such daily slanders fade away like the claim that Tarkan "stole" his image from an artist of the Erol Köse label.
_	This does not deny the existence of spiritual or moral evil in a fallen universe, only the claim that it is an intrinsic property of creation.
_	Authors such as Howard Zinn ("A People's History of the United States"), Gilbert T. Sewall ("") and James W. Loewen (""), make the claim that U.S. history textbooks contain mythical untruths and omissions, which paint a whitewashed picture that bears little resemblance to what most students learn in universities.
_	When the Republic of China government was relocated to Taipei in 1949 as a result of the Kuomintang's (KMT) defeat by the Chinese Communist Party forces in the Chinese Civil War, the provincial administration remained in place under the claim that the ROC was still the government of all of China even though the opposition argued that it overlapped inefficiently with the national government.
_	The United States withdrew from the ILO in 1977, based partly on the claim that communist countries could not send authentically tripartite representation.
_	The phallogocentric argument is premised on the claim that modern Western culture has been, and continues to be, both culturally and intellectually subjugated by "logocentrism" and "phallocentrism".
_	Elevator has been notable due to the claim that it was made with a fund of 300 euro.
_	If Moore is wrong in saying that there are actual disagreements of "value", we are left with the claim that there are actual disagreements of "fact", and Ayer accepts this without hesitation:
_	Rood appealed on the claim that Hayes' decision was wrong on the law and the Constitution protected Rood.
_	During an online Q&A session on April 20, 2010, Brendan dismissed the claim that "Juturna" was a concept album based on Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind, but did say that there is an underlying concept.
_	Ellen Willis (who coined the term "pro-sex feminism") states "As we saw it, the claim that 'pornography is violence against women' was code for the neo-Victorian idea that men want sex and women endure it."
_	In Chinese translations of Buddhist texts such as "Kutadanta Sutta", "Dighanikaya" and "Suttanipata", dated to be from the 6th to 8th century, the Vedic homa practice is attributed to Buddha's endorsement along with the claim that Buddha was the original teacher of the Vedas in his previous lives.
_	Criticism has mostly been restricted to the claim that the gameplay is largely formulaic between different titles, however reviewers have noted that games like "GROW Cannon" and "GROW RPG" have been able to provide sufficient variation to keep the series interesting.
_	Furthermore, because hip-hop emerges from the odd (or queer) histories of urban black diaspora communities, the claim that hip-hop and rap culture has always been queer is neither revisionist nor a play with language—even if both might be needed in the contemporary settlement of a straightened out hip hop.
_	Not only is the claim that she was the most superior wife baseless, the fact of the matter is in Surah Tahrim, Allah(swt) also states this:"
_	In the report, which they described as "a work in progress," they analyzed worldwide temperature records and concluded with the claim that the systematic manipulation and exaggeration of instrumental temperature data by leading meteorological institutions makes it impossible to say whether or not there was a significant amount of global warming in the 20th century.
_	Finding the claim that "In almost every country — usually for reasons completely unrelated to its ability to deliver electricity — there is almost universal political support for nuclear power" is "probably an exaggeration" in the case of Japan post-Fukushima and Germany, Wald agrees that "two countries with enormous demand for electricity and not much hand-wringing over global warming, are planning huge reactor construction projects".
_	Researchers of crop circles have linked modern crop circles to old folkloric tales to support the claim that they are not artificially produced.
_	In 1971, Tolkien stated that he remembered making up the word himself, admitting that there was nothing but his "nude parole" to support the claim that he was uninfluenced by similar words of the hobgoblin family.
_	The nub of his case, against the legitimacy of parliament in appointing justices and passing laws, was that such acts could only be performed with the explicit authority of the king and that the claim that the king was 'virtually' present in proceedings of the two Houses of Parliament was false.
_	An "a posteriori physicalist", on the other hand, will reject the claim that PTI → N is knowable a priori.
_	However, many residents strongly dispute the claim that the quality of life has improved.
_	In addition, the claim that the artwork was commissioned by the Vallumbrosans, of which there is no evidence, has also been debated.
_	In 2008, the UN 4th Committee rejected the claim that a dispute over sovereignty affected self-determination, which was a basic human right.
_	He did not believe the claim that they had acted alone, and through the use of provisional sentencing, strongly encouraged them to give information about higher-ups before final sentencing.
_	The idea that Judaism, and the Jewish people collectively, are responsible for the death of Jesus, often represented in the claim that "Jews killed Jesus", figures prominently in anti-Semitic writings.
_	The Polish indictments were based the claim that Wolińska-Brus had fabricated evidence which led to the execution of general Emil Fieldorf and the wrongful arrest and imprisonment of 24 other anti-Nazi resistance fighters.
_	It was conceded that the State, in objecting to the growers' proffered evidence, did not dispute the claim that some shipments of Florida avocados had, in fact, been rejected by California for failure to comply with the oil content requirement, to at least the extent of as much as 6.4% of the total shipments of Florida avocados into California.
_	While the claim that allopathic approaches, of which orthodox medicine is a form, is only occupied with getting rid of the symptoms rather than concerned with identifying and removing the causes of illness is not entirely true (e.g., the link between STDs and casual intercourse), homeopathic adherents would suggest that Yorùbá medicine performs three distinct functions:
_	The visited countries were careful not to express support for the claim that Tibet was independent of China and did not discuss political questions with the mission.
_	Marchetti found the claim that an infinite number of zeros could add up to a finite quantity absurd, and he inferred from Grandi's treatment the danger posed by theological reasoning.
_	For two centuries the claim that Thomas Jefferson fathered one or more children by his slave, Sally Hemings, has been a matter of discussion and disagreement.
_	His account of the period makes the claim that he was attached to the staff of the Duke of Connaught and later traveled to Toronto, Ontario, Canada where he became a high-profile editor at a news agency before being falsely accused of forgery and returning to Britain.
_	But many analysts are skeptical about the claim that it was the Abdullah Azzam Brigades.
_	However, these criticisms were somewhat addressed when similar results were replicated with other paradigms (e.g., go/no go and same-different tasks), supporting the claim that humans do have elementary feature detectors.
_	As a result, reports have questioned the validity of the claim that there was a brake failure.
_	In 1903, Coca-Cola had already started using spent coca leaves (which only carried trace amounts of cocaine) and had dropped the claim that it cured headaches.
_	Since 2006 methylhexanamine has been sold extensively under many names as a stimulant or energy-boosting dietary supplement under the claim that it is similar to certain compounds found in geraniums, but its safety has been questioned as a number of adverse events and at least five deaths have been associated with methylhexanamine-containing supplements.
_	Rakoff sent part of the appeal back to the district court to review the claim that the bill is discriminatory.
_	Mill first responds by restating the claim that society ought to punish the harmful consequences of the irrational conduct, but not the irrational conduct itself which is a personal matter.
_	Writing about Dewsbury, Tyndall made the claim that "the name of our party, for long languishing in obscurity, is now on thousands of lips".
_	The Court found ejectment jurisdiction over certain lands, notwithstanding the defendant's claim (in the alternative to the claim that the defendant himself held title) that the lands were still held in aboriginal title because:
_	It is possible to give a precise meaning to the claim that SN is the universe of ordinary mathematics; it is a model of Zermelo set theory, the axiomatic set theory originally developed by Ernst Zermelo in 1908.
_	Despite the retractions, the claim that Naki participated in the 1967 heart transplantation has been perpetuated in journal articles and books published after 2005.
_	He specifically addresses and rebuts the claim that religious belief is a delusion.
_	That text ends with the claim that the masque "pleased the King so well, as he would see it again" — one of the more outrageous fabrications in English literature.
_	Leen, who covered the cocaine trade for the "Miami Herald" in the 1980s, rejects the claim that "because the report uncovered an agency mind-set of indifference to drug-smuggling allegations", it vindicated Webb's reporting.
_	After the war the story continued to be frequently repeated but no evidence to support the claim that the angels existed was ever given by those who were there.
_	In some later voting rights cases, however, "Minor" was cited in opposition to the claim that the federal Constitution conferred a general right to vote, and in support of restrictive election laws involving poll taxes, literacy tests, and the role of political parties in special elections.
_	After completing a rough draft of "Expressions" in April 1871 he set it aside and turned to revising the "Origin" to meet Mivart's arguments and counter the claim that some divine inner force was driving evolution.
_	The language and form of the leaflet supports the claim that it has possible military intelligence involvement in its publication.
_	However, scholars such as Jason Burke, Steve Coll, Peter Bergen, Christopher Andrew, and Vasily Mitrokhin have argued that Bin Laden was "outside of CIA eyesight" and that there is "no support" in any "reliable source" for "the claim that the CIA funded bin Laden or any of the other Arab volunteers who came to support the mujahideen."
_	The Trump campaign did not challenge the accuracy of the tax returns or correct the claim that Trump might not have paid income taxes for 18 years.
_	Different news outlets made the claim that the players of BK Fremad Amager lost their away match i Viborg on 18 September 1927 against Viborg FF due intoxication before the match.
_	Arughtai had so-called excused himself from battle on the claim that he was allegedly unable to join due to illness.
_	However, the claim that SRT2183 is a SIRT1 activator has been questioned and further defended.
_	Chamberlain was always keenly interested in modern science and saw himself as a scientist, but he was deeply critical of the claim that modern science could explain everything, believing there was a spiritual side to humanity that science could not explain.
_	In a press conference however, Atlasjet refuted the claim that the aircraft was flying without permission, assuring that a short-term contract lasting for three days was signed on 29 November 2007, one day prior to the crash.
_	Aesthetic realism (not to be confused with the Aesthetic Realism of Eli Siegel, the philosophy that sees reality as the making one of opposites) may mean the claim that there are mind-independent aesthetic facts, but in general discussions about art "realism" is a complex term that may have a number of different meanings.
_	Philosophical skepticism begins with the claim that the skeptic currently does not have knowledge.
_	Although it is unclear whether the protagonist's tribulations proceed from relationships with multiple lovers or a single man, Stanley B. Greenfield, in his paper ""The Wife's Lament" Reconsidered," discredits the claim that the poem involves multiple lovers.
_	Russian diplomats and even Russian Federation president Vladimir Putin have continued to exert the claim that Russians and Ukrainians "are one nation," "one people," and "fraternal."
_	Those findings, seemingly, invalidate the claim that those forms were equivalent or consistent.
_	These texts include interviews with the shepherds, Gamaliel's interview with Joseph and Mary, Caiaphas's reports to the Sanhedrin, Eli's story of the Magi, Herod Antipater's defense before the Senate for the Massacre of the Innocents, and Herod Antipas's defense before the Senate—all with the claim that they were copied from ancient manuscripts and translated into English.
_	Church tradition, coming from the Dialogues of Gregory the Great, also made the claim that Theoderic's soul had been seen dropped into Mount Etna for his sins.
_	Furthermore, the claim that the government has the power to curtail speech when it is likely to produce "a specific and significant fear of disruption" cannot justify the banning of offensive speech in a free society that is protected by the First Amendment.
_	This relies upon the fact that wild animals require their territory in order to satisfy their basic needs and the claim that this results in an interest in territory strong enough to ground a right.
_	It was titled ‘Can Lloyd George do it?’ and endorsed the claim that ‘greater trade activity would make for greater trade activity... with a cumulative effect’.
_	Normative polylogism is the claim that these different logics are equally valid.
_	Some food writers advance the claim that the dressing was invented by chef Theo Rooms of the Blackstone Hotel in Chicago during the same time period.
_	This belies the claim that broadcasters couldn't afford public interest programs.
_	Reynolds also offers evidence to support the claim that minimum wage laws exacerbate unemployment.
_	The theological aspect is the claim that Paul transmuted Jesus the Jewish messiah into the universal (in a wider meaning "catholic") Savior.
_	There is no evidence among the canons of the First Council of Nicaea of any determination on the canon, however, Jerome (347–420), in his "Prologue to Judith", makes the claim that the Book of Judith was "found by the Nicene Council to have been counted among the number of the Sacred Scriptures".
_	Other organizations teach other variants of the theory, including the claim that the Scythians/Cimmerians represented in whole or in part the Ten Lost Tribes.
_	In August 2002, Czech foreign intelligence chief František Bublan publicly backed away from the claim that Atta met al-Ani, saying that rumors of such meetings "have not been verified or proven."
_	However, some human rights organizations, including Human Rights Watch and the International Gay and Lesbian Human Rights Commission, have urged observers to refrain from casting the incident as a "gay" issue, and cast doubt on the claim that Marhoni and Asgari were hanged as a result of consensual acts.
_	Thus, (1) can be understood more intuitively as the claim that all objects that are indiscernible with respect to a base set of properties are indiscernible with respect to a supervenient set of properties, or, as it is also sometimes said, that B-twins are A-twins.
_	In early 2003 John Howard stated, "No criticism is more outrageous than the claim that United States behaviour is driven by a wish to take control of Iraq's oil reserves."
_	He appeared in Chicago, with the claim that he had perfected the process of refining sugar from grapes.
_	The courts eventually upheld the claim that enough signatures had been submitted and forced the MHP leadership to hold a congress.
_	Kalervo Gulson makes the claim that in today's world, particularly in inner-city areas, schools cannot operate in isolation from the communities in which they are located.
_	Sartre offers a critique of the psychoanalyst Sigmund Freud's theory of the unconscious, based on the claim that consciousness is essentially self-conscious.
_	Other criticisms are economic in nature including the claim that African markets are harmed by low-cost Chinese-made products, which put great competitive pressure on local industries and businesses.
_	A self-published report by a professor at the University of Washington disputes the claim that HOAs protect property values, stating, based on a survey of Harris County, Texas (which had an unusual legal regime regarding foreclosures):
_	It found the evidence "woefully insufficient" to support the claim that DOJ obtained enhanced PROMIS through "fraud, trickery, and deceit," or that DOJ illegally distributed PROMIS inside or outside of DOJ.
_	In 2011 he published "Irresistible North: From Venice to Greenland on the Trail of the Zen Brothers", in which he analyses the claim that two Venetian merchants, the Zeno brothers, sailed over the north Atlantic in a pre-Columbian expedition to North America.
_	Moore examines the claim that the tenets of capitalism are compatible with Christianity, arguing that the rich ignore religion when it comes to the poor, sick and disadvantaged.
_	The book championed the claim that precious metals, such as gold and silver, have an intrinsic worth that makes them more usable in the event of a socioeconomic collapse than fiat currency.
_	The account of radar pioneer, E. G. Bowen in "Radar Days" (1987) rebuts the claim that Dowding's grasp of the problems of British night fighters was inadequate.
_	In 2016 the Slovenian Lacanian psychoanalyst Nina Krajnik launched an international initiative with the claim that Ljubljana School tried to prevent the presence of the Lacanian psychoanalysis in Slovenia and that several academic articles of the members of Ljubljana School are based on plagiarism.
_	PBS denied the claim that it had censored the show at Affleck's behest, and the show's host, professor Henry Louis Gates Jr., stated "we focused on what we felt were the most interesting aspects of his ancestry".
_	FactCheck.org said that the claim that "foreign corporations are 'stealing our democracy' with secret, illegal contributions funneled through the U.S. Chamber of Commerce" had "little basis in fact.
_	The bill was defended by the claim that SRANC had incited violence, government defiance, and “undermined [the] prestige of Native Commissioners and the loyalty of African Police," said a security intelligence report.
_	Though some breeders claim they are a hypoallergenic dog breed, there is no scientific evidence to support the claim that hypoallergenic dog breeds exist.
_	In the passage, Schiller makes the claim that thought only occurs when our unthinking habits prove themselves inadequate for handling a particular situation.
_	The actual validity of the claim that prices form a protected work of authorship is uncertain as the prices themselves (though not the advertisements) might be considered a fact in which case they would not receive the same level of protection as a copyrighted work.
_	Message design logic is a communication theory that makes the claim that individuals possess implicit theories of communication within themselves, called message design logics.
_	Severe criticism is put on the claim that these tools can solve "real-life" problems.
_	Ahmed disputed the claim that NASA funding had not supported the study by quoting its notice to that effect, and asserted that the paper's authors backed his earlier comments.
_	The campaign was bolstered by the claim that the Peters projection was the only "area-correct" map.
_	Calmanovici stated that, early on, authorities had presented him with the claim that he was kept in custody in order to aid in the process of compiling a history of the PCR.
_	Despite inconclusive research, there appears to be merit to the claim that gendered connotations of HRT give rise to difficulties in the feminist sphere.
_	It also serves as a counterexample to the claim that all Cantor spaces are ambiently homeomorphic to each other.
_	Epstein in his book "Dossier: The Secret History of Armand Hammer" puts forward the claim that it was Armand Hammer rather than his father who performed the abortion and his father Julius assumed the blame.
_	According to veterinarian Robert Cook, Professor of Surgery Emeritus at Cummings School of Veterinary Medicine at Tufts University in Massachusetts, Jackson provided "indisputable evidence, available for more than a decade, disproving the claim that domesticated horses need shoes."
_	What these critiques have in common is the claim that the analysis of I-language does not carry over to E-language.
_	He also made the claim that his overall influence on the game was greater than that of Avellone, Eric Campanella, or Dave Maldonaldo, but since a producer often has to make unpopular decisions his role was later downplayed.
_	He also stated in regard to the claim that Audrey was a purported "Victim Soul", "We must proceed quite cautiously here, since this term is not commonly used by the Church except for Christ himself who became the victim for our sins and transgressions on the cross."
_	He rejected the claim that Ireland was a conquered colony dependent on the government and parliament of Great Britain.
_	He makes the claim that his involvement in a car crash on the M20 was an attempt by "someone who had a grudge against him" to kill him.
_	Around this time she began promoting the claim that "All the gods are one god, and all the goddesses are one goddess".
_	U.S. Senator Daniel Webster, during a speech in Saratoga, New York, made the claim that Weston was, "the largest ship owner, probably, in the United States."
_	Nkunda claimed he was attempting to prevent genocide against Tutsis in the region, a claim rejected by MONUC, and denied the claim that he was following orders from Rwanda.
_	The official Schuldiner website, Empty Words, quotes Schuldiner's mother making the claim that he enjoyed all forms of music except country and rap.
_	Cognitivism can then be seen as the claim that when we talk about right and wrong, we are talking about matters of fact.
_	RCN tandem repeat sequences found on the terminal Sal1 restriction fragment were found to be distinct from varicella and cowpox virus, lending further support to the claim that RCN is a distinct virus within the orthopoxviruses.
_	Pinhole glasses have been marketed by various companies on the claim that—combined with certain eye exercises—they could permanently improve eyesight.
_	Neither the biographies of the two authors, nor the claim that they had been translating the work from a Latin original are taken seriously by scholars.
_	Thus the claim that Martin Heidegger wrote his "Habilitationsschrift" on Scotus is only half true, as the second part is actually based on the work by Erfurt.
_	He used as an example of what he sees as the unlikelihood of the claim that there is anti-black racism in modern America in the complaint by the actor Will Smith that he was not nominated for an Oscar.
_	Advocates of facilitated communication believe Blackman's case provides strong evidence supporting the claim that this technique is a viable pathway to communication where verbal speech may otherwise never develop.
_	He then accused White of spearheading a "strenuous campaign of falsehoods" against him, including the claim that William Shawn, the editor of the magazine at the time the book was first published, had not been allowed to read the book before publication.
_	The opposition and some international observers have made the claim that the abstention rate of about 75% demonstrates a deep distrust in the electoral process and the Chávez government, although in the context of the opposition withdrawal the abstention rate carries a different meaning than for a typical election, and previous poll ratings showed the opposition doing badly.
_	A collateral implication of this discovery, based on stratigraphy, was the claim that Oltenia had a contribution to anthropogenesis alongside the Oldowan complex uncovered in Tanzania by Louis Leakey.
_	Romanian university students were disproportionately over-represented in the Iron Guard, a fact which rebuts the claim that the Iron Guard attracted support only from social "losers".
_	PepsiCo's India operations were met with substantial resistance in 2003 and again in 2006, when an environmental organization in New Delhi made the claim that, based on its research, it believed that the levels of pesticides in PepsiCo (along with those from rival The Coca-Cola Company), exceeded a set of proposed safety standards on soft drink ingredients that had been developed by the Bureau of Indian Standards.
_	In it, he introduced new theological teachings including the claim that God was once a mortal man, and that mortal men and women can become gods (a concept commonly called divinization) through salvation and exaltation.
_	There is no evidence outside of Frank's statements for the existence of a "Leopold Frankenberger" living in Graz in the 1830s, and Frank's story is notably inaccurate on several points such as the claim that Maria Schicklgruber came from "Leonding near Linz", when in fact she came from the hamlet of Strones near the village of Döllersheim.
_	Some suggest that Frank (who turned against National Socialism after 1945 but remained an anti-Semitic fanatic) made the claim that Hitler had Jewish ancestry as way of proving that Hitler was really a "Jew" and not an "Aryan"; and in this way, "proved" that the Third Reich's crimes were the work of the "Jewish" Hitler.
_	Some in the more liberal wing, Progressive Adventists, typically reject the claim that the three angels' messages find a fulfillment in the Seventh-day Adventist Church.
_	A common complaint against rebates is the claim that rebates can be used as a form of "price discrimination" against members of lower classes who are less likely to redeem rebates than a more educated middle class.
_	The Chinese room argument by John Searle (1980) is a direct attack on the claim that thought can be represented as a set of functions.
_	Ashley and C.J. deceive unsuspecting pedestrians with the claim that they are collecting donations for charity.
_	The court rejected the claim that the First Amendment limited the degree to which copyright could be extended to "Pufnstuf", saying that other courts had long ago determined that copyright and the First Amendment were compatible, since copyright protected the form of expression only, while the First Amendment protected the right to present the ideas in some other form of expression.
_	Since Schleicher was a good friend of the French Ambassador André François-Poncet, and because of his reputation for intrigue, the claim that Schleicher was working for France had enough surface plausibility for most Germans to accept it.
_	The book has drawn criticism within Catholic circles for making the claim that it is possible for Catholic dogma to change, by portraying a fictional "Fourth Vatican Council" that has reversed the Catholic dogma of The Real Presence.
_	Larry Hauser credits Leiber's dialogue, "Can Animals and Machines Be Persons?" for articulating the claim that "the solipsistic predicament pertains to individuals not species," so that if one can reliably tell that other humans have minds it would be sheer chauvinism to maintain one could never know whether something non-human had a mind.
_	Harris provides no source for the claim that the stone was removed in 1865 or 1866.
_	In August 2012 FamilySearch employee and GEDCOM X project leader Ryan Heaton dropped the claim that GEDCOM X is the new industry standard, and repositioned GEDCOM X as another FamilySearch open source project.
_	Snopes assessed the claim and found that, while not impossible given that many of its founders were associated with the Union Army during the American Civil War, there was no support for the claim that it was one of the NRA's direct goals; improving marksmanship was the organization's initial mission.
_	It is now relatively easy to check that the PNT is equivalent to the claim that
_	In Asturias' application, this translates into the claim that "Guatemala cannot deny its roots even if the class in power refuses to recognize it."
_	At the same news conference, San Bernardino County Sheriff John McMahon reiterated the claim that deputies had not deliberately set the cabin on fire.
_	Some biographers, such as Theodor Adorno and Robert Gutman have advanced the claim that Wagner's opposition to Jews was not limited to his articles, and that the operas contained such messages.
_	Although many western game historians reject the claim that Xiangqi or other chess variants derive from Liubo, Jean-Louis Cazaux argues that Liubo could have been transformed from a race game to a battle game, and it could then have become Chinese chess.
_	The first suspect's, Adel Eidan, the man who drove the bomber to the mosque and brought the explosives from the Saudi brothers near the Kuwaiti-Saudi border and gave shelter to the bomber after he arrived from Saudi Arabia, made the claim that he wanted to bomb the mosque without killing anyone.
_	The theory makes the claim that Captain Edward Smith was a "Jesuit temporal coadjutor".
_	Augmented with ALC_FLR.2 establishes and verifies the claim that the developer has established flaw remediation procedures that describe the tracking of security flaws, the identification of corrective actions, and the distribution of corrective action information to TOE users.
_	The Martini derives its name from the claim that it can keep a cocktail from spilling even on turbulent waters.
_	Rollston also disputes the claim that the language is Hebrew, arguing that the words alleged to be indicative of Hebrew either appear in other languages or don't actually appear in the inscription.
_	Ongoing archeological excavations in the city support the claim that the area was the location of one of the first organized settlements on the European continent, with artifacts from the Paleolithic and Neolithic periods.
_	In the twentieth century, efforts were made to expose as a hoax the claim that Salvino degli Armati invented eyeglasses:
_	Various reasons have been offered in favor of the claim that extended simples are possible, including: (a) that they are conceivable (Markosian 1998), (b) that purportedly plausible modal principles claiming, roughly, that there are no necessary connections between distinct existences entail their possibility (McDaniel 2007a, Saucedo 2009, Sider 2006), and (c) that contemporary physical theories entail that there are extended simples (Braddon-Mitchell and Miller 2006).
_	One bill banned abortions at and after 20 weeks of pregnancy, based on the claim that fetuses of that age can feel pain; the other required that women seeking abortions be screened for mental-health problems.
_	Throughout Chinese history, rebels who opposed the ruling dynasty made the claim that the Mandate of Heaven had passed, giving them the right to revolt.
_	In a 1971 essay to mark the 100th anniversary of German unification, Bracher rejected the claim that Otto von Bismarck was the "grandfather" of the present-day Federal Republic, and argued that those historians who claimed that there was a line of continuity between Bismarck's Second Reich and the Federal Republic were entirely mistaken.
_	This likeness (shape and form) apparently gave rise to the phrase and meaning of, "like father like son," which means the son is in the likeness of the father, which provides meaning to the claim that humanity was made in the likeness of God.
_	Douglas Elmendorf, the head of the Congressional Budget Office (CBO) supported the claim that Medicare benefits could be cut, but his comments were in reference to just one of several congressional bills.
_	Ramkrishna Bhattacharya adduces an argument from within the text itself to refute the claim that "Tattvopaplava-siṃha" is a Cārvāka text.
_	The fact-checking website FactCheck.org analyzed the claim that "foreign corporations are 'stealing our democracy' with secret, illegal contributions funneled through the U.S. Chamber of Commerce," noting that ThinkProgress made the initial allegations.
_	In 2007, construction work near the castle revealed stonework from the castle’s outer baileys, lending evidence to the claim that Okazaki Castle was once the fourth largest in Japan.
_	The issue centered on the claim that Deborah Broide Publicity, the company that handles PR for Cook's Country, America's Test Kitchen, and Cooks Illustrated emailed Melissa and made erroneous claims concerning copyright violations.
_	In order to justify continuing the war, they resorted to the claim that the Iraqi people were clamoring for the US and allies to free them from dictator Saddam Hussein.
_	Maxime Verhagen, the informal leader of the CDA and current deputy Prime Minister, strongly denies the claim that the CDA is considered a right-wing party.
_	Kaplan judges the Roddy article as "dangerously misleading [due] to the credence it gives to the claim that without organised Jewish pressure the council declaration on the Jews would not have been accepted."
_	His desire to subvert the norms of culture, or in other words, create an alternate reality that became more real than reality itself, was done within the context of the Priory of Sion and to promote the claim that Pierre Plantard was the direct descendant of Dagobert II.
_	The controversy is fueled by the claim that a man named Arsen Ilyasov, born in 1984 in Bukhara, Uzbekistan, entered Turkey as an 18-year-old in August 7, 2002 and was never heard from again, while on September 19, 2002, a man named Semsettin Bulut claimed to have forgotten to register the birth of his now 15-year-old son, and did so as Ersan İlyasova, a Turkish citizen.
_	In 2008, ACSH applauded the American Academy of Pediatrics for demanding for an episode of "Eli Stone" to carry a disclaimer since the show depicted a jury awarding damages based on the claim that a vaccine caused autism.
_	Critics also dispute the claim that Centering Prayer is in the tradition of the Desert Fathers and Carmelite saints, saying that traditional Catholic contemplative prayer is not so much a method of prayer as a stage of prayer in which God's action predominates.
_	Bailey and other supporters of technological alteration of human biology also reject the claim that life would be experienced as meaningless if some human limitations are overcome with enhancement technologies as extremely subjective.
_	In the 1860s, as Secord's story gained prominence, historian William Foster Coffin added new details, which included the claim that Laura had brought a cow with her as an excuse to leave her home in case the American patrols questioned her.
_	A further issue is with continuity of personal identity, that is, it is not easy to account for the claim that the person that exists after bodily death is the "same" person that existed before.
_	His article, "Does the Universe Need God?" in "The Blackwell Companion to Science and Christianity" develops the claim that science no longer needs to posit a divine being to explain the existence of the universe.
_	His lawsuit included the claim that S.M. had favoured Korean division EXO-K over Chinese division EXO-M. Within 15 minutes of the announcement, company stocks had dropped by 9.41%, from KR₩37,000 to KR₩33,250 per share.
_	It ends with the claim that a number of heroes, who were always eager to help others, were born in this dynasty.
_	Many were astonished and disenchanted with the rise of spectacular gangland crimes (such as Chicago's Saint Valentine's Day Massacre in 1929), belying the claim that prohibition would reduce crime.
_	One increasingly common cause of hate crimes against intersex people is the neurological claim that male and female brains have fundamentally different sexualities, in particular the claim that men are sexually impulsive and aggressive and bound to act on their sexual fantasies while most women are said to have a wider range of sexual fantasies than most men, including fantasies that it would be unacceptable to act on.
_	It also reasserted the claim that Corbyn's policy of bringing the trains back into public ownership was so popular was precisely because passengers across Britain will have been in similar situations on overcrowded, expensive, trains.
_	Méry said he had been inspired by an old Latin manuscript, and an 1842 English translation of the story made the claim that it was in fact taken from an old Latin manuscript.
_	He also said, "the new fundamentalism of our age ... leads to the language of expulsion and exclusivity, of extremism and polarisation, and the claim that, because God is on our side, he is not on yours."
_	Feminist ethics of care critiques feminist justice ethics with the claim that by lumping women into universal categories of being, the emphasis on distinct virtues that may be held primarily by women is lost.
_	When Farber contacted Calissi in 1975, Calissi called the claim that the circumstances of the deaths were plausible to be "horsesh-t" and remained convinced that his suspicions in the case were accurate that there had been criminal actions involved in the deaths.
_	In the 1970s, Olson began a research program on children's understanding of language and meaning, advancing the claim that young children fail to make a distinction between what is “said” and what is “meant.”
_	Although Lionel Lukin had patented a lifeboat in 1785, Greathead successfully petitioned parliament in 1802 with the claim that he had invented a lifeboat in 1790, and he was awarded £1,200 for his trouble.
_	A 2007 study published in "The American Journal of Forensic Medicine and Pathology" questioned the apparent contradiction created by the claim that the Taser X26 does not stimulate the heart muscle, while clearly causing skeletal muscle contraction and stimulation.
_	The Hungarian government used the pretext that Yugoslavia had ceased to exist, and therefore make the claim that Hungary was not invading it — and on that basis the Hungarian Army crossed the frontier on 11 April.
_	One argument holds to the claim that definitions of God are irreducible, self-instituting relational, circular.
_	They are on the seat of Swaminarayan and the opposition via court, too has not yet come across any evidence from the works and scriptures of Swaminarayan to back up the claim that acharyas can be disposed of.
_	Orchard countered the claim that the Gospel of Mark must have been written first, since it contains less information than Matthew and Luke, by positing that Peter elected not to speak on certain subjects, such as the birth and resurrection narratives, since he had not been a direct witness of those events.
_	Produced by a victim of clerical sex abuse for the British Broadcasting Corporation (BBC) in 2006, the documentary "Sex Crimes and the Vatican" included the claim that all allegations of sex abuse are to be sent to the Vatican rather than the civil authorities, and that "a secret church decree called 'Crimen sollicitationis' ... imposes the strictest oath of secrecy on the child victim, the priest dealing with the allegation, and any witnesses.
_	After digital remastering of the tape the song was edited and published under the claim that it was the official third part of the Jeanny trilogy.
_	Representatives of James denied the claim that he would be involved.
_	He therefore concluded – with (he claimed) the support of circumstantial evidence – that the bridge might well have failed at the north end first; he explicitly dismissed the claim that the train had hit the girders before the bridge fell.
_	He bases his argument on the claim that, “no one colonizes innocently, that no one colonizes with impunity either; that a nation which colonizes, that a civilization which justifies colonization—and therefore force—is already a sick civilization, a civilization which is morally diseased, which irresistibly, progressing from one consequence to another, one denial to another, calls for its Hitler, I mean its punishment”.
_	Her several arguments that this is plausible center on the claim that, if "Lovers" and "First Alcibiades" are genuine, they provide an otherwise missing background in Plato's thinking against which to understand his treatment of self-knowledge in "Charmides".
_	After retirement, he had four and a half years in China and when he returned became a critic of the claim that climate was harmed by human emissions of greenhouse gases.
_	This supports the claim that SOXB1 group proteins have redundant roles.
_	Although Morris dismisses the claim that the Palestinians were systematically expelled due to orders from Israeli officials, he nevertheless cites an IDF Intelligence Report that concludes that 70% of the exodus was caused by Israeli forces and 'Jewish dissidents
_	The Fatimid/Dawoodi Bohra support the claim that Zaynab is buried in Cairo.
_	In his 2008 biography of Lennon, writer Philip Norman includes the claim that Drane conducted a clandestine affair with Lennon for over a year.
_	In response to the publication of the secret protocols and other secret German–Soviet relations documents in the State Department edition "Nazi–Soviet Relations" (1948), Stalin published "Falsifiers of History", which included the claim that, during the Pact's operation, Stalin rejected Hitler's claim to share in a division of the world, without mentioning the Soviet offer to join the Axis.
_	Articles in the "New York Times" and "Boston" magazine, as well as a press release issued by the United States Department of State, have referred to a lack of documentary or testimonial evidence to corroborate the claim that the NSA was involved in his hiring by Chas T. Main.
_	Shane and Kazarian made the claim that it was illegal under TNA rules to win the X Division Title if a wrestler had previously won the NWA World Title (if so, the rule has since been stricken because numerous wrestlers, including Styles, Ron Killings and Sabu, have competed in X Division Championship matches after previously being an NWA World Heavyweight Champion).
_	Other major currents include the will to power, the claim that God is dead, the distinction between master and slave moralities, and radical perspectivism.
_	After digital remastering of the tape the song was edited and published under the claim that it was the official third part of the "Jeanny Trilogy" by the album's producers Gunther Mende and Alexander C. De Rouge.
_	Maqrizi also made the claim that “no previous mosque and khanqah, in the area of Saliba, has thrived to this extent, nor was there ever created in the Bahri Mamluk state the equal to their pious endowments and the excellence of their incomes” (Smith).
_	His "Scott and Scotland" advanced the claim that Scotland can create a national literature only by writing in English, an opinion that placed him in direct opposition to the Lallans movement of Hugh MacDiarmid.
_	Historian Werner Maser stated that "the claim that the Soviet Union was at the time threatened by Hitler, as Stalin supposed ... is a legend, to whose creators Stalin himself belonged.
_	The defense did not contest the claim that DeLong had participated in the attack, but instead dwelt on the history of Apache attacks that had occurred in southern Arizona Territory over the previous months.
_	Realism in physics (especially quantum mechanics) is the claim that the world is in some sense mind-independent: that even if the results of a possible measurement do not pre-exist the act of measurement, that does not require that they are the creation of the observer (contrary to the "consciousness causes collapse" interpretation of quantum mechanics).
_	Additionally there was the claim that the river was navigable by steamboat as far as the Virgin River by the fur trapper Antoine Leroux who had successfully rafted down the Colorado from the Virgin River in 1837.
_	Pride of intellect revolts against the claim that truth lies outside the realm of reason."
_	In Germany, the small FVdG opposed the socialists' "Burgfrieden" and Germany's involvement in the war, challenging the claim that the country was waging a defensive war.
_	However, see the next section "Theoretical horopter" for the claim that this has been the case of a "mistaken identity" for about 200 years.
_	San Roman was interrogated by the Dominicans and confessed the Reformed doctrines, including salvation by faith alone and the claim that the Pope is the Antichrist.
_	However, on July 27, the Sankei Shimbun published his name and photograph, with the claim that the incident was a "serious crime".
_	Fyson states that archaeological evidence supports the claim that a monastery (vihara in Tamil) existed in ancient Mahabalipuram.
_	Robbie Collin at "The Daily Telegraph" wrote that "Readers of the film's Wikipedia page may spot the claim that it received 'the longest sustained standing ovation of the festival at 16 minutes'.
_	He also sought to defend his behaviour off Pulo Aura with the claim that the British convoy was protected by as many as eight ships of the line, and that he had performed heroically in saving his squadron from this overwhelming force.
_	In her manifesto, she makes the claim that it "penetrates to the root of the human predicament and offers the underlying solution.
_	According to McDade, the "only thing new and weird" in the film, is the claim that video footage of Earth was actually filmed through a small hole to give the impression that Apollo 11 was not in low earth orbit.
_	General hypotheses relating to correlates between humans and animals also support the claim that animals may feel emotions and that human emotions evolved from the same mechanisms.
_	On January 7, 2016, Iran's foreign ministry made the claim that Saudi warplanes had "deliberately" targeted its embassy to Yemen in the city of Sanaa.
_	Multiple studies since 1972 have backed up the claim that, "The average proportion of genetic differences between individuals from different human populations only slightly exceeds that between unrelated individuals from a single population."
_	Beginning early in the 20th century in the United States, a number of Ascended Master Teachings organizations began making the claim that Francis Bacon had never died.
_	This is the claim that the domination of women and animals are both due to a patriarchal elevation of the "rational" over the "natural".
_	(Barham's 1841 investigations found no evidence to the claim that bal maidens grew up to be poor housewives, concluding that "they are for the most part tender mothers and industrious wives [and] the laborious occupations to which they have been inured make household duties appear comparatively light".)
_	Following Rosebery's lead, he based his attack firstly on what were supposed to be Britain's war aims – remedying the grievances of the Uitlanders and in particular the claim that they were wrongly denied the right to vote, saying "I do not believe the war has any connection with the franchise.
_	They also disputed the claim that the teeth were significantly out of their sockets in the holotype specimen of "Sinornithosaurus", though they admitted that they were not in a completely natural position.
_	For instance, the claim that early Christians rejected scientific findings by the Greco-Romans is false, since the "handmaiden" view of secular studies was seen to shed light on theology.
_	Also, the claim that people of the Middle Ages widely believed that the Earth was flat was first propagated in the same period that originated the conflict thesis and is still very common in popular culture.
_	The thesis of eliminativism seems to be so obviously wrong to many critics, under the claim that people know immediately and indubitably that they have minds, that argumentation seems unnecessary.
_	Demurger complained that Dailliez usually does not provide references for his work, and also accused him of taking "mischievous pleasure in muddying the waters," such as by asserting the claim that Jacques de Molay, Grand Master of the Knights Templar, had been a general in the Mongol army and participated in an attack on Jerusalem.
_	Owen () criticized the proliferation of hoaxes and exaggeration of historical facts in an effort to build on Pinoy Pride, such as the claim that Agapito Flores was the inventor of the fluorescent lamp.
_	To the claim that it would be unjustifiable to teach history, philosophy, and other subjects as Boden professor, he quoted from one of Wilson's public lectures in which he had said that it had always been his intention to offer "a general view of the institutions and social condition, the literature, and religion of the Hindus."
_	He concluded by attempting to rebut the claim that Boden would not have wanted the Vedic scriptures to be supported.
_	In his book "The Strange Case of Edmund Gurney" (1964), Hall made the claim that Edmund Gurney committed suicide after discovering the frauds of Douglas Blackburn and George Albert Smith.
_	Within the process of the linguistic reorganisation of states, the claim that Dasuya should be incorporated into Himachal Pradesh on the grounds that it was the home of Dogras was rejected because that point was irrelevant to the linguistic issue.
_	Some historians specifically reject the claim that these black men were trained and organized combat soldiers and described them simply as teamsters.
_	This book uses the claim that the Federal Reserve is a private body to support its role.
_	After been questioned by another Hương lawyer Naran Singh during the session hearing, the police investigator admitted there was a mistake in his investigation due to pressure from previous Malaysian police chief Khalid though Wan Azirul still declining the claim that his investigation is controlled by his superior.
_	Dershowitz offered to produce his handwritten drafts (he does not type) to debunk the claim that "The Case for Israel" was ghostwritten and claimed Finkelstein has not asked to see them.
_	He considered the constitutional amendment the best way to avoid a filibuster, as the claim that federal abolition of the poll tax was unconstitutional would be moot.
_	In addition, because of critical anthropomorphism, ethology, and comparative psychology are relatively unknown concepts to the layman, there are critics that question the validity in the claim that animals have a personality schema.
_	There are no specific numbers for the claim that HIV/Aids is the major cause of death among young people.
_	A February 2014 study found "no evidence to support" the claim that "there had been a dramatic increase in physicians moving to Texas due to the improved liability climate."
_	Rowing historian Tim Koch, writing in the official 2014 Boat Race Programme, notes that there is "a very big and very entrenched lie" about the race, including the claim that Phelps had announced "Dead heat ... to Oxford by six feet" (the distance supposedly mentioned by Phelps varies according to the telling).
_	In 2008, Ross applied for the James Randi Educational Foundation's One Million Dollar Paranormal Challenge with the claim that energy from his eyes could cause a speaker, receiving no other input, to sound a tone.
_	The main conclusion is that Schengen routing compliance is not achieved in any of the Schengen members, contradicting the claim that Schengen routing was already a factual reality, as it has been stated by the Association of the German Internet Industry and Deutsche Telekom.
_	In 2010 a Jerusalem district court found the claim that "Captain R." had shot Al Hams multiple times to "verify" her death, made by Ilana Dayan in her "Uvda" (Fact) TV show on Telad, to be libelous, and required them to air a correction and for Telad to pay NIS 300,000.
_	The National Reading Panel (NRP) in the United States meta-analyzed all quasi-experimental and experimental studies of SSR and challenged the claim that SSR has positive effects.
_	Consider, for example, the claim that the present king of France is bald.
_	Apart from the police force's denials that Donovan could possibly have slipped past them, there does not seem to be any strong evidence against the claim that Donovan made the leap as planned.
_	Thereafter the tsar demanded that the Livonian Confederation pay about 6,000 marks to keep the Bishopric of Dorpat, based on the claim that every adult male had paid Pskov one mark when it had been an independent state.
_	Therefore, the claim that the loan was repaid is believed as well.
_	Porphyry repeats the claim that she was the teacher of Pythagoras:
_	Lawyers representing people alleging that they have been tortured applied for another judicial review in May 2012 to examine the claim that the Royal Navy Police are not sufficiently independent since they also took part in interrogations, and that abuses were so systemic and widespread that only a public inquiry will satisfy the UK's human rights obligations.
_	Therefore, the statement that every square matrix "A" can be put in Jordan normal form is equivalent to the claim that there exists a basis consisting only of eigenvectors and generalized eigenvectors of "A".
_	In "Who Stole Feminism?" (1994) Christina Hoff Sommers criticized Wolf for publishing the claim that 150,000 women were dying every year from anorexia in the United States, writing that the actual figure was more likely to be somewhere between 100 and 400 per year.
_	An article in Sportfishing Magazine in February 2007 made the claim that fewer twists created greater strength.
_	The operating company was put into voluntary liquidation in late 1934, under the claim that the park was not profitable.
_	Manley's semi-autobiographical "Adventures of Rivella" repeated the claim that her work was entirely fictional.
_	A more recent adaptation of Warhol's quip, possibly prompted by the rise of online social networking, blogging, and internet celebrity, is the claim that "In the future, everyone will be famous to fifteen people" or, in some renditions, "On the Web, everyone will be famous to fifteen people".
_	Poincaré deliberately used only white troops in occupying the Ruhr to avoid more "black horror" stories, through the claim that a Senegalese regiment had been stationed in Essen was widely believed in both Germany and abroad.
_	Bard rapes her, justifying his actions with the claim that they are married (which they aren't).
_	Another component of the shift in science that took place in the past centres on the claim that there is no single scientific method, but rather a plurality of methods, approaches or styles.
_	It is the confusing of the two questions that gives rise to the claim that a "quota" exists.
_	One questions the historical accuracy of the claim that such an instrument could be engineered in ancient times.
_	Biscardi teamed up with Whitton and Dyer to promote the claim that they had a Bigfoot corpse, and promised the media DNA evidence.
_	Former conscript Fernando Cangiano has also dismissed the claims about the "supposed widespread sadism present among the Argentine officers and NCOs" and the claim that the conscripts had not handled themselves well in the fighting.
_	The MythBusters tested the claim that Curry could drop a silver dollar off his hand and then draw and fire five shots from his revolver before it hit the ground.
_	The core of the claim that PCM (the only digital recording technique available at the time) recordings created a stress reaction rested on "tests" carried out using the pseudoscientific technique of applied kinesiology, for example by Dr Diamond at an AES 66th Convention (1980) presentation with the same title.
_	Hume's argument is that we cannot rationally justify the claim that nature will continue to be uniform, as justification comes in only two varieties—demonstrative reasoning and probable reasoning—and both of these are inadequate.
_	Alexios, however, was worried about Theodore's reaction, so he kept Gregory at the court as a hostage in order to ensure Theodore's continued good behavior, reassuring Theodore with the claim that he was contemplating marrying Gregory to one of his own daughters.
_	Bustamante feared the claim that Guerrero was descended from Aztec royalty would bolster his appeal to Indians.
_	A chariot linchpin found at the site gives further weight to the claim that the site may have been an official residence.
_	However, there are cases where pay-TV providers completely disregard AFD instructions and for instance, present a 4:3 picture with widescreen elements cut off to assuage user complaints about letterboxing, on standard 4:3 sets (for instance for a secondary-market station available only in standard definition on a provider on the claim that an HD signal exists for the provider's 'primary' station for a network), to the displeasure of broadcasters.
_	As Schleicher had been a good friend of André François-Poncet, and because of his reputation for intrigue, the claim that Schleicher was working for France had enough surface plausibility for most Germans to accept it, though it was not in fact true.
_	The protest raised by Survival International (SI) and other international organizations is based on the claim that indigenous peoples worldwide have a right to their ancestral land.
_	They not only made the claim that sex is a belief system rather than a fact, but went on to analyze the interpretive practices that enable each of us to create the “fact” of two and only two sexes…
_	In March 2007 it was the subject of a US nationwide class-action suit against Avanir and GlaxoSmithKline as the claim that it cut recovery times in half was found to have been misleading in a California court, but the case was eventually settled and the "cuts healing time in half" claim had not been used in product advertising for some years.
_	Watching Keira riding her scooter on the house's road, Mia impulsively pressures Keira to go with her under the claim that Keira's mother told Mia to take her for ice cream.
_	However, during later research, more evidence of both molecular phylogeny and morphology has been found to support the claim that the three genera should be considered one single dimorphic genus.
_	Author Steve Budin, whose father was a New York bookie, has recently publicized the claim that the 1954 Bedlam Game was fixed by mobsters in his book Bets, Drugs, and Rock & Roll ().
_	His books "Righteous Gentiles: How Pius XII and the Catholic Church Saved Half a Million Jews from the Nazis" (Spence Publishing, 2005) and "Hitler, the War, and the Pope" (Genesis Press, 2000), address the claim that Pope Pius XII failed to stand up for the victims of Nazi aggression in World War II.
_	Israel has no right of preventing us from visiting Syria and Lebanon under the claim that these are enemy countries especially that we maintain spiritual and nationalistic ties with these countries.
_	Other criticism centres on the claim that many recipients of the Order are being rewarded with honours for simply doing their jobs; critics claim that the Civil Service and Judiciary receive far more orders and honours than leaders of other professions.
_	If that which is defended is insignificant in comparison to the injuries to the attacker, the court may reject the claim that person acted in self-defense since the damage done to the attacker "is" "blatantly unjustifiable".
_	"The Boston Globe" described the act as "shameful" and "offensive", saying that it not only fails to protect Americans but also "hands a propaganda victory to ISIS, appearing to vindicate the claim that the United States is out to get Muslims".
_	In 1997, after reviewing 33 clinical studies performed over the previous decades, the FDA approved the claim that intaking at least 3 g of β-glucan from oats per day decreased saturated fats and reduced the risk of heart disease.
_	The brief also stated that the court should also reject the claim that the cancellation of trademarks constitutes an illegal taking of valuable property which is barred by the Fifth Amendment.
_	He made the claim that Californians have canceled their subscriptions due to the "extreme left-wing bias" of the newspaper.
_	He drew in the claim that St Matthew's Gospel had originally been written in Hebrew, and that when it was afterwards translated into Greek the translator was able to make use of passages for which he found existing Greek versions in St Mark and St Luke.
_	They dismiss the claim that no ordinary tools were found at the site, noting that the many scrapers that are found are ordinary tools and that there is evidence of tool making at the site.
_	Many scholars in the psychological community now view the claim that playing classical music to children can boost their intelligence to be a "myth."
_	Worthington noted with skepticism that American analysts accepted the claim that 19-year-old conscript Borekzai was the "acting governor of Sheberghan".
_	With this in mind it can be asked what status holds for the claim that “all our ideas or more feeble perceptions are copies of our impressions or more lively ones”.
_	The most controversial, and in fact a key reason for Joseph Smith's murder, is the claim that plural marriage (as defenders call it) or polygamy (as attackers call it) is Biblically authorized.
_	This one-to-one correspondence unequivocally refutes, a second time, the claim that Euclidean prs’s are "non signed" sequences and that the signs of their polynomials can be changed arbitrarily.
_	One example of this argument is the Christological argument: the claim that historical evidence proves that Jesus Christ rose from the dead and that this can only be explained if God exists.
_	Another is the claim that many of the Qur'an's prophecies have been fulfilled and that this too can only be explained if God (Allah) exists.
_	His argument centers around the claim that, "symptom-based diagnosis, once common in other areas of medicine, has been largely replaced in the past half century as we have understood that symptoms alone rarely indicate the best choice of treatment."
_	Orland disputed the claim that the list suggested collusion among journalists, but said that he had written a message saying several things that he later regretted.
_	Sartre offers a philosophical critique of Sigmund Freud's theories, based on the claim that consciousness is essentially self-conscious.
_	The philosopher Martha Nussbaum wrote that the claim that homosexuality is a cultural construction is associated more with Foucault's "The History of Sexuality" than with any other work.
_	There have been some theories about why this may have been done, although the claim that Oldfield was not actually on the beach is easily contradicted by other photographs from the shoot.
_	Attributed to P. F. Strawson is the performative theory of truth which holds that to say "'Snow is white' is true" is to perform the speech act of signaling one's agreement with the claim that snow is white (much like nodding one's head in agreement).
_	In an op-ed for the Guardian Aurora Nacarino-Brabo and Jorge San Miguel Lobeto, two political scientists affiliated with the anti-independence Ciutadans party, disputed the claim that Catalonia has been oppressed or excluded from Spanish politics.
_	For instance, they argue that the claim that "women wearing provocative clothing cause rape" is as demeaning to men as it is to women as depicting men as incapable of controlling their sexual desire is misandrist and denies men full agency, while also arguing that the generalization that women do not lie about rape (or any generalization about women not doing some things because of their gender) is misogynist by its implicit assumption that women act by simple default action modes which is incompatible with full agency.
_	Butler accepts the claim that if the subject is opaque to itself the limitations of its free ethical responsibility and obligations are due to the limits of narrative, presuppositions of language and projection.
_	A number of secondary and tertiary trials have been split from the main proceedings, among them a number of counterclaims by the alleged secessionists of unlawful arrest, torture and manhandling, but also the claim that Namibian courts do not have jurisdiction over the Caprivi because the Caprivi Strip is not part of the Republic of Namibia.
_	Imagination inflation has implications for the criminal justice system, in particular interrogation and interviewing procedures, as it supports the claim that interrogators who ask suspects to repeatedly imagine committing a crime may risk making them more confident that they are the perpetrators, ultimately producing false confessions from innocent suspects.
_	Tim Robey, writing in "The Daily Telegraph", disdained the claim that the film was Allen's return to form.
_	Reiss dismissed the claim that Chamanzaminli was the author behind the Said pseudonym, claiming that he looked at one of Chamanzaminli's novellas and found him to be a (Muslim communalist) nationalist.
_	Many modern day commentators and local historians accept the claim that the "tŷ unnos" is a tradition enshrined in law.
_	and then this reduces to the claim that for every random variable formula_24, if formula_25 then formula_26 (this holds since formula_27 is the weighted average of formula_24 and clearly if the average of some values is at least formula_13 then one of the values must be at least formula_13).
_	However the claim that he appeared in the TV series appears to be mistaken, although confusingly he did play a minor character, also called Les Ferris, in a 1990 TV mini-series called "A Likely Lad".
_	Elkins argued for the third century AD as the "terminus post quem" for the deposition of the statues, refuting the claim that the bust was thrown away due to feared repercussions from Caesar's assassination in 44 BC.
_	Don Luis Pacheco de Narváez makes the claim that Don Jerónimo Sánchez de Carranza based his text on the work of Agrippa in a letter to the Duke of Cea in Madrid on May 4, 1618.
_	It was later claimed Johann Georg had fathered Alois prior to his marriage to Maria, although Alois had been declared illegitimate on his birth certificate and baptism papers; the claim that Johann Georg was the true father of Alois was not made after the marriage of Maria and Johann Georg, or, indeed, even during the lifetime of either of them.
_	Over its first decade, the party emphasised the claim that migrants themselves should not be blamed for immigration, but rather the blame should be placed on the politicians who enabled this migration.
_	In 1969, it publicised the claim that "Your enemies are not the coloured immigrants, but the British government which let them come in hundreds of thousands."
_	The illusion of Tintin as a real reporter for the paper, and not a fictional character, was emphasised by the claim that the comic strip was not a series of drawings, but composed of photographs taken of Tintin's adventure.
_	Historian Allan Nevins wrote that Chase's language was often "grossly exaggerated" and used as an example the claim that the bill would "permanently subjugate the whole country to the yoke of a slaveholding despotism."
_	Risk parity critics rarely contest the claim that the risk parity portfolio is near the tangency portfolio but they say that the leveraged investment line is less steep and that the levered risk parity portfolio has slight or no advantage over 60% stocks / 40% bonds, and carries the disadvantage of greater explicit leverage.
_	Hicks does not offer the claim that this is the definitive origin of the name however he does say it is “certainly appropriate…
_	This argument depends upon the acceptance of semantic externalism, the claim that the meaning of one's words is determined not merely by some internal state, but also by the causal history of the speaker.
_	Han Bannermen carried out the fighting and killing, casting doubt on the claim that fear of the water led to the coastal evacuation and ban on maritime activities.
_	The next day "The Daily Telegraph" commented that ministers had accused the judges of relegating the referendum vote to a footnote and backing the claim that a vote from the House of Commons and House of Lords was now needed before UK and EU talks began.
_	On the day of the referendum, it was reported in the New Statesman that David Blunkett had admitted that the claim that introducing the AV system would be more expensive had been exaggerated.
_	Polome accepts the claim that Albanian is descended from Illyrian, not Thracian, although he considers the evidence for this as inconclusive.
_	Sexual humiliation was used, such as forced sitting on red-hot stools with the claim that the accused woman would not perform sexual acts with the devil.
_	Nineteenth century chemists set out to disprove the claim that forming organic compounds required vitalist influence.
_	Some people, including former opponents of nuclear energy, criticise the movement on the basis of the claim that nuclear power is necessary for reducing carbon dioxide emissions.
_	The Volvo brand has also made the claim that "By 2020, nobody shall be seriously injured or killed in a new Volvo."
_	In one report, the conservative newspaper "Daily Telegraph" described the claim that Zarqawi was the head of the "terrorist network" in Iraq as a "myth".
_	In 1954, she published "The Divine King in England", in which she greatly extended on the theory, taking in an influence from Sir James Frazer's "The Golden Bough", an anthropological book that made the claim that societies all over the world sacrificed their kings to the deities of nature.
_	Joi Internet's parent company was sued by BellSouth Corporation in February 2004 on the basis of false advertising due to the claim that their accelerated dial-up was as fast as DSL.
_	Dean created controversy with the claim that the introduction of red foxes to Tasmania was a hoax, and has called for a police investigation.
_	Herein, they made the decision to destroy the statues"; however, he did not comment on the claim that a foreign museum offered to "buy the Buddhist statues, the money from which could have been used to feed children".
_	Intertwined with the Sinclair voyage story is the claim that Henry Sinclair was a Knight Templar and that the voyage either was sponsored by or conducted on the behalf of the Templars, though the order was suppressed almost half a century before Henry's lifetime.
_	There is no proof for suggestions that a convent was founded on the site in 606 nor for the claim that a monastery was founded there by St Swithun in the 9th century.
_	High Priestess Doreen Valiente made the claim that Gardner found the term "Book of Shadows" from a 1949 edition (Volume I, Number 3) of a magazine known as "The Occult Observer".
_	It was his own myth making, together with the desire of others to fabricate yarns about him, that has resulted in much of the misinformation about Cohen, from the claim that he had a hand in the making of modern China, to such outlandish ones like him having an affair with Soong Ching-ling and a wife in Canada back in the 1920s.
_	In a 1995 catalogue of works by Schiele, Leopold inserted the claim that the picture had been part of the Rieger collection that he had earlier acquired from the Austrian National Gallery.
_	The most publicised problem associated with Bt crops is the claim that pollen from Bt maize could kill the monarch butterfly.
_	The allegations, including the claim that Tredwell was physically assaulted by Amṛtānandamayī, have not been substantiated.
_	Al-Murtaza along with the Mu'tazilite starting-point is the claim that man's first duty is to use his reason to arrive at the knowledge of God.
_	John Miller further observes that Hong Kong and Singapore, both only "partially free" according to Freedom House, are leading countries on both economic freedom indices and casts doubt on the claim that measured economic freedom is associated with political freedom.
_	Molière is often associated with the claim that comedy "castigat ridendo mores" or "criticises customs through humour" (a phrase in fact coined by his contemporary Jean de Santeuil and sometimes mistaken for a classical Latin proverb).
_	Media Matters for America described it as "Glenn Beck's Climate of Distortion" which "rehashed several falsehoods and misleading talking points", including the claim that the so-called Oregon Petition had credibility.
_	While some scholars attest the veracity of the text to the claim that Somanatha was a Smartha hence free of sectarian bias, others question the claim citing a lack of evidence..
_	The novel caused considerable controversy over the claim that it was based on real events.
_	Historians have offered varying reactions to the claim that a black woman from the Caribbean held this prestigious and demanding position.
_	Furthermore, against the claim that tradition is ambiguous and could be developed in some other direction, Unger argues that his program offers the best chance for making freedom concrete for human beings.
_	The initial new claim was to the Supreme Court for a writ of error in "coram nobis", based on the claim that the use of the "secret" label in the original crash report was a fraud on the court.
_	The section also includes the claim that Seabrook's ancestor, Bishop Peter Boehler, had been a practitioner of black magic.
_	The 1975 Constitution also saw a significant shift in tone compared to the 1954 Constitution, and saw the insertion of a significant number of ideological sloganeering provisions, including the claim that the nation was guided by "Marxism-Leninism-Mao Zedong Thought".
_	There is no documentary evidence to substantiate the claim that the painting came from the Foscari collection, and some art historians believe that representatives of the Guicciardis invented this provenance to impress Eastlake.
_	In his "History of Brittany" (1582), the French jurist and historian Bertrand d'Argentré (1519–1590) was the first (as far as we currently know) to make the claim that the Basques, Bretons, and Normans were the first to reach the New World "before any other people".
_	This view was contrasted with endurantism, the claim that objects are wholly present at any one time (thus not having different temporal parts at different times).
_	Critics focus mainly on the claim that the internal structure of the trees is subject to variation based on the criteria of classification.
_	The "Tech Law Journal" in a review criticized the claim that there has been a decline:
_	The judge said that he showed no remorse in the hearing; he responded to the sentence with the claim that his prosecution "shows a child's virtue is more important than a man's life."
_	Stephen Colbert made the claim that because of "the Colbert bump," he was responsible for Huckabee's current success in the 2008 presidential race.
_	Other Britons soon made the claim that they were members of a long line of family Witches.
_	In 1974 E.W. Lidell made the claim that the occultist Aleister Crowley had been initiated into the witch-cult in 1899 or 1900, after being introduced to it through Allan Bennett, a Golden Dawn friend of his.
_	A similar belief was the claim that the Knights Templar worshipped a god called Baphomet, also widely interpreted as a variant of the name "Mahommet".
_	This is the first example of the acquisition of a complex hierarchical structure by a non-human primate and has been cited by Hauser and McDermott (2003) as a possible exception to the claim that only humans have "infinite productivity".
_	David C. Lindberg asserts: ""Cosmas was not particularly influential in Byzantium, but he is important for us because he has been commonly used to buttress the claim that all (or most) medieval people believed they lived on a flat earth.
_	In 1948, on the BBC radio Fogel made the claim that he could read peoples minds.
_	Barth could respond by saying that the claim that the foundation of theology is biblical inerrancy is to use a foundation other than Jesus Christ, and that our understanding of Scripture's accuracy and worth can only properly emerge from consideration of what it means for it to be a true witness to the incarnate Word, Jesus.
_	They put Meth in Tweek's coffee with the claim that it will calm him down, but it's far more likely to be the direct cause of his paranoia and shakes, but from observing their own calm, focused natures don't seem to use it themselves.
_	For example, the claim that the White House is in Washington, D.C. is true, if the White House is actually located in Washington.
_	He also addresses the claim that Christianity is more than a philosophy, bringing up the philosophers that say, "it [Christianity] teaches the virtues and profess morality, justice, patience, moderation, and chastity".
_	The principle strength of this argument is that it explains the phenomenon without drawing tenuous links with difficult-to-measure influences such as 'culture' and 'role-models', but it is also to some degree reinforced by academic consensus, which was identified in the 'Social and Political views of American Professors' paper as 75% in favor of the claim that differing interests between men and women caused the disparity, rather than discrimination.
_	Rabbi Miller investigated the claim that the sea snail "Murex trunculus" was the source of the biblical "techeiles".
_	She testified in the Colorado bench trial for "Romer v. Evans", arguing against the claim that the history of philosophy provides the state with a "compelling interest" in favor of a law denying gays and lesbians the right to seek passage of local non-discrimination laws.
_	These names do not seem to appear in post-biblical literature, supporting the claim that Eldad was, in fact, a charlatan.
_	The film takes aim at some scientific hypotheses of the origin of life, and presents a short animation portraying the inner workings of the cell to introduce the intelligent design concept of irreducible complexity, the claim that such complexity could not arise from spontaneous mutations.
_	Different local groups have different foci, but among the prime concerns is the claim that large corporations and the global financial system control the world in a way that disproportionately benefits a minority, undermines democracy and is unstable.
_	A revised version of the text was printed in 1641 by the stationer Robert Lunne, with the claim that this text was "much corrected and amended by the author before his death."
_	In answer to the claim that the defendants were concerned only with United States' intervention in Russia, he asserted that the leaflets
_	Furthermore, the claim that they soccer players wore wristbands "in support of Mousavi" was manufactured by the Western media, without recognizing that green was part of the official uniform of the team (as well as the flag) and the same players also had green shirt collars and green designs on their shirt and socks, as evident in the photographs of the players.
_	The intention is to emphasize the claim that atheism is not a form of religious creed, but instead merely denial of beliefs.
_	Proponents of intuitionism, from Kronecker onwards, reject the claim that there are actually infinite mathematical objects or sets.
_	They disputed the claim that the newly discovered evidence photo showed brain tissue, and presented many examples of "sloppy work" by police, such as the mishandling and misplacing of evidence—including the crucial tissue sample itself.
_	Domenico Pesce affirms the existence of unwritten doctrines and that they concerned the Good but condemns the Tübingen reconstruction and in particular the claim that Plato's metaphysics was bipolar.
_	Carr argued that the claim that history was a series of "accidents" was merely an expression of the pessimism which Carr claimed was the dominant mood in Britain in 1961, due to the decline of the British Empire.
_	Since the early 1990s, Maui County, Hawaii has been engaged in a struggle over the 3-5 million gallons per day of wastewater that it injects below the Lahaina sewage treatment plant, over the claim that the water was emerging in seeps that were causing algae blooms and other environmental damage.
_	Hannigan argues for a 'soft constructionism' (environmental problems are materially real though they require social construction to be noticed) over a 'hard constructionism' (the claim that environmental problems are entirely social constructs).
_	His defence consists largely of the claim that British rule was in India's best interest.
_	Although the claim that the flower gives eternal life sounds like a hoax, within hours Adrian, Severin and Beate are fleeing from international fortune hunters and the Indonesian army, who all want to acquire the flower.
_	The justification in all cases is some variation on the claim that the topic is highly inflammatory and may be offensive to some.
_	This included the claim that the married footballer known as CTB had been involved in a seven-month extra-marital relationship with model Imogen Thomas.
_	However, it rejected the claim that medics had supplied protesters with weapons and stated that evidence supporting allegations that medics denied health care to patients was "hardly conclusive," as paraphrased by Al Jazeera English.
_	Therefore, Fodor and Piattelli-Palmarini argue that the theory of natural selection "cannot predict/explain what traits the creatures in a population are selected-for", and so "the claim that selection is the mechanism of evolution cannot be true".
_	In addition, the six or seven years (1996–2003) that elapsed between encountering the material and causing the death of Longhurst creates doubt to the claim that the material is a potent cause of murderous intent.
_	News of the riot was censored at the time, hence much of the mythology about the event, including the claim that two Americans were killed.
_	Several archaeological findings support the claim that Afikpo civilisation existed as far back as the Neolithic age.
_	She was the main proponent of the claim that the chocolate brownie was invented in Bangor.
_	The phrase gained currency in the United Kingdom on 29 May 2003, when BBC defence correspondent Andrew Gilligan filed a report for BBC Radio 4's "Today" programme in which he stated that an unnamed source, a senior British official, had told him that the September Dossier had been "sexed up", and that the intelligence agencies were concerned about some highly dubious information contained within it—specifically the claim that Saddam Hussein could deploy weapons of mass destruction within 45 minutes of an order.
_	some critics dispute the claim that corruption was eliminated, maintaining instead that there was a shift from “rampant petty bribery to more clientelistic forms of corruption.”
_	However, there is one indirect supporter of the claim that Coster might be the inventor.
_	Most of these Jews are part of mainstream groups such as the Reform, Conservative, or Orthodox branches of Judaism; although there are significant numbers of people who are part of non-mainstream Jewish groups, largely the Black Hebrew Israelites, whose beliefs include the claim that African Americans are descended from the Biblical Israelites.
_	A variant of above defenses is that the problem of evil is derived from probability judgments since they rest on the claim that, even after careful reflection, one can see no good reason for co-existence of God and of evil.
_	The article on the wolf begins with the claim that it is one of the animals with a specially strong appetite for flesh; it asserts that the animal is naturally coarse and cowardly ("grossier et poltron"), but becoming crafty at need, and hardy by necessity, driven by hunger.
_	Michigan did, however, dispute the claim that Coach Rodriguez "failed to promote an atmosphere of compliance."
_	More recently, Brian Cathcart has refuted the claim that Rothschild was the first man in London to know of the victory at Waterloo.
_	Despite not having any evidence to prove it, Mailer repeated the claim that Monroe and Robert F. Kennedy had an affair and speculated that she was killed by either the FBI or CIA, who wished to use the murder as a "point of pressure ... against the Kennedys."
_	Direct voice communication is the claim that spirits speak independently of the medium, who facilitates the phenomenon rather than produces it.
_	He suggests that this move was closely related to the claim that socialist society was naturally superior to the "bourgeois-landowning society", and further enhanced by several major cultural figures having refused to collaborate with the regime.
_	David Hume argued that the claim that a thing exists, when added to our notion of a thing, does not add anything to the concept.
_	For example, if we form a complete notion of Moses, and superadd to that notion the claim that Moses existed, we are not adding anything to the notion of Moses.
_	The claim that "na"-adjectives are inflectional rests on the claim that the syllable "da" 'is', usually regarded as a "copula verb", is really a suffix—an inflection.
_	Kenny is told to transfer to shop class by the teacher with the claim that home ec is not "right for him" and he will most likely not find a husband.
_	However, he rejected the claim that the world was unipolar: "There is now only one superpower.
_	Author Steve Budin, whose father was a New York bookie, has recently publicized the claim that the 1954 "Bedlam" game against rival OU was fixed by mobsters in his book "Bets, Drugs, and Rock & Roll" ().
_	Applied to the actual world (our world), statement 1 above is the claim that physicalism is true at the actual world if and only if at "every possible world" in which the physical properties and laws of the actual world are instantiated, the non-physical (in the ordinary sense of the word) properties of the actual world are instantiated as well.
_	Stiles' son, Grady Stiles III, disputes the claim that Teresa had him murdered.
_	The dictionary website Wordku.com voluntarily took its site down with the claim that this was because of the “Chinese Internet Maintenance Day.”
_	Later work has not substantiated the claim that this was a pure solid compound.
_	The detail of the rivers position on the chart, backs up the claim that Willems River is the Ashburton River, which, being at 21 degrees 40 minutes south and 114 degrees 56 east, is almost exactly the latitude shown on the chart and discussed in other writing.
_	In 1980 or 81, a couple arrived on Agho Island with the claim that the island has been given to them by then-president Ferdinand Marcos.
_	At issue was the claim that several players on the 1950 national team, who played their club hockey with LTC Praha, had discussed defecting in Davos in 1948—though only Miroslav Sláma, two other players and one of the heads of the delegation had actually defected at that Spengler Cup tournament.
_	Joynson-Hicks' 1933 biographer wrote that the claim that Joynson-Hicks' parliamentary pledge to Lady Astor in 1925 had committed the party to giving votes to young women was an invention of Winston Churchill that has entered popular mythology but has no basis in fact.
_	Appellee filed suit upon the claim that the discharge procedures authorized by the Act had denied him and others due process of law.
_	Sharkey Ward dismissed the claim that the raids led to fear of attacks on the mainland as mere propaganda:
_	The Riemann hypothesis is equivalent to the claim that this expression is valid when the real part of is greater than .
_	It found no information to support the claim that the agency interfered with law enforcement actions against Ross, Blandón or Meneses.
_	This sentiment was prevalent among the rally participants who opposed Hezbollah's refusal to disarm based on the claim that Lebanese and Syrian interests are linked.
_	It is believed by some that in order to avoid a lawsuit, Reagan changed his story to the claim that Quodoushka is a blend of many ancient sexual traditions.
_	It gives "Tanzanian customs officials" as its sole source for the claim that the uranium was destined for processing in the former Soviet republic of Kazakhstan via the Iranian port of Bandar Abbas.
_	In response to critical reviews of this work, and the claim that psychoanalysis is given too much prominence, Parker responds by arguing that the notion of the 'discursive complex' can be extended to study behavioural or cognitive notions conveyed in language and experienced by users.
_	Antonescu ended his letter with the claim that Russian Jewish commissars had savagely tortured Romanian POWs and that the entire Jewish community of Romania, Filderman included were morally responsible for all of the losses and sufferings of the Romanians around Odessa.
_	The terminological distinction was made in order to stress the difference between the claim that universal mental acts correspond with universal intentional objects and the perspective that dismissed the existence of universals outside the mind.
_	However, Horatio Bottomley, a Liberal MP began to publicly criticise Ranjitsinhji in his magazine "John Bull" in October and November, drawing attention to his debts, the court cases and the claim that he was exempt from the law.
_	The show also features such regular elements as "Spot the Not," a weekly trivia segment in which viewers are challenged to pick the claim that is not real and a special "Ripley's Record" commemoration for people who break a world record while appearing on the show.
_	In August, Princess Cruises responded with the claim that "Star Princess" and "Fifty Cent" were never within sight of one another and thus the accusations were the result of mistaken identity.
_	The annulment was justified by the claim that Blanche's mother was Charles's godmother, although probably the real reason was Blanche's pregnancy during her imprisonment.
_	It tries to square the circle between the common criticism that the EU is undemocratic (the "democratic deficit" thesis) and the claim that there is no European demos (the "no demos thesis"), purporting that a demos is not a "sine qua non" for democracy and multiple separate demoi can effectively control the government and in that sense exercise popular sovereignty.
_	His emphasis on power over nature contributed to the rise of an understanding of nature as mechanism and the claim that true knowledge of nature is that expressed by mechanical laws.
_	He called the claim that she was a feral child "almost certainly nonsense", stated that "beyond the family's ardent claims to recognise her, there is no evidence that she is the missing girl", and thought it more likely that she was "a girl brought up in captivity, who somehow escaped, and then found her way to a father who desperately wanted to recover something he had loved and lost."
_	In a 2001 interview with columnist Deb Price, Ford disputed the claim that Sipple was treated differently because of his sexual orientation, saying,
_	This move illustrates what Royce calls his “absolute pragmatism”, the claim that ideals are thoroughly practical—the more inclusive being more practical.
_	According to von Seyfried's article on the Mass in G major, K. Anh. 232, which is cited by the writer of the music column in "The Australasian", Zulehner offered the mass for sale with the claim that it was a "Coronation Mass" by Mozart, but that it was specifically rejected because the prospective purchaser recognised the material used in the setting as coming from "Così fan tutte".
_	While many have attempted to discredit the claim that Pauli was a lecturer in Hebrew at Oxford University, research demonstrates that he was.
_	The second video also included the claim that money had been stolen from a donation box in the Gurdwara during a period when the Baaj Group was in control.
_	Deacon makes the claim that just as the concept of zero revolutionized mathematics, thinking about life, mind, and other ententional phenomena in terms of constraints (i.e. what is absent) can similarly help us overcome the artificial dichotomy of the mind body problem.
_	This is based on the claim that the earliest soap made in Europe was shortly after the Crusades, but soap was known to the Romans in the first century AD and Zosimos of Panopolis described soap and soapmaking in ca. 300 AD.
_	Carr ended his leader with the claim that "What Marshal Stalin desires to see in Warsaw is not a puppet government acting under Russian orders, but a friendly government which, fully conscious of the supreme importance of Russo-Polish concord, will frame its independent policies in that context."
_	Mill rescued the claim that there cannot be a simultaneous glut of all commodities by including money as one of the commodities.
_	After Hemme Faulson returns she initiates a long, successful affair to retrieve her sister Blaisine from the convent as well as much of its possessions under the claim that they belonged to Blaisine.
_	In "The Institutes of Biblical Law", he uses the 1967 work "Judaism and the Vatican" by Léon de Poncins as a source for Paul Rassinier's figure of 1.2 million Jewish deaths during the Holocaust, and the claim that Raul Hilberg calculated the number at 896,292, and further asserts that very many of these died of epidemics.
_	The German Admiralty's report of the battle on 1 June included the claim that "Acasta" had been destroyed.
_	The centralization of Iglesias Pantín's role and the claim that the American invasion ignited the organization of the working class would remain the predominant posture among local historians until the 1970s, when institutions like the Centro de Estudios de la Realidad Puertorriqueña (CEREP) and individuals like Amílcar Tirado Avilés established that there already were stages of proto-organization prior to it.
_	A more recent adaptation of Warhol's quip, possibly prompted by the rise of online social networking, blogging, and similar online phenomena, is the claim that "In the future, everyone will be famous to fifteen people" or, in some renditions, "On the Web, everyone will be famous to fifteen people".
_	On June 5 he refused the government's request to dismiss the case, finding that there are sufficient grounds to proceed with the claim that the policy violates plaintiffs’ "constitutional right to family integrity".
_	Studies by some historians, such as Russian military historian Mikhail Meltyukhov ("Stalin's Missed Chance"), nevertheless gave partial support to the claim that Soviet forces were concentrating to attack Germany.
_	It was first developed by Jim Coan, an undergraduate student of psychologist Elizabeth Loftus as support for the claim that it is possible to implant entirely false memories in people.
_	The tailor stuck his legs out the window and threatened the bear with the claim that they were a vise.
_	Proponents dispute the claim that the cost would be too high and say the presented cost estimates were highly exaggerated.
_	Charteris may have concocted the claim that he invented it in order to impress his audience, not realizing a reporter was present.
_	At the same time, the Drug Enforcement Administration were facing budget crises and possible dissolution and the film makes the claim that they used Platshorn and Meinster as their targets to justify their continued existence.
_	Polanyi advocates emergence i.e. the claim that there are several levels of reality and of causality.
_	The period from 1993 to 1994 is supposed to have been an era of unprecedented growth and success of the game in South Africa attributed mostly to the South African televising of the ARL despite the claim that the weekly half-hour highlights package was used more as a "filler" than as a program designed to attract significant viewers.
_	In addition, Crosley claimed that at one time he was slotted to be a driver in the Indianapolis 500, but the claim that was not entirely accurate.
_	The letter further denied the claim that those who incited the riot were associated with the NSWCA and accused Harris of inflammatory conduct during the disorder.
_	Along with many politicians of his day, Parkes avoided the claim that the Chinese and other Asians should be excluded because they were an "inferior" race.
_	The King's argument centred on the claim that the property in question was acquired by his predecessors legally and was therefore subject to regular personal inheritance.
_	The eyewitnesses were misled into accepting the text of the Mecklenburg Declaration as authentic because it had been published in 1819 with the claim that it was a true copy of the original resolutions.
_	Churchill was sceptical of the claim that Marlborough had at 17 or 18 years of age became the lover of the King's mistress but accepted that he did so somewhat later, at 20.
_	Gordievsky noted that the KGB were puzzled by and denied the claim that Director General of MI5 Roger Hollis was a Soviet agent.
_	According to these scholars, the claim that Samudragupta released these kings is an attempt by Samudragupta's courtier to cover up the emperor's failure.
_	This course, "How to Ask a Question", was based on the claim that “Each of man's advances was started by a question….
_	Hume's lack of concern might be explained by the fact that, although it contradicts the claim that all simple ideas are preceded by simple impressions, this is not a problem because it is not Hume’s primary concern.
_	He retorted with the claim that had it not been for Southern Command's hesitation, he could have encircled Ismailia by now.
_	The identity of its original author has been disputed, but is assigned as William Winstanley by Sidney Lee, in the "Dictionary of National Biography", who dismisses the claim that Robert Herrick wrote it.
_	His edition of Shakespeare, in 1785, was advertised with the claim that he "ventured to depart from the common mode by rejecting the long 'ſ' in favor of the round one, as being less liable to error..."
_	Snopes found the claim that there are substances in Carmex that are irritants necessitating reapplication, such as ground glass, to be false.
_	A third term, the diers, is used by some terminally ill patients who reject the claim that dying is part of survivorship or should be covered up with inappropriately optimistic language.
_	Koryun was the origin of the claim that the Georgian alphabet was created by Mesrob Mashtots .
_	Thus, according to Ross, the claim that something is good is true if that thing really is good.
_	Avery, in their biography, , make the claim that Emma witnessed several marriages of Joseph Smith to plural wives.
_	First, the claim that it assesses implicit learning as the reward/punishment design is inconsistent with data showing accurate knowledge of the task possibilities and that mechanisms such as working-memory appear to have a strong influence.
_	Second, the claim that this knowledge occurs through preventive marker signals is not supported by competing explanations of the psychophysiology generated profile.
_	Lastly, the claim that the impairment is due to a 'myopia for the future' is undermined by more plausible psychological mechanisms explaining deficits on the tasks such as reversal learning, risk-taking, and working-memory deficits.
_	Other contributors to the debate of techniques used by artists included on 8 March 2012 Tim's Vermeer, documentary film "Jan Vermeer and the Camera Obscura" which made the claim that a newly invented instrument, probably unknown to Vermeer1632 – 1675 in the Music Lesson 1664, thus disproving conclusively the previously thought idea that he used the camera obscura technique in this and other work.
_	Chomsky has dismissed 9/11 conspiracy theories, stating that there is no credible evidence to support the claim that the United States government was responsible for the attacks.
_	Thermoeconomics is based on the claim that human economic processes are governed by the second law of thermodynamics.
_	Charleston citizens accepted the claim that a slave rebellion was to begin at the stroke of midnight on June 16, 1822, and to erupt the following day; the shooting in 2015 occurred on the 193rd anniversary of the thwarted uprising.
_	Syrian president Bashar al-Assad has said that her account was "propaganda", referring to the claim that the account is being used to propagate and legitimise the use of military force by the United States, a claim which was echoed by users on Twitter.
_	Screw, however, repeatedly denounced the claim that one has to use purple drank to enjoy screwed and chopped music.
_	Archaeological evidence, such as the imprinted clay seals and inscribed jars, appear to support the claim that Peribsen ruled only in Upper Egypt.
_	Physician Edward R. Friedlander, who investigated Simonton's techniques in depth, noted that although some patients found his approach helpful, his case histories are "very poor evidence" for the claim that his treatment controls tumours.
_	"On their website, they make the claim that they sent in a white paper.
_	He rejected the claim that the anti-semitic movement had grown from the ranks of craftsmen, workers, and businessmen:
_	Politifact has labeled as false the claim that Brown cast the deciding vote for the act.
_	A review published in "The Bulletin of the Center for Children's Books" makes the claim that Gregor's "evolution from a scared, unwilling combatant in the first book to a morally responsible, talented warrior ... here ... makes his character realistic and appealing", and thus that the increased violence in "Gregor and the Curse of the Warmbloods" is a necessary part of his character development.
_	Joan is most notable for the claim that miracles have allegedly taken place at her grave, and for the multiple references to her in literature.
_	The sponsors of these laws argue that "parental delinquency" is usually the cause of the "juvenile delinquency", but opponents argue that there is little evidence to support the claim that youth crime is caused by “bad parenting” and that there are many other social, cultural and economic causes that should be addressed.
_	Second, the court accepted the defendant's argument that uses could be fair, but rejected the claim that this particular use was fair.
_	He had lost his chance to take the court by surprise, so he fell back on his scheme to rouse the city of London in his favour with the claim that Elizabeth’s government had planned to murder him and had sold out England to Spain.
_	He also put forward the claim that German national savings in the years after the Treaty would be less than 2 billion marks: however in 1925 the German national savings figure was estimated at 6.4 billion marks and in 1927 7.6 billion marks.
_	Here the argument expresses the claim that the Mohawk nation has a more legitimate claim to distinct nationhood on the basis of traditional lands and a constitution predating confederation (and the creation of Quebec and a Québécois identity) and thus should be afforded the right of self-determination.
_	The adjudicator found no merit in the claim that the image would make it "acceptable for others to express hatred and contempt for Hindus".
_	The owners were Colombo Hotels Company Ltd, who advertised it to potential customers with the claim that it was "the only fully European owned and fully equipped hotel in the East" and "managed by experienced Europeans".
_	The MDC's Nelson Chamisa said that the claim that the MDC had worked with electoral officials to rig the election was "ridiculously impossible" and alleged that ZANU-PF was seeking to distract people from the fact that results had still not been released.
_	As for Robot 08, the previously classified documents provide no support for the claim that something other than aerial bombs would have been prioritized.
_	However, the Florida Farm Bureau explicitly denied the claim that any farms went out of business as a result of the 2002 ballot measure in that state.
_	Nonetheless, data from VAERS has been used in vaccine litigation to support the claim that vaccines cause autism.
_	Addressing the claim that the fossil was "the missing link between ape and human", Arthur Keith stated in a letter to "Nature" that
_	The motivation to start Socarxiv, an open-access preprint server for social science research, is the claim that valuable research being published in traditional venues often times takes several months to years to get published, which slows down the process of science significantly.
_	In April 2014 the project was challenged in the Supreme Court of Victoria, with the claim that the government had made "misleading representations" about the project's benefits.
_	Levy criticizes the claim that the Protocols had a large effect on Hitler's thinking, writing that it is based mostly on suspect testimony and lacks hard evidence.
_	He aims to prove the claim that culture and power are essentially antagonistic concepts.
_	During this period, Sondhi made several controversial comments on Muangthai Raisabdah, including the claim that a team of assassins was following him around, the claim that the Thai Rak Thai party was affiliated to the Chinese Communist Party, the claim that there was corruption in the Thai Air Force's purchase of Russian-made SU-30 MK jet fighters, and the claim (repeated from a 1997 government censor debate) that Thaksin profited from insider information during the 1997 devaluation of the Baht.
_	In the 2011 publication entitled "Campus Confidential", Coates along with his co-author Bill Morrison argue that there is no evidence for the claim that "a highly educated workforce is crucial to national success," and therefore question why "[c]ountries are racing to educate their youth."
_	Outside of the stick-fighting schools, the claim that Musashi was ever defeated by Gonnosuke is denied, particularly by sword fighting schools who maintain Musashi was never defeated in a duel.
_	The legislation created, the "Great Lakes Basin and the Great Lakes Water Quality Agreement of 1978", was based on the claim that "no park is an island", with the purpose to show how strict protection of the area is not the best method for preservation.
_	Although in the morning following his wedding, Arthur had claimed that he was thirsty ""for I have been in the midst of Spain last night"" and that ""having a wife is a good pastime"", these claims are generally dismissed by modern historians as mere boasts of a boy who did not want others to know of his failure, and Catherine maintained the claim that she had married Henry while still a virgin until the day she died.
_	After Henry's constant support of the claim that Catherine's first marriage had been consummated, an annulment was issued on 23 April 1533, while the King had already married Anne on 25 January.
_	Youth Literature scholars, notably Professor Emeritus Kay E. Vandergrift, Rutgers, Department of Library and Information Science, have contested the claim that the story is factual, referring to it as "historical fiction for children".
_	"The Economist" stated the narratives "illuminate nothing interesting, settling instead on the claim that everyone enjoys inflicting cruelty, given the chance"; similarly, a "Variety" review complained that the episode "hinges on people repeatedly choosing to be stupid and/or evil".
_	However, David Mikkelson of Snopes.com denies the claim that the Williamsons invented the recipe, as Mr. George Williamson was head of the Williamson Candy Company, producers of the Oh Henry! bar.
_	Central to the argument is the claim that, within a given business cycle, the accumulation of surplus from year to year leads to a kind of top-heaviness, in which a relatively fixed number of workers have to add profit to an ever-larger lump of investment capital.
_	To the latter was added the claim that he had drawn a gun in the presence of the RAF officer, and stated that "people like you ought to be shot".
_	In providing documented reports of various quandaries (ranging from embarrassment to injury and death) this site makes the claim that critical thinking is a vital skill to be used in everyday life.
_	On 29 May 2003, BBC defence correspondent Andrew Gilligan filed a report for BBC Radio 4's "Today" programme in which he stated that an unnamed source – a senior British official – had told him that the September Dossier had been "sexed up", and that the intelligence agencies were concerned about some "dubious" information contained within it – specifically the claim that Saddam Hussein could deploy weapons of mass destruction within 45 minutes of an order to use them.
_	Royal jelly is collected and sold as a dietary supplement for humans, but the European Food Safety Authority has concluded that the current evidence does not support the claim that consuming royal jelly will give health benefits in humans.
_	Jones argued that the struggle sessions after the 1959 Tibetan uprising may be considered genocide, based on the claim that the conflict resulted in 92,000 deaths.
_	They also challenged the claim that the cereal could contain "shredded bites," and responded that iron powder is suitable for human consumption.
_	The victim denied the claim that the heckling was directed at the chef's family.
_	There is no reliable evidence to support the claim that he was working on it while watching British troops embarking for France.
_	Tunggolou further claimed that some people have theorised that the term originates from the word ‘kakadazan’ (towns) or ‘kedai’ (shops), and from the claim that Kadazan politicians such as the late Datuk Peter J. Mojuntin coined the term.
_	However, she soon gives him in to the police, with the claim that he murdered Alex.
_	A spokesperson for the Pistorius family has denied the claim that Pistorius took acting lessons.
_	His office responded with the claim that it was not copied but similar to Blair's speech, and that this were only a few phrases often used for such occasions.
_	In response to the claim that the atomic bombing of Nagasaki was unnecessary, Maddox wrote:
_	With the emergence of consumerism, businesses and government had an increasing need for labour; although work became a route to emancipation for women, they were often restricted to clerical work as secretaries or sales staff, where they were generally paid 10 to 20% less than male employees, under various pretexts, such as the claim that their understanding of domestic tasks freed them from certain household expenses.
_	This supports the claim that the place was his father's hometown.
_	He also investigated the explanatory power of idiosyncratic volatility and responded to the claim that multifactor model findings can be explained by the turn of the year effect.
_	He rejected the claim that the multifactor model findings could be explained by the turn of the year effect.
_	Special exception is taken to the claim that many of Custer's men committed suicide when defeat seemed inevitable.
_	In that month, Romandale Farms filed a lawsuit against the city with three options, based on the claim that it is still owned by developer Helen Barber-Roman who had donated it.
_	DoD General Counsel Judith A. Miller initially blocked the award in 1998 based on the claim that "circumstances do not appear to meet the criteria established by Congress for award of the Prisoner of War Medal."
_	The tirade included various racial slurs (both Cheeks and Miles are African American), as well as the claim that Cheeks was a lame-duck coach and thus Miles had no reason to listen to him.
_	the same as free will, but is only the claim that mental states are causally relevant.
_	cited John Whitmore and challenged the claim that "Ngô " referred to Ming dynasty China but instead referred to the Chinese settled Red River Delta area of Vietnam.
_	According to Krugman, the same was true in the 1930s, and the claim that the Federal Reserve could have prevented the Great Depression is highly dubious.
_	Goesaert et al. once again presented their arguments against the law by focusing on the claim that Michigan could not restrict females from being barmaids and at the same time make an exception, in favor of the wives and daughters of the owners of liquor establishments.
_	Scholars have also corroborated the claim that U.S. Embassy officials provided lists of communists to Suharto's forces, who, according to Mark Aarons, "ensured that those so named were eliminated in the mass killing operations."
_	A corrected measurement was made in 1987, but by that point the claim that K2 was the tallest mountain in the world had already made it into many news reports and reference works.
_	It has also been suggested that it is better to begin by understanding some of the following articles written by S.N. Balagangadhara, as they provide independent arguments and epistemic warrants to the claim that Indian traditions are not religions: "How to Speak for the Indian Traditions: An Agenda for the Future" (2005); "The Secular State and Religious Conflict: Liberal Neutrality and the Indian Case of Pluralism" (2007); "Spirituality in Management Theories: A Perspective from India" (2010).
_	Spencer and Douglas circulated the claim that Lord Kitchener had been murdered by Jews to prolong the war and that Jewish businessman Ernest Cassel had conspired with Winston Churchill to circulate false information about the Battle of Jutland in order to make money by stock speculations.
_	The music video's plot supports the claim that the track is about childhood abuse and domestic violence.
_	He also appeared in a June 2008 MoveOn.org advertisement, where he made the claim that George W. Bush and John McCain have the same governing priorities.
_	The notion of the absurd in existentialism contrasts with the claim that "bad things don't happen to good people"; to the world, metaphorically speaking, there is no such thing as a good person or a bad person; what happens happens, and it may just as well happen to a "good" person as to a "bad" person.
_	The evidence does not support the claim that Hastings invaded Nepal only for commercial reasons.
_	The historian Geoffrey Barrow believed this to mark the beginning of Scottish control over all the lands between the River Tweed and Firth of Forth (defining "Lothian" in this manner), though another historian, Alex Woolf, has suggested that the part about Lothian may have been fabricated later to give credence to the claim that the Scottish kings owed homage for lands in Lothian.
_	The belief that the Qur'an was created rather than eternal was championed by the Mu'tazilites and opposed by textualists such as Ahmad bin Hanbal, thus negating the claim that Balluti could have been the former rather than the latter.
_	At least one family researcher has made the claim that Charles F. Coghlan was the illegitimate son of Rose Coghlan and her one-time lover the future King Edward VII of England.
_	Hull himself states the goal was legal, supporting the claim that the NHL had altered the rules in a private memo sent to all teams but not released to the public.
_	Trevor-Roper noted the contradiction in Irving's argument, based on the assumption that it was Hitler who ordered Himmler to spare the people aboard that train and the claim that Hitler was unaware in the fall of 1941 that the SS were rounding up German and Czech Jews to be sent to be shot in Eastern Europe (the first gassings via gas vans started on 8 December 1941).
_	In 2008, Fisher, as reported by "Rolling Stone" magazine, accused former protege Gerard Way, an American musician and comic book writer, of promoting the claim that Way's Umbrella Academy release by Dark Horse was his first foray into comic book writing.
_	Walter Kaufmann has described an argument originally put forward by Georg Simmel, which rebuts the claim that a finite number of states must repeat within an infinite amount of time:
_	Though the claim that he is the originator of the shaka sign is debatable, he is credited with increasing its popularity and of Hawaiian Pidgin as well.
_	The mystery surrounding the disappearance of these children has led to the claim that while many children were recorded as having died, in fact they were either kidnapped or were adopted by rich Ashkenazi Jews in Israel or abroad.
_	This extends as far as the claim that practitioners used enormous canvases, of many meters in surface area, to give importance to something which didn't have any.
_	On March 30, 2007, the judge dismissed some of the plaintiff's claims from the suit, including the claim that the law represented cruel and unusual punishment; the rest of the case will go forward.
_	Beginning from the claim that, “in electoral politics, you can’t beat something with nothing”, Shapiro spelled out an approach to foreign affairs in the post 9/11 age based on an adaptation of George Kennan’s cold-war containment strategy.
_	In June 2016, Timothy Healy, the former director of the FBI Terrorist Screening Center, disputed the claim that Kennedy had ever appeared on the list, saying that another person with a similar name—who had accidentally tried to bring ammunition on to a plane—was placed on an airline's watch list and Kennedy was mistakenly detained by the airline, not based on the No Fly List.
_	In one such instance, Cioculescu dismissed the claim that Arghezi's "Inscripție pe un portret" ("Inscription on a Portrait") was riddled with obscure meanings, by offering his interpretation and presenting the issue as soliciting one's perspicacity.
_	Later, Bunting refutes the claim that there were no bagpipes in Ireland, using as proof three depictions: two of a bagpiper going into battle and another of a pig playing a bagpipe.
_	However recent publications contradict the claim that the painting is of de Kooning but is actually a portrait of a Swedish carpenter Gorky called Master Bill who did some work for him in exchange for Gorky giving him art lessons.
_	The South Ossetian officials confirmed their troops were responsible for the attack, but rejected the claim that the aircraft was targeted because of prior intelligence that Okruashvili was on board.
_	This included the claim that it was behind the French Revolution.
_	Operation INFEKTION was a worldwide Soviet active measures operation to spread the claim that the United States had created HIV/AIDS.
_	But in rejecting the claim that the regulation was violative of social justice, Laurel would respond with what would become his most famous aphorism, which is to this day widely quoted by judges and memorized by Filipino law students:
_	Chief among her allegations is the claim that officers in the Missing Women's Task Force neglected their duties and tolerated a three-year delay in apprehending serial killer Robert Pickton.
_	These results may provide the mechanistic explanation for the claim that antibiotics can lead to obesity in humans.
_	The richer provinces often favour freezing transfer payments, or rebalancing the system in their favour, based on the claim that they already pay more in taxes than they receive in federal government services, and the poorer provinces often favour an increase on the basis that the amount of money they receive is not sufficient for their existing needs.
_	Its continued use has also been defended by the claim that it is what undergraduate students expect and that it mirrors what they will have been taught at school.
_	He is alleged to have referred to Judaism as a "dirty religion" and to have called Adolf Hitler a "very great man"; Farrakhan denied these claims but a tape obtained by "The New York Times" supports the claim that he did and that he praised Hitler.
_	Guy and Raynald also harassed Muslim caravans and herders, and the claim that Raynald captured Saladin's sister is based on the account given in the "Old French Continuation of William of Tyre".
_	The University of London's claim is based on it being the third institute in England to receive a Royal Charter as a university and the claim that it was the third university in England to gain degree awarding powers.
_	It is opposed by the fact that dating by royal charter is not consistent with the historically-accepted dates of foundation for British universities and that possessing a Royal Charter is not necessary to be a university; by the fact that its royal charter was annulled by the death of William IV and the claim that the later date of December 1837, when it was rechartered by Queen Victoria, should therefore be used; and by the claim that the lack of teaching in the University of London prior to its reconstitution as a federal institution in 1900 meant it was not truly a university.
_	Sarpi’s writings do not support the claim that he was an atheist.
_	A 2012 fatal mass shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Connecticut, prompted numerous conspiracy theories, among which is the claim that it was a manufactured event with the aim of promoting gun control.
_	He considers relativism as the claim that truth, goodness, or beauty (among other values) is relative to some reference frame, and no absolute standards to adjudicate between reference frames exist.
_	According to George C. Papademetriou, the essence–energies distinction "is contrary to the Western confusion of the uncreated essence with the uncreated energies and this is by the claim that God is Actus Purus".
_	At the jury trial in 2002, SRF won the claim that Ananda violated SRF's copyrights to magazine articles written by Yogananda.
_	The graveyard in Kali is very old, despite the claim that Daulat Khan founded Kali in the middle of the 19th century, the graveyard includes tombs dating back about 600 years.
_	As with the original experiment, those who lasted the course broadly confirmed the claim that novices could become professional-level traders, making small profits or at least lower losses trading in very turbulent markets during the filming than professionals, who lost four times greater amounts over the same period.
_	While the allegations of viewing and duplication of pornography on legislative assembly video equipment would stand, the claim that an explicit film had actually been produced by civil servants in the assembly building was ultimately debunked.
_	The core belief of process philosophy is the claim that events and processes are the principal ontological categories.
_	In his eulogy at Robinson's funeral, Rev. Adam Clayton Powell argued against the claim that Robinson was an "Uncle Tom" figure, focusing on Robinson's ability as an entertainer and a person to transcend color lines.
_	Questioned by "The Australian", Baron Waqa, leader of the opposition, would neither confirm nor deny the claim that Getax had financed the opposition's campaign, but stated: "Getax has always helped Nauru.
_	Regarding the claim that Decca records released this disk on February 1, 1956 in both 45 and 78 formats, Billboard had already listed the song as debuting on 14 January 1956 on the Best Sellers in Stores chart at #25 and on the Top 100 at #56.
_	The basis for such status was the claim that Berwick had changed hands several times, was traditionally regarded as a special, separate entity, and some proclamations referred to "England, Scotland and the town of Berwick-upon-Tweed".
_	Elkins pointed out the 3rd century AD as the outside "terminus post quem" for the deposition of the statues, thereby disputing the claim that the bust was thrown away due to feared repercussions from Caesar's assassination in 44 BC.
_	For example, a common feminist critique of traditional object relations theories is the claim that such theories tend to "blame the mother" for a child's negative development.
_	Counsel for Mrs Sabherwal attacked the claim that the interest was overreached by arguing that the Trusts of Land and Appointment of Trustees Act 1996 altered the common law precedent, and by arguing that his client’s human rights (specifically the right to respect for one’s home in Article 8 of the European Convention on Human Rights) had been breached.
_	The expansion of competitions, the recognition of Pro Athletes and Semi-Pro Athletes, many highly viewed commercials, music videos, and media featuring Xpogo athletes, and consistent 97–99% positive viewer ratings on popular Xpogo videos such as Xpogo Films: RISE support the claim that the sport of Xpogo is growing in global popularity.
_	The second is an embellishment of a documented attack on a servant boy at 2 Turner Street on 25 February 1838, of which Haining makes the claim that the boy reported seeing an initial 'W' in gold filigree on the folds of his assailant's cloak.
_	Her argument is founded on the claim that, in feeling pain, we know the essence of the mental state of pain.
_	A frequent theme was the claim that Winston Churchill had advance knowledge of the Japanese plans to attack Pearl Harbor, and refused to warn the Americans, in order to bring the United States into World War II.
_	But few people took any of those claims seriously any more than they did the claim that Kambona himself was not a Tanzanian citizen but a Malawian, from Likoma Island, or a Mozambican.
_	As the new military and strategic route, the Via Amerina "became the communications core of Imperial Italy and the chief support to the claim that imperial Italy was still extant."
_	He also made the claim that there were two Dilmuns, one located on Bahrain and the original one in the Zagros mountains.
_	Some survivors were taken prisoner and placed into slavery under the claim that Georgia slaveowners had owned the ancestors of the prisoners.
_	There is very little about the area indexed at the Archives Office in Tasmania, but what information there is supports the claim that the Ravenswood district took its name from the property owned by David McGown on Distillery Creek.
_	Critics of the tort reform movement dispute the claim that the current tort system has a significant impact on national or global economies.
_	Politifact has rated the claim that "there comes a point in the last year of the president, especially in their second term, where [the president] stop[s] nominating" both Supreme Court justices and Court of Appeals judges as "false."
_	The Declaration also included the claim that the 'exploitation of the Third World is qualitatively similar to, and caused by, the same politio-economic factors which are the basis of poverty in Britain'.
_	Bury's lecture continues by defending the claim that history is not literature, which in turns questions the need for a historian's narrative in the discussion of historical facts and essentially evokes the question: is a narrative necessary?
_	The publisher makes the claim that these are the stories that "started it all", but Pournelle himself considers it a separate "no FTL" universe.
_	The Billingses issued a paper refuting the claim that the CrMS represents a standardization of the BOM.
_	The BRC noted that Glitter had stated his position as unfairly being denied an opportunity to refute the claim that he "was a child rapist"; however, they "did not consider that this was a fair interpretation" of Channel 4's intent, which "focused on the effect of the programme on viewer's perceptions of Mr Gadd."
_	Sports historian Gillian Hibbins, who researched the origins of Australian rules football for the Australian Football League's official account of the game's history as part of its 150th anniversary celebrations sternly rejects the theory, stating that while Marn Grook was "definitely" played around Port Fairy and throughout the Melbourne area, there is no evidence that the game was played north of the Grampians or by the Djabwurrung people and the claim that Wills observed and possibly played the game is improbable:
_	As Henry Louis Gates, Jr, has said, "it is fair to describe the subtext of the history of black letters as this urge to refute the claim that because blacks had no written traditions they were bearers of an inferior culture."
_	Today, none of the governments involved (North Korea, South Korea, People's Republic of China, or Japan) make the claim that Gando is Korean territory.
_	It has always been insisted upon by her grandmother that Red wear the cloak at all times, with the claim that its red color repels wolves.
_	He dismisses the claim that Cristóvão de Mendonça sailed down the east coast of Australia as sheer speculation, based on voyages about which no details have survived.
_	A Toronto civic affairs bulletin entitled "Urban Open Space: Luxury or Necessity" makes the claim that "popular awareness of the balance of nature, of natural processes and of man’s place in and effect on nature – i.e., "ecological awareness" – is important.
_	Sweeney's agent denied the claim that Bonds had gotten such a substance from Sweeney.
_	Sophie Piccard also published early research on these sets, in 1939, stating as a theorem the claim that two Golomb rulers with the same distance set must be congruent.
_	Kagyu and Sakya scholars have argued against the claim that students using Svatantrika do not achieve the same realization as those using the Prasangika approach.
_	Chang attacks are "straw-men", such as the claim that we do not have a free market due to the restriction of slavery, which Hannam criticises as a misrepresentation of capitalist claims because very few capitalists argue for a completely free market.
_	The victim was charged for elaborate and unnecessary computer security services, including the claim that a member of the Indian military had been sent to Honduras to investigate the source of the virus.
_	In June 2007, the Business Standard reported that the "global terror group Lashkar-e-Taiyba" had apologised to Indian muslims on 2 May 2007 on the Jamaat-ud-Dawah's website "for causing them problems due to an inadvertent mistake", with the article implying that mistake in question was the claim that "Ishrat Jehan Reza had been a Lashkar operative".
_	Verhagen supports this,with the claim that an age restriction of a certain number of years is arbitrary in nature, and that "self-determination knows no age limit."
_	In a review of the history of the Moberly-Jourdain adventure and the extensive public reaction to it, Terry Castle noted with skepticism the claim that a shared delusion may have arisen out of a lesbian folie à deux between the two women.
_	No shred of evidence was ever put forward to support the claim that Salengro's service during the war had been anything other than honourable.
_	His complaint raised five causes of action, including the claim that the prosecutor and the inspectors had engineered his criminal prosecution in retaliation for criticism of the Postal Service, thus violating the First Amendment.
_	Orne testified as a defense witness during the Patty Hearst trial in 1976; His testimony made the claim that Hearst feared for her life and followed the Symbionese Liberation Army's orders.
_	His obituary was published in "The Times", and contained the claim that he had scored the winning goal in the 1872 Cup final.
_	This negates the claim that the genus coua has no morphological specialization, instead indicating distinctive morphological differences that warrant further studies for species change (Moreau 1966).
_	The majority of scholars reject both this claim and the claim that Josephus borrowed from Acts, arguing instead that Luke and Josephus drew on common traditions and historical sources.
_	According to historians at Monticello, no documents support the claim that Woodson was Hemings' first child, as he appeared to have been born before any known child of hers.
_	Sergio Marchionne responded, saying that the claim that production of Jeeps would be transferred from the U.S. to China, leaving U.S. factories idle, was completely false.
_	As an illustration, she contrasts the Babylonian and Greek "rhetoric" used to back up the claim that the square on the long side of every right angle triangle has the same area as the sum of squares on the other two sides:
_	Based on US Air Force logs documenting activity at the airport, the Associated Press largely disproved the claim that the US held up aid in favor of military flights.
_	She also criticized his use of sociobiology to support the claim that men have a stronger sex drive than women, arguing that it depended on debatable assumptions about reproductive strategy.
_	Robert D. Blackwill countered the claim that the U.S.-Israel relationship significantly damages the relationship between the United States and the Arab world.
_	Pierre Le Pesant, sieur de Boisguilbert and Sébastien Le Prestre de Vauban also recommended a single tax, but unlike the physiocrats, they rejected the claim that land has certain economic properties which make it uniquely suitable for taxation, so they instead proposed a flat tax on all incomes.
_	"Like other purists, Hatzidakis rejected the claim that there was a common spoken language, arguing that spoken Greek was fragmented into dialects and therefore unsuitable for written communication."
_	In his 1998 book "Cult Fictions," Shamdasani disputed the attribution and interpretation of a central item of documentary evidence adduced by Noll, and also challenged the claim that Jung established a 'cult'.
_	The parties also cross-moved for summary judgment on the claim that LimeWire was secondarily liable for contributory copyright infringement because it materially contributed to the infringement committed by users.
_	Ponnambalam's 1939 speech in Nawalapitiya, attacking the claim that Sri Lanka is a Sinhalese, Buddhist nation was seen as an act against the notion of creating a Buddhist only nation.
_	Hitchens writes "the biggest fake miracle staged in human history was the claim that the Soviet Union was a new civilisation of equality, peace, love, truth, science and progress.
_	Not outdone, Ammaiyappan quickly accepts with the claim that his son is similarly respectful of his wishes.
_	In his "Title Royal" of 1580, he invented the claim that Madog ab Owain Gwynedd had discovered America, with the intention of ensuring that England's claim to the New World was stronger than that of Spain.
_	Palmer begins by defending the claim that animals have moral standing, and then surveys three key approaches to animal ethics; utilitarian approaches, animal rights approaches, and capabilities approaches.
_	Bass voted once in a way that led to the claim that she favors the continuation of militarized local police forces, when in 2014 she voted against the Rep. Alan Grayson (D-FL) amendment that would have halted the Pentagon's 1033 program.
_	In addition, Elliott questioned the claim that while Chinese society was traumatized by the Western victories, as many Chinese peasants (90% of the population at that time) living outside the concessions continued about their daily lives, uninterrupted and without any feeling of "humiliation".
_	However, as market trade has increased, support for Kim Jong-un among the people has not notably weakened, which casts into doubt the claim that market reforms would dwindle support for the regime.
_	When he died in 1816 he was buried in the local Haverhill cemetery under the name of Philip McIntosh by mistake, with the claim that he led the Boston Tea Party in 1773 (something he claimed in his old age to have participated in, though there is no proof of this).
_	The more popular and perhaps more plausible version is the claim that Libon originated from the Bicol term "libong" or "ribong", and there is a story which seems to support this view.
_	Korean nationalist historians advanced a "sprouts" theory as a counter to the claim that Korean industrialization was the "offspring" of Japanese industrialization.
_	The three officers admitted to Nazi Party membership, and used as their defence the claim that the Nazi Party membership should not be forbidden to "Reichswehr" personnel.
_	As for the claim that they lacked "business knowledge this does them an injustice.
_	On 1 May 1338 it was given to Baldwin at greatly reduced farm, on the claim that the previous regime had run the property down, and under guarantees of good conduct from Roger Northburgh, the Bishop of Coventry and Lichfield.
_	Jefferson made it impossible for Livingston to secure his property title, since by asserting the claim that such battures were the property of the Federal government, Livingston's title obtained from the Territorial Court was invalid.
_	Natives who do not need to pay taxes cannot vote, guardianship: the claim that Native Americans were incompetent and "wards of the state", and on the lack of ability to read English.
_	Liam Fox has rebutted the claim that Scotland would hold a second referendum, saying that if Scotland votes to Remain in the EU, but any combination England, Wales, Northern Ireland, Cornwall and Gibraltar vote to Leave, that would not trigger an independence referendum in England or anywhere else.
_	A number of other scholars also support the claim that the racialized version of the Curse of Ham was devised at that time because it suited ideological and economical interests of the European elite and slave traders who wanted to justify exploitation of African labour.
_	Though unconfirmed by independent journalists or academic researchers, some people address the facts of his father James' unusual position of authority for an African American, as well as the claim that James was present at the Gettysburg Address in 1863, as evidence that George Johnson was truly the grandson of the 17th President, which meant that he was of mixed Caucasian and African American ancestry.
_	The heavy use of spices has been popular as an argument to support the claim that spices were employed to disguise the flavor of spoiled meat, a conclusion without support in historical fact and contemporary sources.
_	However, the group's label did release other seven-inch "double pack" versions of some of the group's future singles in exactly the same format which lends some credibility to the claim that the item was "in the works".
_	She is the author of books such as "Psychodermatology", "Becoming a Therapist", "Psychological Approaches to Dermatology", the popular psychology books "The Man Manual" and "What Men Say what Women Hear", which make the claim that there are inherent gender differences in relationships, and "Mirror Mirror: Dr. Linda's Body Image Revolution", a book on using cognitive behavioural therapy to promote a healthy body image.
_	While the computer metaphor draws an analogy between the mind as software and the brain as hardware, CTM is the claim that the mind is a computational system.
_	After John of Damascus the claim that Luke gives Mary's genealogy is mentioned in a single extant Western medieval text, in which pseudo-Hilary cites it as an opinion held by many, though not himself.
_	A 2011 review commissioned by the Queensland Government found little evidence to support the claim that mandatory helmet usage discouraged bike riding.
_	Four pan-blue legislators attempted to enter the Hsieh election headquarters without permission, with the reason that they were there to investigate the claim that the government provided them office space for free.
_	Later, Allchin re-ran the demonstration and provided a new videotape, but in so doing Microsoft dropped the claim that Windows is slowed down when Internet Explorer is removed.
_	Qiu Zhanxiang, a global expert in mammalian craniums, also supported the claim that the skull was forged.
_	Local people went along with the claim that he had committed suicide, from guilt of the crimes.
_	This supports the claim that the brain utilizes multiple parts when trying to accurately identify an object.
_	Mark Franklin, director of Public Relations at Nintendo, made the claim that "Dragon Quest VI: Realms of Revelation" “will give fans unique access to a classic game in the series for the first time” outside Japan.
_	The finding has also debunked the claim that demat is sacrosanct though the depository participation did not have any role in the manipulation, the demat procedure was misused.
_	After some preliminary meetings, their case was heard in Bristol Crown Court by Justice Grigson, with the defence resting on the claim that the war was illegal, making their actions a justifiable attempt to prevent war crimes.
_	Westbrook was checked into rehab and, six months later, she appeared on the Channel 4 show "The Priory" with the claim that she was clean and had been free from drugs for months.
_	This is the basis of the claim that Gleed was the fastest RAF pilot to make ace, in only two days.
_	Bolt then challenged Manne to produce ten cases in which the evidence justified the claim that children were "stolen" as opposed to having been removed for reasons such as neglect, abuse, abandonment, etc.
_	He argued that Manne did not respond and that this was an indication of unreliability of the claim that there was policy of systematic removal.
_	Chapman defended the claim that under the section 8(3) of the Contractual Remedies Act, once a contract is cancelled, neither party is obliged to perform the contract any further.
_	The diet is based on the claim that grapefruit has a fat-burning enzyme or similar property.
_	In 2007, former Marlboro marketing executive John Hogan (whose company sponsored Pironi in his time as a Ferrari driver) disputed the claim that Pironi had gone back on a prior arrangement with Villeneuve.
_	This is refuted by the claim that it is both, his mother's husband was Stada but her lover was Pandera.
_	This is then refuted by the claim that the mother was named Miriam, the dresser of women's hair, but that she had gone astray from her husband (a Miriam the daughter of Bilgah, is mentioned elsewhere as having had an affair with a Roman soldier).
_	A 1998 systematic review of homeopathic "A. montana" conducted at the University of Exeter found that there are no rigorous clinical trials that support the claim that it is efficacious beyond a placebo effect.
_	Frances Yates does not make the claim that Bacon was a Rosicrucian, but presents evidence that he was nevertheless involved in some of the more closed intellectual movements of his day.
_	The Hotel Riviera del Pacífico was opened in 1930, briefly placing Ensenada on the international glamor map and was visited several times by President Miguel Aleman, international artists and political personalities; yet unlike the Hotel del Coronado, it was never a sustained success (despite giving rise to the claim that the Margarita was invented there).
_	Validity as measured by such an index depends on the claim that this kind of structure exists in the data set.
_	Hoyle and Wickramasinghe further proposed a radical kind of panspermia that included the claim that extraterrestrial life forms enter the Earth's atmosphere and were possibly responsible for epidemic outbreaks, new diseases, and genetic novelty that Hoyle and Wickramasinghe contended was necessary for macroevolution.
_	However, Judge Martha Sassone granted a new trial based on the claim that prosecutors improperly withheld criminal background information on three of their witnesses.
_	MailChannels' software derives from the open-source web proxy software Nginx, and as such, the company makes the claim that its software is extremely scalable and robust.
_	Jacques De Maio, head of the International Committee of the Red Cross, rejected the claim that there is apartheid in Israel, saying there is "no regime of superiority of race, of denial of basic human rights to a group of people because of their alleged racial inferiority.
_	He repeated the claim that the cold-storage cats would suffer from heat exhaustion if they were exposed to a New York July day.
_	He disputed the historical evidence adduced in support of the claim that American juries dislike mandatory death penalties.
_	Fikret Vezirov has proffered the claim that Chamanzaminli had to hide his identity behind the name Kurban Said so that he would not be identified with the anti-Bolshevik views contained in "Ali and Nino".
_	Russian President Dmitry Medvedev questioned the claim that ships going to Georgia were bringing only humanitarian assistance, alleging the delivery of military material.
_	Historian Charles Gibbs-Smith criticised "L’Aérophile" for not publishing the official report on the tests of Clément Ader’s 1897 "Avion III" when this report was finally made public in 1910, and thus failing to oppose the claim that Ader's machine had made a controlled flight in 1897.
_	Some organisations have raised doubts over the claim that the changes will result in a 20% saving.
_	Hurley ended his speech with the claim that Stalin had not broken any agreements "because we cowardly surrendered to him everything he wanted and we did it in secret...
_	In the article, Schwartz neither confirmed nor denied the claim that he was Stanley Bing.
_	Angry over the claim that he and Britta have any sexual tension between them, Jeff leaves to take a nap in his car.
_	It then makes the claim that merely defining the boundaries of the branches is an insufficient safeguard.
_	The reports of "republican marriages" nevertheless became well-known and were later cited by many authors writing about the Terror, who would elaborate on them, for example by adding the claim that the two victims were a priest and a nun.
_	Their campaign against the vaccine continued during two Channel 7 "Sunday Night" television programs, where Dorey made the claim that "no-one ever dies of Whooping Cough".
_	While in prison, George Orsborne lent his name to a ghost-written account of the "Girl Pat" adventure, which repeated the claim that the vessel had been sent out inadequately equipped and provisioned.
_	Although a sparsely inhabited swampland, expansionist-minded Americans were eager to grab it and already, in 1808, American settlers had invaded the westernmost tip of Florida and expelled the local Spanish authorities, after which Congress hastily passed a bill annexing it under the claim that the Louisiana Purchase had guaranteed the territory to the United States.
_	The Spectator was cynical of Lydekker's unquestioning acceptance of newspaper accounts, in particular the claim that if the cats were taken into the open air from the cold storehouse during the hot season they became sick and died.
_	After giving examples of legal and non-legal uses of the phrase "alternative facts", the article contended that when Chuck Todd upbraided Kellyanne Conway with the claim that "alternative facts are not facts; they're falsehoods", he was not only wrong, but "propagating an ignorance born out of lazy and shallow thinking".
_	There is some evidence supporting the claim that excessive mobile phone use can cause or worsen health problems.
_	Since that time, a controversy has surrounded the claim that Emory Malick is
_	Beginning 25 January 2004, Chalabi and his close associates promoted the claim that leaders around the world were illegally profiting from the Oil for Food program.
_	This reading refers in particular to a line which mentions the "iron road" (the Austrian rail company) bringing in foreigners to "kill all the songs", as well as to the claim that the forest and the Romanian are like "brothers".
_	In his work, Parton repeated the Jefferson family's oral history about a Carr paternity and the claim that Jefferson was absent during the conception period of one of Hemings' children.
_	Rep. McDermott and other plaintiffs based the lawsuit on the claim that voters believed that Hawaii Constitutional Amendment 2 of 1998 only allowed the Legislature to ban same-sex marriage and simultaneously barred the reverse.
_	One senior U.S. official said that they had found "nothing to substantiate" the claim that al-Qaeda trained at Salman Pak.
_	Accordingly, he made some inaccurate claims which have been overturned—such as the claim that objects of different mass accelerate at different rates due to gravity.
_	The mission statement for the employees of Southwest Airlines, for example, makes the claim that, "...We are committed to provide our Employees a stable work environment with equal opportunity for learning and personal growth".
_	The result was a vindication of the claim that the "Las Tetas" location as being in the municipality of Cayey was incorrect.
_	These requests were rejected on the claim that the Shari'a mandated hanging for apostates and enemies of Allah, though it is thought that the real reason may have been that hanging was quieter than gunfire and would thus better preserve the secrecy of the operations.
_	However, there are no grounds for the claim that Lixus was founded at the end of the second millennium BC.
_	In order to rationalize their violence, Hindu extremists had made the claim that their actions were in fact a "spontaneous response" to the Godhra Train Burning incident on 27 February 2002.
_	However, the claim that 'they never ruled any larger realm than their own district' can be challenged in many fronts.
_	This account clashes with the claim that only the two sons were born when the family moved to France.
_	However, the pill is offered to him with the claim that he "is" dreaming, and that the pill will return him to reality, with the words "inside your dream, you'll fall asleep."
_	The contradiction between the claim that "all men are created equal" and the existence of American slavery attracted comment from some quarters when the United States Declaration of Independence was first published; Congress, having made a few changes in wording, deleted nearly a fourth of the draft before publication, most notably removing a passage critical of the slave trade, as there were members of Congress who owned black slaves.
_	Now, I believe Stojko Vranković's comments were in reaction to the claim that my late brother and Divac were best friends.
_	As Pelgrane Press expanded, they launched the GUMSHOE system, designed by Laws based on the claim that investigative gaming had been introduced to RPGs under the mistaken assumption that acquiring clues should be treated as a contingent reward; the new system ensured that players would learn the clues needed in order to proceed with their investigations.
_	He is accused of committing the naturalistic fallacy, because he is trying to deduce what people ought to do from what they in fact do; the fallacy of equivocation, because he moves from the fact that (1) something is desirable, i.e. is capable of being desired, to the claim that (2) it is desirable, i.e. that it ought to be desired; and the fallacy of composition, because the fact that people desire their own happiness does not imply that the aggregate of all persons will desire the general happiness.
_	In a review of the novel found in "The Guardian", William Burrows disputes the claim that "The Castle" deals with bureaucracy, claiming that this view trivialises Kafka's literary and artistic vision, while being "reductive".
_	FACT makes the claim that the 26-year-old man from Cheltenham was arrested in connection with offences relating to the facilitation of copyright infringement on the internet whereas the arrest was over a matter of possible trademark infringement.
_	Korean claims are based on maps showing the border river as 土門 and the claim that this is a different river than the one used for the modern border.
_	In addition, Elliott questioned the claim that Chinese society was traumatized by the Western victories, as many Chinese peasants (90% of the population at that time) living outside the concessions continued about their daily lives, uninterrupted and without any feeling of "humiliation".
_	There is no evidence among the canons of the First Council of Nicaea of any determination on the canon, however, Jerome (347–420), in his "Prologue to Judith", makes the claim that the Book of Judith was "found by the Nicene Council to have been counted among the number of the Sacred Scriptures".
_	She analyzes the metaphors that are used to teach biological concepts and makes the claim that these metaphors reflect the socially constructed "definitions of male and female".
_	The authors of the former meta-analysis subsequently published a "p"-curve analysis, a statistical test which supports the claim that the effects are not a result of publication bias or "p"-hacking, and concluded that the methodology used by the latter meta-analysis caused the authors to overlook patterns of robust effects in cycle shifts.
_	Others argue that it was named after Cheikou, a marabout who founded the city, while still other theories support the claim that Ségou was founded by the Bozo fishermen coming from the north, who established their villages along the Niger River.
_	Agnosticism makes the claim that the existence or non-existence of any deity is unknown and possibly unknowable.
_	The site has been criticized for presenting articles which advocate AIDS denialism, the view that HIV does not cause AIDS, and the claim that vaccines cause autism.
_	The Chinese government declared that the Chinese people and government firmly opposed "two Chinas", "one China, one Taiwan" or any similar arrangements, as well as the claim that "the status of Taiwan remains to be determined".
_	Norton was half-Scottish, half-Cherokee and had been adopted by an Haunosaunee family, so under their Haudenosaunee tradition that made him an Iroquois, so the claim that Norton was really a white man was questionable.
_	Ablyazov's lawyer, Riccardo Olivo, rejected the claim that Ablyazov's wife and child had false papers, saying that both of them had “valid Kazakh passports and EU residency permits issued by Latvia.
_	On 21 April 2015, the Sudanese Embassy in London issued a statement saying that other international bodies were clearly biased as they refused to even send their observers and "the claim that unrest in some isolated peripheries reduces the validity of elections does not hold water; because Northern Ireland suffered serious “troubles” for decades and that didn't stop UK elections."
_	Nonetheless, the Northern Alliance trumpeted the claim that Tanai had supported the Taliban, although this was quite easily disproven, and their own ranks included former communist leaders like Abdul Rashid Dostum.
_	Although legacy indicating ancient Bulgar culture is at most virtually absent in modern Bulgarian culture, some authors claim there is a similarity between the dress and customs of the Chuvashes, who descend from the Volga Bulgars, and the Bulgarian ethnographic group "Kapantsi" from Targovishte Province and Razgrad Province, among whom the claim that they are direct descendants of Asparukh's Bulgars is popular., but Slavic elements are found among them.
_	However, the claim that the coup was organized by Yuan has been challenged by others.
_	He alleged that "Luca Santo" was the son of a nominated "Cancelliere" and considered improbable the claim that this icon was brought from Constantinople.
_	The article examined the claim that such dual retirement roles for Martin and other generals and admirals is "ethical and beneficial for America’s defense."
_	The small Cupid (son of Venus) at his feet (riding on a dolphin, Venus's patron animal) is a reference to the claim that the Julian family were descended from the goddess Venus, made by both Augustus and by his great uncle Julius Caesar - a way of claiming divine lineage without claiming the full divine status.
_	Paul's views on "the Jews" are complex, but he is generally regarded as the first person to make the claim that by not accepting claims of Jesus' divinity, known as Christology, Jews disqualified themselves from salvation.
_	In it he supported the claim that he was abducted and illegally detained from July 25-October 21 in the Central Compound together with his wife, children and housekeeper, and orchestrated by the Sanggunian.
_	One of the most singular of these legends is the claim that every night he would climb down a well to hell and help in his .
_	Berlusconi's list also included the claim that Italy had "fewer communists, and those who are still here deny having been one".
_	Lumumba's speech ends with the claim that Sarah's father tried to hang himself in a Harlem hotel, but leaves ambiguity as to whether the suicide was successful.
_	No scientific data supports the claim that the mercury in the vaccine preservative thiomersal causes autism or its symptoms, and there is no scientific support for chelation therapy as a treatment for autism.
_	The reason for the lawsuit was the claim that both companies violated federal antitrust laws because of restricting the awarding of Nextel Cup Series events.
_	MGM promoted the film with the claim that it was the first of its kind and the most revolutionary style of film since the introduction of the talkies.
_	This way, the Lebanese government hoped to dispel the claim that the Israeli forces had to remain in Lebanon until the international force had arrived, and thus make the Siniora Plan a more viable alternative to the draft UN resolution.
_	While "B. lecheguana", Bequaert suggests, is the most abundant in this group of homeochromic species, he does not make the claim that these similarities arose from mimicry in the classic sense, but he suggests that further research would be helpful.
_	The film corroborates the claim that hydrogen vehicles are a mere distraction by stating that "A fuel cell car powered by hydrogen made with electricity uses three to four times more energy than a car powered by batteries" and by interviewing Joseph J. Romm, the author of "The Hype About Hydrogen", who lists five problems he sees with hydrogen vehicles:
_	Such superstition is present especially in some parts of the African Great Lakes region, it has been promulgated and exploited by witch doctors and others who use such body parts as ingredients in rituals, concoctions and potions with the claim that their magic will bring prosperity to the user ("muti" or medicine murder)
_	Kozakiewicz later said that he had evidence supporting the claim that files also covered those homosexuals who were not involved in crimes.
_	The early Christians however saw it as God’s punishment for the Jewish rejection of Jesus, leading to the claim that the 'true' Israel was now the Church.
_	The NRDC's study also refutes the claim that the pipeline will lead to energy independence, because the pipeline will carry tar sands from Canada to Texas which will then be sold on the global market.
_	More recently, Pawlik and colleagues have challenged the claim that sponge communities on Caribbean reefs are primarily controlled by bottom-up factors (food availability), instead asserting that community structure is primarily a product of top-down control (due to predation).
_	Kayne goes on to say, "This would lead to seeing my [(1981)] arguments for binary branching to have two subcomponents, the first being the claim that syntax is n-ary branching with n having a single value, the second being that that value is 2.
_	There are serious doubts about the claim that the mutual exchange of signs (parivartana of houses) between dusthana lords produce Viparita Raja Yoga.
_	The DoD detained him on the claim that he was an al Qaida courier and senior commander of Hezb-e-Islami/Gulbuddin who allegedly commanded multiple HiG terrorist cells, conducted IED (improvised explosive device) attacks in Nangarhar province, and had regular contact with senior Al-Qaeda and HiG leadership.
_	Some academics dispute the claim that findings from field experiments are sufficient for establishing and testing theories about behavior.
_	He published it anonymously, with the claim that it had been translated from Latin by a man named John Brown at Prince Haimatoff's request.
_	The "Lethbridge Herald" reported in August 2006 that regional police had charged Wolf Child with two counts of sexual assault, stemming from the claim that he performed oral sex on a man and fondled the genitals of another at a house party in April 2005.
_	In 2015, the organisation officially repudiated views of former Director of Issues Analysis Bryan Fischer, including the claim that black people "rut like rabbits"; that the First Amendment applies only to Christians; that Hispanics are "socialists by nature" and come to the U.S. to "plunder" the country; that Hillary Clinton is a lesbian, and that "Homosexuality gave us Adolf Hitler, and homosexuals in the military gave us the Brown Shirts, the Nazi war machine and six million dead Jews."
_	Fossils dating back to Pangean time also support the claim that a strongly monsoonal circulation dominated the supercontinent’s climate.
_	This (with reference to perception) is the claim that are, by themselves, unable to provide a unique description of the world.
_	Well, what Secretary Powell and the US seems to have said is that he now has grave doubts about the accuracy of the case he put to the United Nations about the claim that Iraq possessed biological weapons laboratories – the so-called mobile trailers.
_	Patrick Lynch, leader of the police union Patrolmen's Benevolent Association, challenged the claim that a chokehold was used, further stating that the union would be able to find many use-of-force experts who would also challenge the claim that a chokehold was used.
_	Objections to this viewpoint mainly take the form of the following two interpretations, but also include the claim that Luke-Acts contains differences in theology and historical narrative which are irreconcilable with the authentic letters of Paul the apostle.
_	Hurkos made notable claims contrary to popular belief such as the claim that Adolf Hitler was alive and living in Argentina, and that an innocent suspect was
_	An investigation conducted by Chip Mitchell and other Chicago WBEZ reporters failed to substantiate the claim that inmates freed because of the Cook County detainer ordinance endanger the public more than other former inmates do, and that therefore the ordinance undermines public safety in the County.
_	Only 700 copies were sold in France; the claim that thousands of copies were sold in Germany is thought to be an exaggeration.
_	Among these theories was the claim that the polar caps of Mars were purely atmospheric cloud formations, rather than ice-covered ground.
_	In a subsequent interview, Osteen countered the claim that flood waters closed the church, saying "the church has been open from the beginning," and, "We’ve always been open …
_	Tradition since at least the Song dynasty continued this attribution, with the claim that Liu Xin's edition was the final one.
_	One explanation for this correlation is the claim that the Carthaginians prayed for divine intervention via child sacrifice; however, bad times would naturally lead to increased child mortality, and consequently, more child burials via cremation.
_	The report also included the claim that several teachers complained for eleven years that Freshwater was teaching evolution incorrectly.
_	A nearly microscopic fossil animal, "Vernanimalcula" ("springtime micro-animal") was announced in October 2005, with the claim that it was the oldest known bilateral animal.
_	Like his predecessor, Abbad y Lasierra depended heavily on the accounts of Oviedo, Castellanos and Herrera, repeating the claim that Juan de León had killed Agüeybana during a final battle.
_	It is common for some markets to be regulated under the claim that they are natural monopolies.
_	And in 1984, when Joseph Ratzinger, then Cardinal Prefect of that Congregation, stated that he rejected the claim that children who die unbaptised cannot attain salvation, he was speaking for many academic theologians of his training and background.
_	These texts include interviews with the shepherds, Gamaliel's interview with Joseph and Mary, Caiaphas's reports to the Sanhedrin, Eli's story of the Magi, Herod Antipater's defense before the Senate for the Massacre of the Innocents, and Herod Antipas's defense before the Senate—all with the claim that they were copied from ancient manuscripts and translated into English.
_	To this day RSS denies any connection with Godse and disputes the claim that he was a member.
_	Cohen is critical of what has been called "Scientism" – the claim that science is the best or only way to solve all problems.
_	This story, however, contains several factual errors, including the claim that she supposedly lived on the second floor.
_	Instead, we must specify precisely the structural features of an alternative: "But if we want to do more than simply denounce the evils of capitalism, we must confront the claim that 'there is no alternative'—by proposing one."
_	Popular myths about Prince Albert—such as the claim that he introduced Christmas trees to Britain—are dismissed by scholars.
_	In 2008, Thomson Reuters sued the Commonwealth of Virginia and George Mason University, based on the claim that Zotero's developers had, in violation of the EndNote EULA, reverse-engineered EndNote and provided Zotero with the ability to convert EndNote's proprietary .ens styles into Citation Style Language (CSL) styles.
_	Despite his past, Frank makes the claim that the mother and son have "never been in better hands".
_	However, according to a "The Wall Street Journal" report that appeared in the September 30, 2005, edition, Fitzpatrick scored a 48 on the exam, not a 50—still considered an exceptionally high score, but the claim that he completed the test in nine minutes is accurate.
_	It involves the claim that our thoughts are "about" things, unlike a BIV's thoughts, which cannot be "about" things (DeRose, 1999).
_	However, the claim that Ries and Trout devised the concept has been challenged by marketing scholars.
_	In his "Complete book of Whisky", Jim Murray notes that a previous writer could not be taken seriously after making the claim that "none of them [Lowland malts] approaches the sunny majesty of the Highland malts..." - Murray maintains that Rosebank is the "superior Lowlander" and should be ranked in the top five of all Scottish malts.
_	This he did by having Motoarcă decline all of Baconsky's suggestions with the claim that one "should not take lessons from a less gifted poet than himself."
_	This story is unique among the ancient legends concerning Homer as it embodies the claim that writing was known in Homer's circle; all other sources state or imply that Homer's poems were transmitted orally to his followers or descendants.
_	In the selective public reading of the will, Octavian highlighted the claim that Caesarion was heir to Caesar, that the Donations of Alexandria were legal, that Antony should be buried alongside Cleopatra in Egypt instead of Rome, and that Alexandria would be made the new capital of the Roman Republic.
_	As contemporary Chinese sources on Chenla only provide factual reference points, such as the claim that by 616/617 CE the kingdom of Chenla is the region's new souvereign and...the conqueror of Funan.
_	Neither the claim that bathhouses are responsible for the spread of sexually transmitted diseases, nor the claim that they are not, has been conclusively proved, but it is known that STDs are spread via unprotected sex, and as part of their membership agreement, or as a condition of entry, some bathhouses now require customers to affirm in writing that they will only practice safe sex on the premises, and venues frequently provide free condoms, latex gloves, and lubrication (and/or have them available for purchase).
_	The name, Mach IV, comes from the claim that the bullets can reach 4,000 ft/s.
_	In contrast to the presumption by officials that religious organizations benefit humanity without evidence (for instance Our Lady of Perpetual Exemption), he points to a letter he received from the British Charity Commission requesting evidence for the claim that the advancement of science is connected to the public good.
_	The theory was first widely publicized in 1976, when graduate student Linnda R. Caporael published an article in "Science", making the claim that the hallucinations of the afflicted girls could possibly have been the result of ingesting rye bread that had been made with moldy grain.
_	However, testimony by Dr. Richard Fardal, Franklin County Deputy Coroner, disputed the claim that Officer Vallandingham was killed by a weight, saying that there was "no injury to the voice box or the trachea" and that "Mr. Vallandingham died solely and exclusively as a result of ligature strangulation."
_	Afterward, Mikulik made several unapologetic comments, including the claim that "I could get two mannequins at Sears and umpire better than what I saw this whole series."[4] As a result of his actions, Mikulik was given a seven-day suspension and $1,000 fine; Mikulik's antics were shown on The Tonight Show with Jay Leno, ESPN's Pardon the Interruption, SportsCenter, and MSNBC's Countdown with Keith Olbermann.
_	When the video of the Berg beheading was released in 2004, credence was given to the claim that Zarqawi was alive and active.
_	See Lonsdale 2004 for white civilian participation, and Thuku 1970: 33 for the claim that white civilians shot protesters in the back.
_	Doyle later reported, in his "History of Spiritualism", the claim that Drayson in the 1880s was receiving a large number of apports through a medium.
_	All the answers of the Russian Foreign Office are based on the claim that the proscriptive laws against the Jews were in existence prior to the treaty of 1832, that they, therefore, must be assumed under the treaty, and, furthermore, that the Jewish question in Russia was complicated by economic and other difficulties.
_	Several ancient commentators (including Kumārila) go so far as to put forth the claim that practices considered legitimate and recorded in the smṛtis but not found in the Vedas are actually located in a "lost Veda" available to the composers of the Dharma texts but now no longer extant.
_	"Serhat" makes the claim that Kurdish refugees had been transported to the church under the guise of humanitarian aid, and were either sent to fight for the organization or sent to.
_	When discussing the house Barack and Michelle Obama bought in 2005, Corsi cites a February 1, 2008 Salon.com article for the claim that Chicago businessman Tony Rezko "found the house for Obama."
_	He also made the claim that it survived in part amongst the Yezidis of the Middle East, and also among the people of Nuristan (a fictional place he considered to be separate to the actual Nuristan in Afghanistan).
_	Slightly more plausible was the claim that he was the (officially) stillborn child of John of Castile and Margaret of Austria.
_	The complaint went on to state that, although the exact cause of death could not be determined, the claim that Trentadue had committed suicide was not consistent with the medical examiner's findings, and Trentadue appeared to have been tortured.
_	CLF has repeatedly made the claim that San Francisco "Bay area liberals have given more to Jon Ossoff's campaign than people in Georgia.", a statement that has been rated false by the fact-checking website PolitiFact.
_	The case was in appeal until July 2004 when the ICTY appeals panel dismissed 16 of 19 counts in the initial indictment, notably the claim that Blaškić had command responsibility for the massacre in Ahmići and that Ahmići was not a legitimate military target.
_	The lack of regular deployment of UAVs on board only seems to confirm the claim that the laser guided projectiles for the main gun are not deployed due to the lack of associating guidance equipment.
_	Right up until the Second World War, Gobineau's writings were cited in Brazil in support of the claim that miscegenation caused "physical degeneration" and there must be no interracial sex in Brazil if the Brazilian people were to have a positive future.
_	It entails the claim that even after we have given up the idea that religious beliefs can be grounded in anything beyond the human realm, religion can still be believed and practised in new ways.
_	Atheist activist and Christ mythicist Richard Carrier criticized her use of the inscriptions at Luxor to make the claim that the story of Jesus' birth was inspired by the Luxor story of the birth of Horus.
_	A number of false rumors about Dukakis were reported in the media, including the claim by Idaho Republican Senator Steve Symms that Dukakis's wife Kitty had burned an American flag to protest the Vietnam War, as well as the claim that Dukakis himself had been treated for a mental illness.
_	Thus, the claim that Yaudheyas had descended from Yaudheya, son of Pandava Yudhishtra is utterly baseless.
_	Some even make the claim that the Rambo was "Johnny Appleseed's favorite variety", ignoring that he had religious objections to grafting and preferred wild apples to all named varieties.
_	According to ABC News, former U.S. ambassadors and analysts contradicted with "strong skepticism" the claim that Kislyak is a spy.
_	The book also included the claim that, during the Pact's operation, Stalin rejected Hitler's offer to share in a division of the world, without mentioning the Soviet offers to join the Axis.
_	Numerous media outlets quoted BART officials making the claim that the planned protest was a threat to public safety but did not offer any analysis of the claim's merit.
_	He also refutes the claim that former Ukrainian president (who was ousted as a result of the 2014 Ukrainian revolution) Viktor Yanukovych, was responsible for the killing of protesters as claimed by the new Ukrainian government, and was the legitimate president forced to leave Ukraine by "well-armed, neo-Nazi radicals."
_	Taner Akcam writes that by employing Justin McCarthy's own method of calculating population figures and classifying individuals, Vahakn Dadrian has shown the ridiculousness of the claim that "the events of 1915 were in fact a civil war between the Armenians and Turks".
_	He then made the claim that 87% of Ireland's exports generated by multinational companies such as Microsoft, Apple Computer, Dell, Intel, and Google, implying that decisions made in New York boardrooms have a far greater effect on the Irish economy than decisions made in the Dáil.
_	It rested on the claim that, by refusing to allow transshipment of unsold vehicles, Mitsubishi was dividing markets.
_	On 18 May, "WA Business News" agreed with the West's claim that takeover offers were being evaluated, however contradicted the claim that Malone had been sidelined.
_	(6) a dominance of culturally sanctioned transitional events, rather than purely biological events, consistent with the claim that mainly culturally sanctioned transitional events go into the life script
_	The South African minister Dr. Peter Hammond denied that Gordon was a homosexual, citing the numerous statements made by Gordon condemning homosexuality as an abomination, charging that the claim that Gordon was gay was a theory with no foundations in fact.
_	If the membership card makes the claim that the patron is a VIP, then the club can react accordingly, translating the authenticated VIP membership claim to a permission such as the patron being permitted to sit in the exclusive lounge area and be served free drinks.
_	While the biggest opposition party PD opposed Ruçi's as candidature as chairman with the claim that he was a Sigurimi employee and Minister of Internal Affairs at the end of the communist dictatorship.
_	North Korea said the claim that VX nerve agent was used to kill one of its citizens is "absurd" and lacked scientific basis, portraying it as an allegation jointly made by the United States and South Korea to tarnish its image, adding that the death was caused by a "heart attack" as Kim Jong-nam has a record of heart disease.
_	This was to assert the claim that the negotiations were between two sovereign states (Ireland's view), and not that it was between the British government and local politicians (Britain's view).
_	Although zhuyin characters are reminiscent of katakana script, there is no source to substantiate the claim that Katakana was the basis for the zhuyin system.
_	In particular, the claim that Buchanan supported segregation has been disputed as untrue and contradicted by evidence that MacLean's book omits.
_	A major point of contention has been the claim that PLS can always be used with very small sample sizes.
_	These refuted the claim that Odia was a dialect of Bengali, specifically the conspiracy of Bengali intellectuals to abolish Odia Language got dimmed Beames's exposition of the origin of Odia language and study of its evolution brought him closer to the Odia people who were battling then for the survival of their language.
_	Antony Maas wrote that what Theodoret denied was not the eternal procession of the Holy Spirit from the Father and the Son, but only the claim that the Holy Spirit was "created" by or through the Son. Photius's position that the Holy Spirit proceeds from the Father "alone" has been described as a restatement of Theodoret's.
_	The main concerns of the party was the claim that the publishers were trying to frame Buck in a pro-Maoist manner, in regards to the Sino-Soviet Split where the party had sided with the Soviet Union, and that the loose recordings were in a position to be easily misinterpreted.
_	Sources in Sinn Féin have publicly denied aspects of the statements made by O'Callaghan with regard to his IRA career, particularly the claim that he had attained the leadership of the IRA's "Southern Command", and had been a delegate to the IRA Army Council, claims O'Callaghan made both in print and before a Dublin jury under oath.
_	Susan Gerbic challenged the claim that this was a successful psychic prediction in a September 15, 2017 Skeptical Inquirer article.
_	Silverman’s data from the excavations and experiments in 1986, strongly support the claim that the site was indeed a ceremonial centre.
_	The differences between the genealogies provided by Ranna and the later inscriptions also cast doubt on the claim that Tailapa's family was connected to the earlier Chalukya royals.
_	When asked to comment on the claim that former citizens of Communist states enjoy increased freedoms, Heinz Kessler, former East German Minister of National Defence, replied: "Millions of people in Eastern Europe are now free from employment, free from safe streets, free from health care, free from social security".
_	The release of the movie has also inspired feminist criticism, with Owen Gleiberman of "Entertainment Weekly" making light of the claim that Edward Cullen is little better than a stalker.
_	By 1985, the monoamine hypothesis was mostly dismissed until it was revived with the introduction of SSRIs through the successful direct-to-consumer advertising, often revolving around the claim that SSRIs correct a chemical imbalance caused by a lack of serotonin within the brain.
_	The suit was filed under the claim that Scheidler and the other defendants had violated the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (RICO) through a conspiracy to prevent women from accessing abortion services through the threat of violence or the implied threat of violence.
_	"x."The Piast Concept, of which the chief proponent was Jan Ludwik Popławski (late 19th century), was based on the claim that the Piast homeland was inhabited by so-called "native" aboriginal Slavs and Slavonic Poles since time immemorial and only later was "infiltrated" by "alien" Celts, Germanic peoples, and others.
_	Denny then launched the sequence of solo albums that underlie the claim that she is one of Britain's finest recent singer-songwriters.
_	He was noted for his benevolence and hospitality: on one occasion, seeing them exhausted by their journey, he permitted beef to be given to a visiting delegation of British bishops during Lent and permitted them to excuse themselves with the claim that the slaughtered cow was merely "milk and vegetables in condensed form" whereas the whey and biscuits the other monks consumed had so many weevils as to occasion "conscientious scruples".
_	Józef's grandson, Donald Tusk, was a presidential candidate from the Civic Platform party, and the claim that his grandfather served in Wehrmacht gained notoriety in the media after it was made by the politician from an opposing party, Jacek Kurski from Law and Justice (PiS).
_	After Carloman's resignation in 747 he maintained a sometimes turbulent relationship with the king of the Franks, Pepin; the claim that he would have crowned Pepin at Soissons in 751 is now generally discredited.
_	The 1983 report of the National Commission on Excellence in Education, titled "A Nation at Risk", started the drive for education reform with its conclusions, which included the claim that the nation was threatened by "a rising tide of mediocrity."
_	It differs from the traditional dual process model in that it makes a distinction between impulsivity and intuition—which are combined in System 1 according to traditional dual process theories—and then makes the claim that expertise and advanced cognition relies on intuition.
_	He defended the claim that the skull was indeed of ancient origin.
_	As Henry Louis Gates, Jr., has said, "it is fair to describe the subtext of the history of black letters as this urge to refute the claim that because blacks had no written traditions they were bearers of an inferior culture."
_	Some research supports the claim that these two categories are purely distinct and do not intermingle, contrary to what the extended body schema theory describes.
_	He has written one book about what he calls the ‘neo-Roman’ view that liberty essentially consists in not being dependent on the arbitrary will of others ("Liberty Before Liberalism", 1998), and another about Hobbes’s largely successful challenge to this view with the claim that liberty simply consists in absence of impediments to action ("Hobbes and Republican Liberty", 2008).
_	The Szeged Idea was based upon the claim that Hungary was stabbed in the back in World War I by communists and Jews and promoted action to undo this evil by declaring holy war against such traitors.
_	He sought to explain, for example, how Alvin Plantinga's Free Will Defense had transformed the way in which contemporary philosophers approach the so-called problem of evil and why, in particular, even atheistic philosophers came to abandon the claim that evil is "logically inconsistent" with the existence of God.
_	Central to the lawsuit was the claim that due to TC4's proximity to four schools and the potential financial damage that might be incurred, the encampment was an undue burden on the city.
_	Central to the empiricism is the claim that all knowledge of fact must be validated by sense experience or be inferred from propositions derived unambiguously from sense data.
_	Other notable claims by Trump which fact checkers rated false include the claim that his electoral college victory was a "landslide"<ref name="PolitiFact_12/11/2016"></ref><ref name="FactCheck_11/29/2016"></ref><ref name="Seipel_12/11/2016"></ref> and that Hillary Clinton received 3-5 million illegal votes.<ref name="PolitiFact_11/27/2016"></ref>
_	The word "Dera" is similar connotations to "ashram", while the word "Sacha Sauda" means "true deal" - a reference to the claim that the organisation does not accept monetary gifts from its devotees.
_	Both later responded with an updated version of Henry E. Garrett's "equalitarian dogma", labelling the claim that all races were equal in cognitive ability as an "egalitarian fiction" and a "scientific hoax".
_	The atheist philosopher of science Michael Ruse has made the claim that Richard Dawkins would fail "introductory" courses on the study of "philosophy or religion" (such as courses on the philosophy of religion), courses which are offered, for example, at many educational institutions such as colleges and universities around the world.
_	In recent years he opposed the claim that Islamic terrorism is the product of the clash of civilizations between Islam and the West.
_	Other criticism concerning outing centers upon the harm that outing individuals as homosexual, transgender, or transsexual does to them personally and professionally and upon the fact that some individuals have been erroneously outed or have been outed when there is no proof to substantiate the claim that they are gay or transgender.
_	PIIE challenges the claim that ISDS "arbitrators lack integrity", noting that arbitrators take an oath of impartiality and both sides of a case choose arbitrators.
_	Diefendorf says that when the head of the murdered Coligny was shown to the Paris mob by a member of the nobility, with the claim that it was the King's will, the die was cast.
_	Some climate scientists, however, have questioned the claim that the hiatus is not supported by evidence, arguing that the recent corrections in data do not negate the existence of a hiatus.
_	The demise of Napoleon gave the Germans some respite, but during the Rhine Crisis of 1840, French prime minister Adolphe Thiers advanced the claim that the Upper and Middle Rhine River should serve as his country's "natural eastern border".
_	Somerville's Special Branch file also included the claim that he had been involved in another bombing, a largely failed attack on a Catholic housing estate in Coalisland in 1974.
_	According to economist John Quiggin, the standard features of economic fundamentalist rhetoric are dogmatic assertions combined with the claim that anyone who holds contrary views is not a real economist.
_	For instance, the work of Ted Sider (2001) has suggested that even enduring objects can have temporal parts, and it is more accurate to define perdurantism as being the claim that objects have a temporal part at every instant that they exist.
_	More common was the claim that the arms-carrying aircraft would closely shadow aid aircraft, making it more difficult to distinguish between aid aircraft and military supply aircraft.
_	Details of the Harrier interception appeared in the Brazilian press along with the claim that the DC-10's passengers were "alleged to have been frightened" and Woodward's comment that "[i]nconvenience to passengers' underwear regretted unless any of them were Argentinian".
_	They suggested Azeri writers look at maps of ancient and Soviet times including the claim that Noah was of Azeri origin.
_	Another early source of the claim that Socrates was a stone-worker is Duris of Samos, who described Socrates as a slave.
_	As such, they have concluded that there is little evidence, among Latin American mothers at least, to support the claim that children have a negative effect on labor force participation for women.
_	The validity of the claim that the Guardian Angel was invented by Greg Chavez is unclear.
_	His fundamental point on the New Mandarins is that we should not uncritically accept the claim that technocratic approaches are neutral and beneficial.
_	Rice demanded $3.5 million based on the claim that the Ravens imposed a second punishment upon him by terminating his employment weeks after the NFL levied a two-game suspension.
_	In "Einstein's Theory of Relativity" (1921) he defended the claim that modern physics supports a neo-Kantian conception of knowledge.
_	More damaging still in the eyes of the British government was the claim that he had taken upon himself to declare in conversations that Britain recognized the Monroe Doctrine, when all the British governments till then had repudiated it.
_	In his book "Basic Theology", Charles Caldwell Ryrie countered the claim that Luther rejected the Book of James as being canonical.
_	Murphy attempted to call evidence from a professor of sociology to support the claim that persons over 18 were considered mature persons in Australia.
_	Levy argued that such remarks were designed to attract Southern whites to the Republican Party to help secure the re-election of Nixon and Agnew in 1972, and that Agnew's rhetoric "could have served as the blueprint for the culture wars of the next twenty-to-thirty years, including the claim that Democrats were soft on crime, unpatriotic, and favored flag burning rather than flag waving".
_	Magueijo's proposal used a different set of units, a choice which he justifies with the claim that some equations will be simpler in these new units.
_	Later that month, "Gateway Pundit" was one of a number of far-right websites that pushed the claim that at least one of the teenage survivors of Stoneman Douglas High School shooting was a deep state pawn, alleging that David Hogg's gun control activism was being coached by his retired FBI agent father.
_	In that sources there is the claim that he supposed to be a rebel and lieutenant of Emiliano Zapata forces .
_	A few scientists have focused much of their research to demonstrate the science behind how Holistic Planned Grazing (or Adaptive Multi-Paddock Grazing) does improve soil health and there is a growing body of research work which is reversing the claim that the only evidence for holistic management is anecdotal.
_	According to the American Cancer Society, "available scientific evidence does not support the claim that applied kinesiology can diagnose or treat cancer or other illness".
_	Because it had been weakened by age and disease, the Kilmer Oak was removed in 1963, and in reporting by "The New York Times" and other newspapers the local tradition was repeated with the claim that "Rutgers said it could not prove that Kilmer had been inspired by the oak."
_	Historian Werner Maser stated that "the claim that the Soviet Union was at the time threatened by Hitler, as Stalin supposed...is a legend, to whose creators Stalin himself belonged."
_	Two major studies dispute the claim that open access articles lead to more citations.
_	Some discussions of the classic Kolakoski sequence make the claim that, written with or without the initial 1, it is the "only sequence" that is its own run-length encoding or the only such sequence that begins with 1.
_	The Campaign was formed to raise awareness of how housework and childcare are the base of all industrial work and to stake the claim that these unavoidable tasks should be compensated as paid, wage labor.
_	The book also included the claim that, during the Pact's operation, Stalin rejected Hitler's offer to share in a division of the world, without mentioning the Soviet offers to join the Axis.
_	For his part, Tsongas largely avoided the busing issue, but did make the claim that voting for Brooke on the basis of his race was "the other side of racism."
_	Politifact rated the claim that Obama was in the video as "Pants on Fire".
_	As a graduate student he contested the claim that neurotransmitters were related to the natural inducers of marine invertebrate larval settlement, arguing that the results of still-water, laboratory experiments with bioactive compounds were artifacts and not ecologically relevant.
_	Recent studies have countered the claim that the Aztec Empire ran the triple alliance by suggesting that Tenochtitlan was actually the dominant altepetl all along.
_	In 2009, a documentary that aired on the BBC defended the claim that the villagers had been offered the choice between conversion to Judaism or death and that 20,000 Christians were then massacred stating that "The production team spoke to many historians over 18 months, among them Nigel Groom, who was our consultant, and Professor Abdul Rahman Al-Ansary, a former professor of archaeology at the King Saud University in Riyadh."
_	These were advertised for use storing wool, wheat, farm produce or general merchandise, with the claim that "ARMCO pre-fabricated huts are weather and vermin-proof, economical and durable".
_	While economic experiments require subjects to make relatively abstract decisions for small stakes, evidence from natural experiments for high stakes support the claim that humans act more cooperatively than strict self-interest would dictate.
_	Surveying the literature on Jackson's argument, Nida-Rümelin identifies, however, that many simply doubt the claim that Mary would not gain new knowledge upon leaving the room, including physicalists who do not agree with Jackson's conclusions.
_	Research shows that both first and second language action words rely on the motor cortex for language processing, strengthening the claim that the motor cortex is necessary for action language processing.
_	In 1977, Andre Andrieu and Serge Renault working for Corning France, patented the claim that would form the basis for amber-tinted, transparent Vision cookware.
_	The other National Guard officers who commanded combat divisions, Robert S. Beightler of the 37th Infantry Division and Raymond S. McLain of the 90th Infantry Division, received commissions in the regular Army, which is likely the source of the claim that Wing was the only National Guard officer to command a combat division in World War II.
_	In a speech on 7 May 1919, he refuted the claim that Germany and Austria were solely responsible for the war, although he accepted a partial guilt especially with regard to what has become known as the Rape of Belgium.
_	Another engineer, Stanley Wilson—who had also worked with Casagrande on the 1972 studies and supported the claim that oilfield subsidence was an insignificant cause—now conceded that analogous ground offsets extended well outside the reservoir area, notably in the Stocker-LaBrea area, so that the reservoir and other fault movements could not be attributed to the reservoir itself—thus tacitly attributing responsibility for the failure to oilfield operations.
_	In 2018, Kevin Alan Brook cited genetic data to argue against the claim that Ashkenazim have any amount of Khazarian ancestry.
_	Nevertheless, the spokesperson for Indian Christians, John Dayal rejected the claim that any forced conversion took place.
_	He is known for the claim that cancer is caused by the fungus "Candida albicans", and has argued that cancer is a form of candida overgrowth.
_	The trade name Dolophine was created by Eli Lilly after World War II and used in the United States; the claim that Nazi leader Adolf Hitler ordered the manufacture of methadone or that the brand name 'Dolophine' was named after him is an urban legend.
_	With Hungarian neuroanatomist, Mihály Lenhossék (1863–1937), the "Henneguy–Lenhossek theory" is named, which states the claim that mitotic centrioles and ciliary basal kinetosomes are fundamentally the same structure.
_	These comments—which included the claim that all white people were guilty of "racial violence" and that the white race was "the most violent and oppressive force of nature on Earth"—generated accusations that she was racist against white people.
_	These findings might give some support to the claim that modern humans from Africa arrived at southern China about 100,000 years BP (Zhiren Cave, Chongzuo City: 100,000 years BP; and the Liujiang hominid: controversially dated at 139,000–111,000 years BP ).
_	One hallmark of this new theory was the claim that "Titanic"s angle at the time of the breakup was far less than had been commonly assumed—according to Long, no greater than 11°.
_	A study of VPIN by scientists from the Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory cited the 2011 conclusions of Easley, Lopez de Prado and O'Hara for VPIN on S&P 500 futures but provided no independent confirmation for the claim that VPIN reached its historical high one hour before the crash:
_	However, the European Commission's report provides no data substantiating the claim that "all other conditions are equal".
_	He then hid his capsule beneath the ribbon holding the flowers together, and delivered it to Mrs. Ponsomby's suite with the claim that it is for the President.
_	Microsoft disputed the claim that it did not provide enough disclosure of the "Full" telemetry level, and stated that it was working with the DDPA to "find appropriate solutions".
_	In the July 1937 issue of "Strength & Health" magazine, Rosetta Hoffman made the claim that Minerva had lifted 23 men and a platform, in a 3,564–lb hip-and-harness lift.
_	Rosenberg published a defense of what he called "Scientism"—the claim that "the persistent questions" people ask about the nature of reality, the purpose of things, the foundations of value and morality, the way the mind works, the basis of personal identity, and the course of human history, could all be answered by the resources of science.
_	Athenaeus makes the claim that his entourage consisted of thousand slaves, fisherman, bird-catchers and cooks.
_	John Wesley Hanson (1823–1901) was an American Universalist minister and a notable Universalist historian advancing the claim that Universalism was the belief of early Christianity.
_	Ron Rosenbaum suggests that Frank, who had turned against Nazism after 1945, but remained an anti-Semitic fanatic, made the claim that Hitler had Jewish ancestry as a way of proving that Hitler was a Jew and "not" an Aryan.
_	An increasing minority of pastors has expressed concern that there is a lack of biblical support for the claim that Spirit baptism must always be accompanied with speaking in tongues.
_	Hale held that Mr Seldon had not suffered unjustifiable age discrimination, and rejected the claim that it could not be justified in relation to business need.
_	Time-series data collected by the United Nations Statistics Division from 2000 to 2015 directly support the claim that women undertake more than half of household domestic labor all over the world.
_	It was stated in the ruling that Imogen Thomas had "at some stage engaged the services of Mr Max Clifford", the well-known UK publicist, and that the purpose of meetings Thomas had arranged with the footballer had been "that "The Sun" was ready to take advantage of these prearranged meetings in order to be able to put forward the claim that it was "The Sun" which had found him 'romping with a busty "Big Brother" babe'".
_	On August 27, posts from the church and a Lakewood Church associate pastor's social media accounts stated that the church was "inaccessible due to severe flooding," Osteen countered the claim that flood waters closed the church, saying "the church has been open from the beginning," and, "We've always been open …
_	Chesterman rejects the claim that states have a legal right to act as vigilantes in support of Council resolutions, even if they believe that this is the only means to stop a genocide.
_	Rasta discourse legitimises this female dress code with the claim that it is necessary to prevent women attracting men; it also endorses this female dress code as an antidote to the sexual objectification of women in Babylon.
_	For the claim that "F" is consistent has form "for all numbers "n", "n" has the decidable property of not being a code for a proof of contradiction in "F"".
_	Among his many other important revelations was the claim that Italian businessman, and former SISMI officer, Francesco Pazienza had met the failed Turkish assassin, Mehmet Ali Ağca, in his prison cell at Rome's Ascoli Piceno.
_	The penalty was motivated because the foreign ministers checked the veracity of the claim that the Rafael Trujillo regime had sponsored an attack against Rómulo Betancourt, at that time, constitutional president of Venezuela.
_	However, evidence against Ben Ali was largely circumstantial and based primarily on the claim that unidentified bloodstains had been found leading from the room where Brown was killed into the room he was staying in.
_	Zinn then addresses the claim that violence does irreparable harm to a movement’s cause, countering that history repeatedly shows both the limitations of nonviolence and the efficacy of combative means: "Not until Negro demonstrations resulted in violence did the national government begin to work seriously on civil rights," the historian notes, using the Birmingham riot of 1963 as an example.
_	The party's political program seems to indicate a pro-Russian stance in relation to foreign policy, as the opening paragraphs of the document make the claim that "quality of life of citizens" was superior under the Soviet Union and that Moldova's socio-economic problems relate to Moldova's negative relationship with the Russian Federation.
_	Holdings later said it welcomes the move of Flash, because "it will transform mobile applications and it removes the claim that the desktop controls the Internet."
_	Auditor Sonntag himself directly refuted the claim that I-985 implements the recommendations of the state congestion audit.
_	Herodotus did, though, follow up in passage 105 of Book 3 with the claim that the "ants" are said to chase and devour full-grown camels.
_	"Time"s Richard Corliss declared his first published work "The Ghastly One" "a masterpiece" and John Waters has repeatedly named it one of his favorite books(this was actually McDonough's second effort; the first, "Shakey: The Biography of Neil Young," had been held up by a lawsuit over the claim that Young had tried to prevent publication).
_	Further analysis of the data that led to the first announcement has cast doubt on the claim that it is a distant object, and follow-up observations in the H-band using the Gemini North Telescope and observations from the orbiting Spitzer Space Telescope were not able to detect it at all, the latter regarding it to be an artefact.
_	Horowitz also made the claim that the operation of the SCF was not fair since there was no cap on the number of years that a farmer may use his or her plot of land and there was also no need to make room for someone else; that the farmers simply wanted to keep the land forever.
_	Hitchens notes that Childers was "intrigued enough" to go on and examine the original (October 2) 1948 issue of the "Economist", which had been cited as a source for the claim that Arab evacuation orders had in fact taken place.
_	As he says, "we must not let anyone disturb us or frighten us with the claim that you should prefer a friend who is in control of himself to one who is disturbed.
_	The blog's name is an ironic reference to the anti-Semitic Protocols of the Elders of Zion, which makes the claim that Jews control the world.
_	Unfortunately, to date, there is no data to support the claim that any particular type of helmet or protective equipment reduces the risk of sports-related concussion.
_	In that statement they made the claim that no criminal activity was uncovered, but that Bill Gothard had acted in an "inappropriate manner" and so "is not permitted to serve in any counseling, leadership, or Board role within the IBLP ministry".
_	The Court further dismissed the claim that the potential imposition of a removal order would bar them from challenging it, as the Federal Court could grant an injunction to prevent deportation.
_	"As for the claim that the Marketplace Fairness Act would put an undue burden on Internet sellers, this is a wolf in sheep's clothing.
_	Whilst in modern times, some Orthodox Church members have rebaptized Catholics, the claim that they did so in medieval times has been dismissed as a Latin Church slander against the Eastern Church.
_	A university spokesperson denied the claim that additional training was the only consequence for Verdú, stating that "penalties were imposed in addition to the required counseling", but did not specify those penalties.
_	Critics dispute the claim that Meucci could not afford to file for a patent or renew his caveat, as he filed for and was granted full patents in 1872, 1873, 1875, and 1876, at the cost of $35 each, as well as one additional $10 patent caveat, all totaling $150, for inventions unrelated to the telephone.
_	This has prompted one scholar to make the claim that the Mesopotamian's "entire existence was infused by their religiosity, just about everything they have passed on to us can be used as a source of knowledge about their religion."
_	The detail of the rivers position on the chart, backs up the claim that this is the Ashburton River, which, being at 21 degrees 40 minutes south and 114 degrees 56 east, is almost exactly the latitude shown on the chart.
_	These findings support the claim that emotional stimuli are more effective in capturing attentional resources than non-emotional stimuli.
_	Jimmy McDonough's "Shakey: Neil Young's Biography" supports the claim that "Chrome Dreams" is indeed a bootlegged acetate with said title.
_	In May 1948 the War Crimes Review Board Nr. 4 rejected the claim that irregularities had occurred during the trial against Knittel but following the Simpson Report and the findings of the United States Senate Committee on Armed Services his sentence was further reduced to 12 years imprisonment.
_	If these assumptions are correct, incompatibilist libertarianism can only be maintained as the claim that free will is a supernatural phenomenon, which does not obey the laws of nature (as, for instance, maintained by some religious traditions).
_	One of the reasons given for the population transfer of Germans from the former eastern territories of Germany was the claim that these areas had been a stronghold of the Nazi movement.
_	They also discovered that the marks on Jane’s feet and hand, serving basis for the claim that her mother burned her feet on the stove, were probably a result of a previous skin infection that looked ambiguous.
_	Mormon scholar Hugh Nibley, who was appointed by the LDS church to learn Egyptian in order to defend the claim that Joseph Smith had found and translated a document from the hand of Abraham, gives a short description of the Book of Breathings:
_	There is no evidence to support the theory that they were named pipes for the fact that they "piped" the money into the Treasury, nor for the claim that they got their name from resembling a wine cask, or pipe of wine.
_	Lee also did not respond to the specific request to offer evidence to counter the claim that he was trying to "siphon money from big gigs away from Dreamwave to "Dream Engine" in the months before the bankruptcy".
_	His absence was explained by the claim that Taggart was in constant meetings with the Chief Constable.
_	The witness claimed that health care cuts would cause serious damage to border area hospitals, which Riddle countered with the claim that illegal immigrants were responsible for the financial strains.
_	One finds in Johann Georg Estor the claim that he was the son of a blacksmith.
_	In 1920 the old Zanesville Art Pottery became Weller's "Plant #3", securing the claim that S.A. Weller Pottery was the largest in the country.
_	Soldiers from The Gallic Third Legion who were stationed near Emesa, would visit the city occasionally, and were eventually presuaded by Julia Maesa, using her enormous wealth, and the claim that he was Carcalla's bastard to swear fealty to Elagabalus, who later rode to battle against Marcinus, and entered the city of Antioch emerging as emperor, with Marcinus fleeing before being captured near Chalcedon and executed in Cappadocia.
_	The thesis of the "new course" of Sardinian banditry is based on the claim that in order to characterize different from the banditry of the past, "traditional", are essentially three aspects:
_	On 21 September 2012, the "Gibraltar Chronicle" reported a Gibraltar Government spokesman as saying that there was no basis for the claim that it had paid Bamkin to raise the profile of articles about Gibraltar.
_	Some of this sentiment survived into the 19th century: Friedrich Wilhelm August Fröbel's 1826 "The Education of Man" instructs the teacher to drill students with the claim that 1 is neither even nor odd, to which Fröbel attaches the philosophical afterthought,
_	Spicer repeated the claim that crowds at Trump's inauguration ceremony were the largest ever at such an event and that the press had deliberately under-estimated the number of spectators.
_	A metafictional foreword (said to have been made by a future historian) to a trade paperback for "A Death In The Family" made the claim that the public at large always thought there was just one Robin.
_	To dispute the claim that newspaper fabricated stories Martin, took and passed a polygraph.
_	Gaelic scholars have dismissed the claim that the poem/song was derived from Gaelic.
_	While orthodox historians view the dispute as a matter of whether or not to invade Korea, the provocation against Korea in 1876 supports the claim that the Iwakura party never disagreed on the validity on an attack.
_	"Wired" writer Chris Kohler expressed skepticism over Retro's denial of a reference to "Metroid Dread" in "Corruption"; he noted that it would be believable if Pacini said that it was a joke, but the claim that it was a coincidence was not.
_	He found Sullivan to be arrogant for assuming that all gay people experienced their homosexuality in the same way he did, denied that the claim that homosexuality is involuntary helped Sullivan to make a case for gay rights, and wrote that Sullivan had a questionable understanding of modern politics.
_	In this chapter, Peacocke defends the claim that perceptual experience, over and above its intentional content, has certain "sensational properties".
_	In physics, an effective theory is, similar to a phenomenological theory, a framework intended to explain certain (observed) effects without the claim that the theory correctly models the underlying (unobserved) processes.
_	Another objection of his was based on the claim that God broke a promise which He had made under oath.
_	The rotating wave approximation is thus the claim that these terms may be neglected and thus the Hamiltonian can be written in the interaction picture as
_	David Smith remarks, that "a key feature of the Tamil Saiva Siddhanta, one might almost say its defining feature, is the claim that its source lies in the Vedas as well as the Agamas, in what it calls the Vedagamas".
_	The actor-observer asymmetry can seem similar to the hypothesis of a positivity bias in attribution- the claim that people are biased toward favorable evaluations.
_	He also questioned "the concept of having a right to non-interference", arguing that it was doubtful that the fact that people want freedom and well-being logically supported the claim that people have rights to these things.
_	Walt the claim that the IDF is the most moral army in the world is "yet another myth".
_	The weak coupling also induces the claim that many cycles must occur prior to convergence of oscillators to phase lock to lead to synchronization.
_	Finally, acoustic evidence supports the claim that Media Lengua could be dealing with as many as eight vowels: Spanish-derived [i, a, u], which exist as extreme mergers with Kichwa-derived [i, a, u], and Spanish-derived [e] and [o], which exist as partial mergers with Kichwa [i] and [u], respectively.
_	When Storm Shadow tracks Snake Eyes to his hidden dojo, he managed to make off with Jinx and convinces her to join him after making the claim that Snake Eyes killed her father.
_	While translating William Cullen's "A Treatise on the Materia Medica", Hahnemann encountered the claim that cinchona, the bark of a Peruvian tree, was effective in treating malaria because of its astringency.
_	Additionally, in the Israeli daily "Davar", reporter Pazit Ravina wrote that "in talks with people who worked with Ben-Menashe, the claim that he had access to highly sensitive intelligence information was confirmed again and again."
_	Gertz makes the claim that more high-level attention is needed, as well as more resources, better leadership and proactive programs.
_	His argument is built on the claim that
_	A tango song named "Cien barrios porteños" (The 100 barrios of Buenos Aires), sung by Alberto Castillo, is sometimes invoked (informally) to support the claim that there are indeed a hundred neighbourhoods in the city.
_	Heggie casts doubt on this as well, stating that his careful analysis uncovered "little evidence for a highly accurate unit" and "little justification for the claim that a highly accurate unit was in use".
_	Corsi had scheduled a press conference to announce the claim that Obama had raised a million dollars for the election campaign of Kenyan prime minister Raila Odinga, and had helped run Odinga's campaign as a strategist, including setting the stage for the campaign of violence and bloodshed that had brought Odinga to power after a disputed election.
_	Those orders, which became the basis of the claim that the Union government had promised freed slaves "40 acres and a mule", were revoked later that year by President Andrew Johnson.
_	Another plane appeared on August 31 to drop a message with the claim that the Germans had defeated the French army at Saint-Quentin, and a third plane appeared on September, 1 this time to drop more bombs that killed one person and injured sixteen.
_	The first allegations related to his work prior to Snuppy; the claim that he had successfully cloned a human embryo.
_	Federman advocated an open discussion on sexual abuse in the Jewish community, maintaining that that obligation to protect the innocent from being hurt supersedes the claim that discussing sexual abuse will give the community a “bad name.”
_	Plato makes the claim that "sight and the visible realm are deficient."
_	In September 2007, a controversy arose when Rutgers Athletic Director Robert Mulcahy accused Dowling of racism for having dismissed, in a "New York Times" interview, the claim that athletic scholarships provide educational opportunities for minority students:
_	He wrote a treatise entitled "An Assertion of the Antiquity of Oxford University", strengthening the claim that King Alfred founded University College in particular and Oxford University in general.
_	Recent studies in 2007 based on feline DNA showed that there are very few genetic differences between the Singapura and Burmese, adding support to the claim that the Singapura is not a natural breed.
_	In particular, the sacking of the prime minister Hwang Kyo-ahn has resulted in a controversy, due to the claim that his firing had been done via a text message.
_	Frankly, I think the claim that it’s a Leonardo is ridiculous.
_	One of the main issues of contention is the claim that Wittgenstein triggered or substantially contributed to Hitler's antisemitism while they were at school together.
_	PZ Myers says of Wells's claim about the use of Haeckel drawings in modern textbooks "They repeat the claim that Haeckel's embryos and all that silly recapitulation theory are still endemic in biology textbooks.
_	In February 2008, the Security Service of Ukraine (SBU) archive representative Oleksander Ishchuk showed declassified documents, which provided an objective basis to the claim that the actual leadership of Organization of Ukrainian Nationalists) (OUN) sought to avoid participating in violence against the civil population of Lviv between June 22 and September 1941, and provided no official orders to conduct pogroms.
_	Moreover, evidence supports the claim that queens in both populations enter nests at random, without any regard for the number of older queens present.
_	Although that approach is also analytically defended through more abstract theory, the claim that economics, ecology, politics and culture can be distinguished as central domains of social practice has to be defensible at an empirical level.
_	Wagner's supporters may have also been irked by other apparent fabrications by Praeger, such as the claim that Wagner had told him that his first love, at the age of 14, was a Jewish girl in Leipzig.
_	But Bhattacharya went ahead with the claim that the paintings were "genuine".
_	This is not his view: van Inwagen would reject the claim that tables are identical to simples arranged tablewise because he rejects the claim that composition is identity.
_	In philosophy and logic, a deflationary theory of truth is one of a family of theories that all have in common the claim that assertions of predicate truth of a statement do not attribute a property called "truth" to such a statement.
_	The IPCRI reports were instrumental in refuting the claim that Palestinian textbooks "incite hatred or violence towards Israel and the Jews...or Western values".
_	Cumont (1897) doubted that the claim that the sacrifice of the Saturnalian "king" reflects historical practice.
_	In an interview with The New York Times, professor Peter J. Li of the University of Houston–Downtown said in response to the claim that dog meat promoters accused Chinese activists of introducing a harmful Western ideology into China that opposition to eating dog meat at the festival began with the Chinese themselves, as "the bond between companion animals and humans is not Western.
_	Badea also upholds the claim that the "parallel state" (as defined by PSD) is linked with the Romanian Intelligence Service and George Soros, conspiring it fights against the Rule of Law but it’s difficult to draw conclusions since he is well known for spreading fake news under the excuse of satire.
_	This design was later updated and corrected, and the claim that the reactor is able to use nuclear waste as fuel was dropped.
_	Hence, the median voter theorem, which supports the claim that voters make political candidates converge towards a middle ground, is outweighed by candidates refusing to compromise on their political standpoints.
_	We were not at any point offered alternatives" and that the claim that "CKLN’s 'demise' could have been avoided is an admonishment, which could have been made to any of the last six CKLN boards".
_	This lends credence to the claim that a deal was done with "Alf Thomas" which later caused outrage in the police hierarchy.
_	To argue the claim that a quasinormal operator is subnormal, recall the following property of quasinormal operators:
_	According to an investigation by the British government in 1989, the available evidence did not back up the claim that Hess was murdered, and Solicitor General Sir Nicholas Lyell saw no grounds for further investigation.
_	Such terms, it may be argued, are always intensional since they connote the property 'meaningless term', but this is only an apparent paradox and does not constitute a counterexample to the claim that without intension a word has no meaning.
_	While stating that Kraft did buy many salad dressings, Tousey disputes the claim that X-tra Fine was Miracle Whip.
_	Davies argued that the faith scientists have in the immutability of physical laws has origins in Christian theology, and that the claim that science is "free of faith" is "manifestly bogus."
_	The panel announced its findings in at the end of December 2016, stating that it found insufficient evidence to support the accusations made against Miura and that the claim that he had excessively left his seat during official games was false.
_	In relation to claims about Christianity, the indictment also makes the claim that there is what is called a "Mormon Gang" within American intelligence.
_	It was to be about in size, and included Transfiguration Cathedral (the claim that it was intended as the largest in the world probably results from confusing Potemkin's reference to San Paulo-fuori-le-mura in Rome with St Peter's Basilica.);
_	His son finished the book "In Nixon's Web: A Year in the Crosshairs of Watergate", which disputes the claim that Felt was Deep Throat, citing Woodward's own notes and other evidence as proof that Deep Throat was a fictional composite made up of several Woodward sources, only one of whom was Felt.
_	In 1857, Charles Bathurst reiterated the claim that the play was so badly written, Shakespeare simply could not have had anything to do with it.
_	He described the relation with FPM as 'normal', whilst reaffirming the claim that opponents to the Amal-Hezbollah bloc in Bekaa III had supported 'terrorist groups'.
_	Dr William C. Robertson writing for National Science Teachers Association writes, "I have heard too many scientists claim that evolution is a fact, often in retort to the claim that it is just a theory.
_	Although the term "class struggle" was introduced by Marx and Engels, and "aggravation of class struggle" was an expression originally coined by Vladimir Lenin in 1919 to refer to the dictatorship of the proletariat, the theory of "class struggle under socialism" was put forward by Joseph Stalin in 1933 and supplied a theoretical base for the claim that ongoing repression of "capitalist elements" is necessary.
_	The medical examiner Victor Müller-Heß came in the murder trial against Seefeldt with the claim that the murder victims were not poisoned, but instead strangled.
_	Those who hold this belief reject the claim that Jesus had biological siblings and maintain that these brothers and sisters received this designation because of their close association with the nuclear family of Jesus, as either children of Joseph from a previous marriage, or as nephews of either Mary or Joseph.
_	The additional artifacts appear to support the claim that the wreck is that of "Queen Anne's Revenge".
_	Modern scholars such as Miriam Griffin distrust the claim that Nero poisoned her.
_	for faces, fingerprints and palm prints, and the method gained further traction when its extremely low error rates were combined with the claim that its biometric data was secure against loss because factoring the inner products of biometrics feature and TRN was an intractable problem.
_	Many make the claim that this is the longest running public contradance in the world, though there have been no attempts to document this as an "official" record.
_	These acts of heresy are: the claim that God sometimes takes abode in the bodies of the Imams ("ḥulūl"), the belief in metempsychosis ("tanāsukh"), and considering Islamic law to be not obligatory ("ibāḥa"), similar to antinomianism.
_	Deists also rejected the claim that there was only one revealed religious truth or "one true faith"; religion could only be "simple, apparent, ordinary, and universal" if it was to be the logical product of a benevolent God.
_	In 1994 Captain Universe appeared in a one-shot, coinciding with a promotion, with the claim that readers could have a comic about themselves made for a fee.
_	It is sometimes argued that Ludwig Wittgenstein defended a behaviorist position (e.g., the "beetle in a box" argument)—but while there are important relations between his thought and behaviorism, the claim that he was a behaviorist is quite controversial.
_	The first section introduces the subject of the narrator’s previous life as a bat and asserts the claim that disbelief in reincarnation is proof of not being “a serious person.”
_	Hoffman closed the trial with a speech in which he quoted Abraham Lincoln, making the claim that the president himself, if alive today, would also be arrested in Chicago's Lincoln Park.
_	In 1999, the TTAB issued a decision in which the trademark of the Washington Redskins football team was canceled under this provision, based on the claim that the name Redskins was disparaging to Native Americans.
_	Even the claim that AV would make a big dent in the number of safe seats goes further than the facts support."
_	Wilby noted how both British cunning folk and witches often described similar scenarios for how they had first encountered their familiar: most prominent of these was the claim that the familiar had simply appeared spontaneously whilst they went about their everyday activities, whilst other claims held that the witch or cunning person had inherited it from another magical practitioner, who was usually a family member, or that they had been given it by a more powerful spirit.
_	His campaign included the claim that the University of Wisconsin was rife with atheism, communism, and immorality.
_	He defended his usage of the term with the claim that he was the descendant of aristocrats from Lower Austria and Styria, and that his great-grandfather had abandoned the title to become an inn keeper.
_	In 1977, Alabama Governor George Wallace sued "Screw" for $5 million for publishing the claim that he had learned to perform sexual acts from reading the magazine.
_	Hiltermann called these allegations "mere assertions" and added that "no persuasive evidence of the claim that Iran was the primary culprit was ever presented."
_	He argues that "Kantian feminism" wrongly maintains that "personality is distinct from its bodily form" and thereby ignores the fact that people are identical with their bodies, and fails to recognise that distinctions of gender are "artificial" only in the same sense that the human person is "artificial", and suggests that sociobiology supports the claim that men and women have "distinct psychological dispositions" deriving from the different roles of men and women in sexual reproduction.
_	On the claim that the action south of Arras delayed the German advance by five hours, the official history states:
_	Often used in the sense of natural religion or indigenous religion, the religious behaviour of pre-modern tribal societies such as shamanism, animism and ancestor worship (e.g. Australian aboriginal mythology), the term "Urreligion" has also been used by adherents of various religions to back up the claim that their own religion is somehow "primeval" or "older" than competing traditions.
_	This view that conceives free will to be incompatible with determinism is called "incompatibilism" and encompasses both metaphysical libertarianism, the claim that determinism is false and thus free will is at least possible, and hard determinism, the claim that determinism is true and thus free will is not possible.
_	Regarding the claim that Ayers authored Obama's book, Millican concluded "I feel totally confident that it is false".
_	Based on the interaction between lexical properties, locality, and the properties of the EPP (where a phrasal head selects another phrasal element locally), Hale and Keyser make the claim that the Specifier position or a complement are the only two semantic relations that project a predicate's argument.
_	The initial basis for the change of use was the claim that satisfaction of the criteria sufficed for the diagnosis of the death of the brain as a whole, despite the persistence of demonstrable activity in parts of the brain.
_	Supporting the early date is the claim that Atahualpa was born in Caranqui about 1500 CE.
_	Concerning the claim that "CCNV's demonstration, falls outside the scope of the first amendment" the court wrote in the opinion:
_	Hanson has made the claim that the primary responsibility for the outbreak of the Second World War was not due to Adolf Hitler, but was rather due to the British Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain and the French Premier Édouard Daladier who failed to maintain credible threats of deterrence.
_	On p174 Kahn rejects the claim that the effect of public works will be at the expense of expenditure elsewhere, admitting that this might arise if the revenue was raised by taxation, but says that other means are available which have no such consequences.
_	In chapters 3–8, the author supports the claim that medicine has a method of discovery by giving an account of medicine’s origins and discoveries.
_	Summing up "Captain Scarlet" as "better puppets, bigger action and a huge step backwards in stories" compared to "Thunderbirds", Peel disputes the claim that the next generation of puppets mark a failure on the part of the series, arguing that the increased realism could not have deterred an audience familiar with the previous design.
_	The Court rejected the claim that the contract merely spread the payment for using the patent over a longer period.
_	The 1936 Constitution of the USSR, known as the Fundamental Law of Victorious Socialism, embodied the claim that the foundations for socialism had been laid.
_	In 1998 when asked what the main criticism on REBT was, Albert Ellis replied that it was the claim that it was too rational and not dealing sufficiently enough with emotions.
_	Thomas A. Howe accused BeDuhn of producing insufficient evidence for the claim that it is an idiom.
_	Screw, however, repeatedly denounced the claim that one has to use purple drank to enjoy screwed and chopped music.
_	O'Donnell created a theory out of this, and makes the claim that Fegelein's mistress actually "was" a spy, possibly a Hungarian working for British intelligence.
_	Levin's film draws its inspiration from an encounter he had in a New York taxi not long after 9/11, in which his driver, an Egyptian immigrant, made the claim that the Jews had been warned not to go to work at the World Trade Center on the day of the attack.
_	The court did not find sufficient evidence to back the claim that the furnace had been used for heating.
_	They are also said to have resorted to falsifications and deliberate misinterpretations of history and documents in order to further the claim that there was a consciousness of a separate Macedonian ethnicity before 1944.
_	The incident received national news coverage, with initial reporting including inaccurate information about the event, such as the claim that a CHP car was used to physically block Sikes' vehicle.
_	The Transamerica building was commissioned by Transamerica CEO John (Jack) R. Beckett, with the claim that he wished to allow light in the street below.
_	Therefore, Snopes.com states that the claim that legalization would force drug dogs to be euthanized is a bad-faith argument rooted in logical fallacies that confound police forces experienced in legalized marijuana.
_	Not much has been publicized as controversy surrounds the claim that North Korean nuclear efforts were well advanced before the instructions on enrichment methods uranium were provided.
_	The failure to secure rigorous provenance information casts doubt on the claim that "Aurornis" is 160 million years old and predates "Archaeopteryx".
_	In particular, the claim that niche construction is an evolutionary process has excited controversy.
_	Consider, for example, the claim that the extinction of the dinosaurs was probably caused by a large meteorite hitting the earth.
_	It was also proposed that unused W-class trams could be better utilised by refurbishing and leasing them as "roving ambassadors" to other cities, with the claim that this could generate revenue for investment into the public transport system.
_	In December 1903 he passed the Civil Service Examination, and embarked on the career that led to the claim that he "may be regarded as one of the greatest public servants of his day."
_	It has come into widespread use among non-Christian scholars, and depends on the claim that the form of the faith found in the writings of Paul is different from that found elsewhere in the New Testament, but also that his influence came to predominate.
_	It is known for the claim that homeopathy is an effective, and safer, alternative to vaccination for conditions including whooping cough, along with claims that homeopathy is superior to chemotherapy for cancer.
_	Ambassador Joseph C. Wilson alleged that his wife's identity was covert and that members of the George W. Bush administration knowingly revealed that information as retribution for his New York Times op-ed entitled "What I Didn't Find in Africa," of July 6, 2003, regarding the claim that Saddam Hussein was seeking uranium.
_	He then proceeded to what he regarded as the ‘guts’ of the case: the claim that ‘the plaintiff [had] become identified with the products of the defendants and ...had ...his chances of advertising for other automobile manufacturers seriously affected’.
_	More subfossils found in 1974 added support to the claim that the Rodrigues bird was a distinct genus of starling.
_	In 2002, Stankovski together with Gorje Cenev (who is the head of a planetarium at a Youth Cultural Center in Skopje) published the claim that the site contains a "megalithic observatory and sacred site" (мегалитска опсерваторија и светилиште).
_	The authors tried to justify that with the claim that "claiming or relying on security strength levels above 256 bits is meaningless."
_	In general, "ex silentio" refers to the claim that the absence of something demonstrates the proof of a proposition.
_	Several years ago, the now defunct 007Forever.com website made a detailed case for the claim that Arthur Calder-Marshall was indeed the author behind the R.D. Mascott pseudonym.
_	Authors known for making the claim that João Gonçalves Zarco was of Jewish ancestry are Augusto Mascarenhas Barreto and Manuel Luciano da Silva, who also suggest that Christopher Columbus could have been of Jewish descent from Portugal and his real name was Salvador Fernandes Zarco.
_	His argument begins with the claim that the incest taboo is in effect a prohibition against endogamy, and the effect is to encourage exogamy.
_	Pizzey has been the subject of death threats and boycotts because of her research into the claim that most domestic violence is reciprocal, and that women are equally capable of violence as men.
_	The available evidence appears to support the claim that Mołojec was responsible for Nowotko's murder, but his motivation is unknown.
_	The field was founded on the claim that human intelligence "can be so precisely described that a machine can be made to simulate it".
_	The earliest meta-analysis of UTT, done by Acker, found no support for the claim that UT is superior to CT in complex decision making.
_	In 2004, "Britain's Real Monarch", a documentary broadcast on Channel 4 in the United Kingdom, repeated the claim that Abney-Hastings, as the senior descendant of George Plantagenet, 1st Duke of Clarence, is the rightful King of England.
_	First we show, by induction on formula_87, the claim that formula_88 is formula_89 if formula_90 and is zero if formula_91.
_	cited John Whitmore and challenged the claim that "Ngô " referred to Ming dynasty China but instead referred to the Chinese settled Red River Delta area of Vietnam.
_	The First Austrian Republic angered many Austrian pan-Germans who made the claim that the republic violated the Fourteen Points that were announced by United States President Woodrow Wilson during peace talks, specifically the right to "self-determination" of all nations.
_	Josephson-Storm also rejects conspiracy theories surrounding Bacon and does not make the claim that Bacon was an active Rosicrucian.
_	Colbert made the claim that because of "the Colbert bump", he was responsible for Mike Huckabee's success in the 2008 presidential race.
_	Paul Krugman, writing in 2014, clarified that it refers to "the claim that underlying changes in the economy, such as slowing growth in the working-age population, have made episodes like the past five years in Europe and the United States, and the last 20 years in Japan, likely to happen often.
_	Of the "September Dossier", Blair conceded that he should have corrected media reports that the "45 minute claim" referred to weapons of mass destruction but he "stood by" the claim that Iraq's possession of WMD was "beyond doubt".
_	Experiments from Waxman and Gelman as well as Markman and Hutchinson provide results which support the claim that children show preference for categorical relations over random hypothesizing when learning new nouns.
_	In 2012 "The Economist" reviewed the project and concluded "the evidence does not yet support the claim that the millennium villages project is making a decisive impact."
_	The campaign makes the claim that investment in the arts industry will lead, through various direct and indirect channels, to a better economy for North Carolina.
_	Additionally, this section argues against the claim that women permit or are responsible for their oppression.
_	Additionally, Cory Doctorow made the claim that the project was in fact a legal means of bypassing digital rights management.
_	The content of the hidden book and scrolls, in addition to the fact that the weapons can only be damaged and broken when used against each other, was the source of the claim that whoever possesses the Dragon Saber will rule the world and yet only the one who possesses the Heaven Sword can stand against the wielder of the Saber.
_	On 15 May 2005, the publication of ""Speight of Violence,"" coauthored by Baba, his wife Unaisi Nabobo-Baba (a fellow USP academic (at the time) now (2011) of the University of Guam) and journalist Michael Field, generated controversy with the claim that Mahendra Chaudhry had promised him the Prime Ministership before and during the 1999 election campaign, and that Chaudhry had reneged on that promise.
_	An important dialogue features a comment by Deputy Solicitor General Paul Clement which denies the claim that the United States uses torture:
_	Another consequence of the model is the claim that by advancing towards one of the goals, one is moving away from the other two.
_	The displays include miscellaneous parts from Richard Pearse's experimental aircraft, (together with research supporting the claim that he made uncontrolled hops/flights prior to the Wright brothers), a replica of the craft which was flown and his third aircraft (an attempt at a VTOL tilt rotor craft).
_	In 2009, Greg Hickok published an extensive argument against the claim that mirror neurons are involved in action-understanding: "Eight Problems for the Mirror Neuron Theory of Action Understanding in Monkeys and Humans."
_	The new category received worldwide media attention, refuting the claim that pole dance is designed for the amusement of men.
_	However, contemporary Italian historians doubt the claim that he was mentally unstable.
_	However, Foot points out that although the book and the timing of its publication would be compatible with the claim for it as being a major factor, the claim that it caused change would be much harder to support.
_	Another is the claim that most Ethiopians can trace their ancestry to multiple ethnic groups, including the last self-proclaimed emperor Haile Selassie I and his Empress Itege Menen Asfaw of Ambassel.
_	A number of authors have repeated the claim that Reinhardt's nickname, Django, is Romani for "I awake"; however, it may also simply have been a diminutive, or local Walloon version, of "Jean".
_	In the case of Bakunin, in a letter written in December 1871, he made the claim that Jews were a "collective parasite", and claimed that "this world is presently, at the disposal of Marx on the one hand and the Rothschilds on the other," putting a conspiratorial spin on this theme as part of his rivalry with the Marxian socialists in the First International.
_	However, the company voluntarily altered its label to remove the claim that the product was formaldehyde-free, saying it "is committed to ensuring that its products comply with all applicable legal and regulatory standards and seeks to partner with the FDA to achieve this result".
_	To support the claim that a strigil may have been viewed as a tiara or wreath, there was a fifth-century grave that had a strigil across the forehead of a corpse.
_	"We have to realize that a unified theory of the physical world simply does not exist" says Feyerabend, "We have theories that work in restricted regions, we have purely formal attempts to condense them into a single formula, we have lots of unfounded claims (such as the claim that all of chemistry can be reduced to physics), phenomena that do not fit into the accepted framework are suppressed; in physics, which many scientists regard as the one really basic science, we have now at least three different points of view...without a promise of conceptual (and not only formal) unification".
_	Not only did the jury find Jackson not liable for any damages, they rejected the claim that he attacked the plaintiff with a bottle, found the plaintiff liable for defamation and malicious prosecution, and awarded Jackson $225,000 in damages.
_	The police minister Bechor-Shalom Sheetrit rejected the claim that the woman had cancer.
_	Despite these attempts, the Palatinate's representatives to the Bavarian Parliament always prided themselves on the claim that they came from a more progressive region.
_	For example, the reference to Margaret Thatcher was replaced by the claim that Helmut Schmidt promoted climate change to justify the construction of nuclear power plants in Germany.
_	The USDOT stated that it needed more time to review issues raised by various labour unions, such as the claim that Norwegian Air UK would violate labour laws by employing flight crew based in East Asia.
_	Still others make the claim that children are too young to make this decision for themselves and should consult their parents prior to revealing anything personal to their teachers.
_	In the 1930s Dubois made the claim that "Pithecanthropus" was built like a "giant gibbon", a much misinterpreted attempt by Dubois to prove that it was the "missing link".
_	The version which has assumed canonical status among Mormon fundamentalists was compiled by Joseph W. Musser in 1929, and includes the claim that Smith's appearance was followed by an "eight hour meeting" on September 27, 1886, at which President Taylor put five men (Woolley and his father, George Q. Cannon, Samuel Bateman, and Charles Henry Wilcken) under covenant to ensure that "no year passed by without children being born in the principle of plural marriage."
_	He criticized Duesberg for the way he responded to "new evidence and contrary arguments", giving as an example the way Duesberg repeated the claim that "HIV is found in far too few blood cells of AIDS patients to be a plausible destroyer of the immune system" despite more recent evidence showing "much higher blood levels of the virus".
_	In response to the claim that he had criticised Benedict XVI, Pell confirmed he was stating what the Pope already mentioned himself, and his comments were "not breaking any ground".
_	PIIE challenges the claim that ISDS "arbitrators lack integrity", noting that arbitrators take an oath of impartiality and both sides of a case choose arbitrators.
_	Luther based his case on the claim that the Dorr government was the legitimate government of Rhode Island, and that Borden's violation of his home constituted a private act lacking legal authority.
_	Against the claim that the Radical Republicans had done a poor job at the constitutional conventions and during the first decade of Reconstruction, Du Bois observes that after the Democrats regained power in 1876, they did not change the Reconstruction constitutions for nearly a quarter century.
_	Closely linked to this idea was the claim that the earth was divided unfairly among the Great Powers, leaving the Germans possessing little land compared to the less populous European nations.
_	Demands in Britain, for example by the Marxist John Desmond Bernal, for centrally planned scientific research led Polanyi to defend the claim that science requires free debate.
_	One reason, emphasized by Friedrich Hayek, is the claim that many of the true forces shaping the economy can never be captured in a single plan.
_	Thus, the spatial coordinates in the Rindler chart have a very simple interpretation consistent with the claim that the Rindler observers are mutually stationary.
_	It closed after only eleven performances with the claim that Viardot and Battaille had other engagements, but poor ticket sales were undoubtedly the deciding factor.
_	Some have made the claim that Saint John Wall was born in the Hall in 1620.
_	He denies the claim that “such conditions are an inevitable part of a state care system,” pointing to the reformed VA as an example.
_	In 1855, in the last of three patent disputes with fellow British rubber pioneer, Stephen Moulton, Hancock's patent was challenged with the claim that Hancock had copied Goodyear.
_	The point of departure for Choi Suchol’s fiction is the claim that genuine communication has become impossible in the print culture of the modern age, and he is known for the abstruse quality of his works.
_	The Select Committee's report said "The Government's desire to use the Class of a particular drug to send out a signal to potential users or dealers does not sit comfortably with the claim that the primary objective of the classification system is to categorise drugs according to the comparative harm associated with their misuse.
_	Unlike criminal syndicates, the extensive nature of these illegal endeavors, and the claim that they are directed and sanctioned by the highest levels of government, has led to the nature of the North Korean state being defined as a form of "criminal sovereignty" by foreign policy experts such as Paul Rexton Kan and Bruce Bechtol.
_	Wang appeared before the skeptic audience July 2014 with the claim that he could send energy through his hand using a type of therapeutic touch.
_	Ianto encounters the spirit of his father, with the claim that he, Ianto's mother, Owen, Toshiko and Lisa will all be resurrected if Ianto betrays Jack.
_	In 2013, the original source of the allegation blaming foreign dumping for the material found in Agbogbloshie recanted, or rather stated it had never made the claim that 80% of US e-waste is exported.
_	On his television show, "The 700 Club", Robertson said, "We're sad to see any evangelical leader fall" and also said the claim that the NAE represents thirty million people "just isn't true...
_	Falk undertook a study in 2005 which supported the claim that the find represented a new species.
_	Afterward, however, Judge Jacqueline Connor vacated the verdicts, saying she had made a “fatal error” in not recognizing that jurors might have misread some "jargon" in the police report that unintentionally lent support to the claim that the officers had lied.
_	This revelation resulted in a shift in the Navy's position on the incident, and Admiral Frank Kelso, the Chief of Naval Operations at the time, publicly apologized to the Hartwig family, concluding that there was no real evidence to support the claim that he had intentionally killed the other sailors.
_	He also campaigned using the claim that a Labour Government would increase the cost of a pint of beer by 24p; however, the Labour candidate, David Kidney, portrayed Cameron as "a right-wing Tory".
_	He argues that when the implications of this claim are fully worked out, it follows that every rational agent must also accept the claim that all prospective purposive agents have a moral right to freedom and well-being.
_	These results support the claim that visual dominance occurs at a sensory level, before the engagement of attention.
_	The Tanners, who do make the claim that the LDS Church practiced “blood atonement” in the 19th century, state, “[u]nfortunately, The God Makers II has presented the material concerning blood atonement in a way that has caused many people to believe that the Mormon (LDS) Church is still involved in the practice”.
_	It dismissed the claim that the purchase agreement had been annulled before it was finalized.
_	This supports the claim that the occurrence of congenital amusia cannot be explained by a lack of environmental stimulation.
_	Both officers rejected the claim that they had been involved.
_	Michael F. Strmiska comments that despite the claim that Scandinavia was home to the last pagans in Europe, within the scene: "A point of particular pride is the knowledge that Lithuania was the last country in all of Europe to officially abandon its native Pagan traditions and convert to Christianity in 1387."
_	A number of scholars rejected the claim that Operation Brother's Keeper constitutes collective punishment under international law:
_	The school asserted that their due process rights had been violated because there were no evidentiary hearings to determine the validity of the claim that they inappropriately recruited football players.
_	The district court and court of appeals opinions do not support the claim that a health or safety problem existed.
_	Extensive existing earthworks around the chapel ruin suggest other buildings were also present, but the claim that "modern archaeological field investigations (have) uncovered no evidence of any buildings other than the chapel in the area...(and) that the antiquarian report mistook the remains of Medieval 'ridge and furrow' farming as the overgrown walls and earthworks of another ruined building, " lacks credibility to anyone making a visit and examining the earthworks present at the site, which by no means resemble the remains of ridge and furrow farming as stated.
_	Irving labelled the gas chambers at Auschwitz a "hoax", and writing in the third person declared that he "has placed himself [Irving] at the head of a growing band of historians, worldwide, who are now sceptical of the claim that at Auschwitz and other camps were 'factories of death', in which millions of innocent people were systematically gassed to death".
_	Two men set up shop at the resort with the claim that they were liquidating the property's assets for its creditors, but they had no connection to the investors or the resort.
_	Khedekar's history made the claim that Yadavs were descendants of the Abhira tribe and that the modern Yadavs were the same community referred to as dynasties in the "Mahabharata" and "Puranas".
_	By the end of the 18th century in England the claim that animals were made only for man's use (anthropocentrism) was still being advanced, but no longer carried general assent.
_	The York abbot successfully challenged the claim that the priory had not met Romfar's conditions and used the confirmation of the endowment by Henry I to maintain possession.
_	In 1991 the "Star" featured in the film "JFK", with the claim that the 23 November 1963 edition of the "Star", shown in the film, had published details of Lee Harvey Oswald's which the "Star" could only have had access to if they were pre-packaged before the assassination.
_	No scientific data support the claim that mercury compounds in vaccine preservatives cause autism or its symptoms.
_	The similarities are that both theories reject the claim that voters are rational and well-informed, and both theories claim that democracy does not function well.
_	In this tradition, Steve Keen makes the claim that "value" refers to "the innate worth of a commodity, which determines the normal ('equilibrium') ratio at which two commodities exchange."
_	Graf von Soltikow as he liked to call himself (his real name was Walter Bennecke and he was not an aristocrat) was a self-promoting former SS officer who had specialized in writing anti-Semitic tracts during the era of the Third Reich, and after the war he engaged in much sensationalist journalism, usually with the claim that he was boldly revealing "secrets" that no one else dared to mention.
_	Martin Rudoy Scherzinger, another twentieth-century ethnomusicologist, contests the claim that copyright law is inherently conducive to exploitation of non-Westerners by Western musicologists for a variety of reasons some of which he quotes from other esteemed ethnomusicologists: some non-Western pieces are uncopyrightable because they are orally passed down, some “sacred songs are issued forth by ancient spirits or gods” giving them no other to obtain copyright, and the concept of copyright may only be relevant in “commercially oriented societies”.
_	It believes that such opposition is important in countering anti-semitism and the claim that opposition to Israel's policies is itself anti-semitic.
_	This reinforces the claim that the waters trapped within the edifice never vapourised, which they would do if the pressure had fallen sufficiently to allow the super-heated water to flash into steam.
_	The gist of the letter was the claim that they never insulted the image and legacy of Comrade Tito thus denying media reports claiming otherwise and labeling them "monstrous lies".
_	In each of its four strophes Bernger sings of happiness and fulfilled love before ending with the claim that he was lying.
_	The former condemned the use of Ulric Dahlgren's corpse as a carnival attraction and the latter accused Lincoln's government of wanting to conduct indiscriminate pillage and slaughter on Virginia civilians, including the claim that Kilpatrick wanted to free Union prisoners and turn them loose on the women of Richmond.
_	For example, Robert Brandom has appropriated the terms rationalist expressivism and rationalist pragmatism as labels for aspects of his programme in "Articulating Reasons", and identified linguistic rationalism, the claim that the content of propositions "are essentially what can serve as both premises and conclusions of inferences", as a key thesis of Wilfred Sellars.
_	The anthropologist fills in with comparisons to other cultures and is forced to rely on theories that have no evidential basis, the old notion of universal stages of development or the claim that cultural resemblances are based on some unrecognized past contact between groups.
_	Physicalism, in at least one rough sense, is the claim that the entire world may be described and explained using the laws of nature, in other words, that all phenomena are natural phenomena.
_	Despite this criticism, Evans wrote against Habermas that "no serious reading" of Hillgruber's essay could support the claim that Hitler had forced the Holocaust "against the will" of the other Nazi leaders.
_	Unfortunately, to date, there is no data to support the claim that any particular type of helmet or protective equipment reduces the risk of sports-related concussion.
_	It references federally-funded studies in the United States and news footage to support the claim that healthcare workers are afraid to speak up when medical errors occur in hospitals.
_	Shelburne County (in which Clark's Harbour is located) is generally accepted as the lobster capital of Nova Scotia (and a nearby sign boasts the claim that it is the Lobster Capital of Canada).
_	It is further opposed by the fact that King's College London itself claims only to be the fourth oldest university in England and by the claim that a charter and legal incorporation are not necessary for a university.
_	Most of his claims were disregarded by the Church with the exception of the claim that Galileo's Letter on Sunspots was heretical.
_	The Case That Barack Obama Is Not Eligible to Be President is a book by Jerome Corsi which promotes the claim that then U.S. president Barack Obama was not a natural-born citizen of the United States and was thus constitutionally unqualified to hold the office.
_	In his "catalogue raisonné", Hulsker considers the claim that the radical changes now evident in Vincent's work were a result of Gauguin's influence and the Synthetic Symbolism style of painting, a fusion of Neo-Impressionism, Japonisme, and Pont Aven Symbolism, that he developed with Émile Bernard.
_	Regarding evolution, he accepts the claim that all life on earth came about by a process of evolution (descent with modification) from the first cell, but is open to the possibility that God might have guided this process at various points.
_	He is skeptical of the claim that all the complex biological structures we find in living things can be fully explained by blind, unguided chance plus natural selection, and thus thinks that the issue of whether Darwinian evolution (without God's guiding control) can adequately account for the structure of life should be vigorously explored.
_	He noted the claim that Adam came from India, and went on to Babylon.
_	No Frankenberger was registered in Graz during that period, and no record has been produced of Leopold Frankenberger's existence, so historians dismiss the claim that Alois's father was Jewish.
_	Angel dusting is a process where an ingredient which would be beneficial, in a reasonable quantity, is instead added in an insignificant quantity which will have no consumer benefit, so they can make the claim that it contains that ingredient, and mislead the consumer into expecting that they will gain the benefit.
_	The Court explained that if "an informant is shown to be right about some things, he is probably right about other facts that he has alleged, including the claim that the object of the tip is engaged in criminal activity."
_	In 2007, an article published by "The New York Times" supported the claim that founding editor Matthiessen was in the CIA but stated that the magazine was used as a cover, rather than a collaborator, for his spying activities.
_	In a letter dated 11 June 1977 to the Guinness Book of World Records, Rafi had challenged the claim that Lata Mangeshkar has recorded the highest number of songs ("not less than 25,000" according to Guinness).
_	Torres' victory in the pageant caused some controversy because of the claim that she was still a minor; however, Torres had turned 18 several months before the contest.
_	Experiments in mice also support the claim that CMM disorder is associated with genetic mutations in "DCC".
_	The long-term monitoring program has found an increase in incidences of coral disease in the period 1999–2002, although they dispute the claim that on the Great Barrier Reef, coral diseases are caused by anthropogenic pollution.
_	They also make the claim that the document "Ordinatio Sacerdotalis" does not provide historical facts sufficient to ensure the infallibility of the Catholic Church's Magisterium, nor any indication of how the historical facts claimed by the Church were verified.
_	Before the case could go to discovery, CEI and "National Review" filed a court motion to dismiss it under anti-SLAPP legislation, with the claim that they had merely been using exaggerated language which was acceptable against a public figure.
_	The director, Gabriela Cowperthwaite, argued that the claim that the orca had targeted Brancheau because she had worn her hair in a long ponytail was conjecture and that "there had to be more to this story".
_	This historical Arappally, thus, stands as a piece of evidence to the claim that there were Christians in this Thiruvithamcode region from the first century onwards.
_	In a telephone interview, al-Marri told reporters he was detained at Heathrow Airport on 23 February 2009, on the claim that his visa application had not stated that he was a former Guantanamo captive.
_	Zitelmann ended his article with the claim that "Irving must not be ignored.
_	This is only one controversy over immigrants in the United States, another is the claim that immigrants are stealing "true Americans'" jobs.
_	The research in question does not find a solution in many approaches of "recognizing cognitive bias" but instead indicate that such assumptions are part of the problem by promoting the myth of one's own group having overcome its bias by institutional means and allegations of rational critical arguments being due to bias in the minds of critics, citing evolutionary research that shows that not only would any predisposition for justification of views be selected against due to costing nutrients without improving adaptivity of behavior, but that the claim that most adult humans are irrational due to missing stimulation of rationality in early childhood is also evolutionarily indefensible as genes for potential rationality would have been totally eliminated by selection before reaching significant population fraction if they needed a society already promoting rationality to manifest themselves adaptively.
_	Particularly after Merkel's party suffered losses in the 2017 election and there were delays in forming a government, the claim that Merkel is the true leader of the free world was referred to as a "joke", described as a media phenomenon, and otherwise called into question.
_	According to author Roger E. Riendeau, Shipp Corporation is one of the few businesses that can truly make the claim that they built Mississauga.
_	Although Shiite historians generally reject the claim that Hasan al-Askari fathered children other than Muhammad al-Mahdi, the Shiite hadith book "Usul al-Kafi", in Bab Mawlid Abi Muhammad al-Hasan b. 'Ali confirms the Sufi claim that Hasan al-Askari had more than one wife, in addition to slave girls, with whom he had relations.
_	The theory has sometimes been used by Jewish authors such as Arthur Koestler as part of an argument against traditional forms of antisemitism (for example the claim that "the Jews killed Christ"), just as similar arguments have been advanced on behalf of the Crimean Karaites.
_	As Henry Louis Gates, Jr, has said, "it is fair to describe the subtext of the history of black letters as this urge to refute the claim that because blacks had no written traditions they were bearers of an inferior culture."
_	However, the claim that the throne room was actually located on the second floor has its drawbacks.
_	The identification is based in part on the description of his death, which is very similar to Agrippa's death in Josephus's Antiquities of the Jews 19.8.2, although Josephus does not include the claim that "an angel of the Lord struck him down, and he was eaten by worms."
_	Statistical analyses have challenged modernisation theory by demonstrating that there is no reliable evidence for the claim that democracy is more likely to emerge when countries become wealthier, more educated, or less unequal.
_	Itō was especially critical of the way that most Japanese people automatically deferred to the state and accepted the claim that the emperor was a god who had to be obeyed unconditionally, leading her to complain that it was very difficult to get most people to think critically.
_	The BC Assembly of First Nations endorsed the claims of the local people as a First Nation in 2008, supporting the claim that the people of Kelly Lake were wrongly missed during the enumeration of peoples living within the Treaty 8 area.
_	Justice White noted that history did not support the claim that Arabs and other present-day "Caucasians" were considered to be a single race for the purposes of section 1981.
_	In even the most basal avialian, "Archaeopteryx", there is no vestige of the fifth metacarpal and its presence in "Protoavis" seems incongruous with the claim that it is a bird, let alone one more derived than "Archaeopteryx".
_	Inspired by the Madrigal works of Elizabethan author Thomas Weelkes, the project expands on the Oxfordian theory of Shakespeare authorship – the claim that Edward de Vere wrote the plays and poems traditionally attributed to William Shakespeare – by alleging that Weelkes was another pseudonym used by de Vere, and that the music of Weelkes could be seen as scores to Shakespeare's plays.
_	Similar arguments were made at the time by American anti-racist activist, Sharon Smith, who added the claim that Muslim women in France opposing the 2004 law were fighting against the same "state-imposed oppression" as women in Afghanistan were opposing by seeking freedom to choose to refrain from wearing burkas.
_	Supporting the claim that these three Pomo tribelets were the occupants of the territory is the fact that there are over 80 archaeological sites that have been identified within the Laguna's historic marshlands as being Pomo.
_	Since the Hinkley groundwater contamination lawsuit, a group of California-based scientists who are part of organizations such as the Desert Sierra Cancer Surveillance Program (DSCSP) and ChemRisk have aggressively argued against the claim that chromium-VI is genotoxic, to downplay the number of cancer cases and to challenge that there was a "cancer cluster in the Hinkley area."
_	The first mention of it is by Origen of Alexandria in the early 3rd century, who says the text, like that of a Gospel of Peter, was of dubious, recent appearance and shared with that book the claim that the "brethren of the Lord" were sons of Joseph by a former wife.
_	However, the claim that Dillon and Ormonde (who was a Protestant) knew of the planned rebellion in adcance has never been proved.
_	He was featured in "Ripley's Believe It or Not!" with the claim that he "can hold 7 baseballs in one hand."
_	Religions vary greatly in their response to the standard argument against free will and thus might appeal to any number of responses to the paradox of free will, the claim that omniscience and free will are incompatible.
_	He comes to this conclusion through the claim that Kyd indicates this by "the epilogue, which presents the apotheosis of Hieronimo and his accomplice, Bel-imperia, as well as Horatio and Isabella, in the pagan underworld".
_	Another response to the claim that the books promote the religion of witchcraft, which has been raised as much by Christians critical of the books as those who support them, is that, far from promoting religion, the books do not promote religion in any way.
_	However, historian Roger Griffin rejects the claim that Nazism was primarily pagan, noting that although there were some influential neo-paganists in the Nazi Party, such as Heinrich Himmler and Alfred Rosenberg, they represented a minority and their views did not influence Nazi ideology beyond its use for symbolism.
_	At the top, high-ranking members of the Communist Party were arrested and executed under the claim that they had plotted against Stalin (and in some cases they were forced to confess to imaginary crimes in show trials).
_	Some of their descendants prefer to refer to themselves by their respective tribal names and reject the name "Yokuts" with the claim that it is an exonym invented by English speaking settlers and historians.
_	Can an assorted collection of this kind serve as a basis for serious scholarly analysis, the starting point for the claim that poor Hitler was so frightened by the “Asiatic deeds” of the Bolsheviks that he started to exterminate Jewish children?
_	He refuted the claim that SEC officiating crews were trying to help Alabama and Florida remain undefeated, adding that, “I think that takes these issues to a place that really doesn’t make sense”.
_	Peter Heather is skeptical of the claim that Ermanaric ruled all Goths except the Tervingi, and furthermore points to the fact that such an enormous empire would have been larger than any known Gothic political unit, that it would have left bigger traces in the sources and that the sources on which the claim is based are not nearly reliable enough to be taken at face value.
_	There is also the claim that Ecbatana used to be the city of Tabriz, which is one of the historical capitals of Iran and the present capital of East Azerbaijan province.
_	The " Times" noted that the FBI at the time did not publicly reveal the on-going investigation into the Trump campaign, in part so as not to hurt his electoral chances, contradicting the claim that the probe was an attempt to undermine Trump.
_	The article refers to Eichmann's offer to "sell a million Jews", as related by the American relief worker Joel Brand, to support the claim that the Nazis at first tried to get rid of the Jewish population by expelling them and that no other countries were prepared to receive them, as these other countries were confronted with the same problems concerning their petite bourgeoisie.
_	DeMause's central argument is that, in the past, the astronomical infanticidal ratios among the tribes gives the lie to the claim that the diverse cultures are basically equal.
_	Traditionally, he was recognised as the first person to make practical experiments with steam to propel a vessel; but evidence to substantiate the claim that he did more than propose a steam vessel on paper is lacking.
_	Thompson further disputes the claim that the woman in the film was actually wearing a wig.
_	The Tommy Westphall universe hypothesis makes the claim that not only does "St. Elsewhere" take place within Tommy's mind, but so do numerous other television series which are directly and indirectly connected to "St. Elsewhere" through fictional crossovers and spin-offs, resulting in a large fictional universe taking place entirely within Tommy's mind.
_	Central to the case was the claim that the "'super' due process rights" afforded to teachers in New York and elsewhere in the country through various teacher tenure regulations create an unreasonable barrier for administrators who wish to fire ineffective teachers, ultimately affecting the outcome of students' educations.
_	The parallel was also expressed in other ways, as U.S. Navy observers noted that the quality of the fittings, both mechanical and domestic, was comparable throughout to that of a large cruiser: the crew cabins were all generously wood-panelled and comfortably air-conditioned, features that were rationalized with the claim that they would protect the crew from the heat of a metal hull under tropical skies.
_	In this book, Armstrong makes the claim that the peoples of the United States, the British Commonwealth nations, and the nations of Northwestern Europe are descendants of the Ten Lost Tribes of Israel.
_	"Der Marineoffizier" ended with the claim that combating "Jewish materialism" was one of a good officer's principal duties, and this was best done by making "...
_	The article is highly critical of the evidence cited to support the claim that Flight 77 did not hit the Pentagon, and it criticizes the controlled demolition hypothesis of the World Trade Center claiming that, "Demolition professionals say controlled demolition of the Towers that day would have been impossible."
_	Olav II and Harald III ascend to power, is there any weight given to the claim that the successor was predestined by some rules of inheritance and not simply through force.
_	Quant herself is ambivalent about the claim that she invented the miniskirt, stating that her customers should take credit, as she herself wore very short skirts, and they requested even shorter hemlines for themselves.
_	These associations also argued that there was no scientific basis for the claim that the parents' sexual orientation would cause developmental problems for their adopted children.
_	However, it attained its greatest prominence during the Elizabethan era, when English and Welsh writers wrote of the claim that Madoc had come to the Americas as an assertion of prior discovery, and hence legal possession, of North America by the Kingdom of England.
_	(Thus denying the claim that something is fancy).
_	The easiness effect is the claim that as a result of science popularization laypeople develop an overconfident scientific understanding.
_	However, there are no grounds for the claim that Lixus was founded at the end of the second millennium BC.
_	"The Hollywood Reporter"s Frank Scheck called the documentary "painfully unendurable" and that D'Souza's new film was more "hyperbolic and hysterical" than his past films, particularly with the claim that "Democrats... are merely fascists and Nazis, minus the cool iconography".
_	This one-to-one correspondence unequivocally refutes the claim that Euclidean prs’s are "non signed" sequences and that the signs of their polynomials can be changed arbitrarily.
_	Recovering from its performance in the 1937 elections, the Muslim League was finally able to make good on the claim that it and Jinnah alone represented India's Muslims and Jinnah quickly interpreted this vote as a popular demand for a separate homeland.
_	Sakya and Kagyu scholars argued against the claim that students using Svatantrika do not achieve the same realization as those using the Prasangika approach; According to those critics, there is no difference in the realization of those using the Svatantrika and Prasangika approaches.
_	It has been argued that sound scientific support is lacking for the claim that the specified purely bedside tests have the power to diagnose true and total death of the brainstem, the necessary condition for the assumption of permanent loss of the intrinsically untestable consciousness-arousal function of those elements of the reticular formation which lie within the brainstem (there are elements also within the higher brain).
_	Bill Alexander, who prosecuted Ruby for Oswald's murder, equally rejected any suggestions that Ruby was part-and-parcel of organized crime, claiming that conspiracy theorists based it on the claim that "A knew B, and Ruby knew B back in 1950, so he must have known A, and that must be the link to the conspiracy."
_	Ferguson, on the other hand, bases his interpretation of the allegory on the claim that the cave is an allegory of human nature and that it symbolizes the opposition between the philosopher and the corruption of the prevailing political condition.
_	The American chemist John William Draper wrote a "History of the Conflict between Religion and Science" (1874), employing the claim that the early Church fathers thought the Earth was flat as evidence of the hostility of the Church to the advancement of science.
_	Another oft-repeated error is the claim that the songs are by Loonis McGlohan and Alec Wilder.
_	The book makes the claim that Caratacus and his family was converted to Christianity and that he founded "the royal family of ancient Britain,— of whom her present Majesty, Queen Victoria, is, through the Tudors, the lineal blood representative."
_	Nichifor voices the belief that priests crossing one's path will produce bad luck, as well as the claim that Jewish apothecaries sold "poisons".
_	They cite these documents to support the claim that Magdoff was involved in espionage.
_	Thus, "fallibilism" has been used to describe the claim that:
_	J.B. Handley said of Andrew Wakefield, originator of the claim that the MMR vaccine causes autism: "To our community, Andrew Wakefield is Nelson Mandela and Jesus Christ rolled up into one.
_	As various studies indicate, changes in body composition, perceptions of physical attractiveness, and overall body condition provide inferential support for the claim that body image is related to an individual’s self-esteem and perceived worth.
_	Additional analysis performed on satellite imagery of Fritchie Marsh during 2004 and again in 2005 also supported the claim that this devastation was a direct result of Hurricane Katrina.
_	On 1 February 2010 the Gaza-based "Palestine Telegraph", of which Baroness Jenny Tonge was a patron at that time, published the claim that the Israel Defense Forces in Haiti were secretly harvesting organs and selling them on the black market, based on the above-mentioned YouTube video by T. West, re-using video material from Hezbollah's Al-Manar television broadcast with no cited evidence.
_	An inscription mentioning the name of Kakatiya's greatest king Pratap Rudra on Pachala Someswara temple supports the claim that these temples were erected for the greater glory of the Kakatiya ruler's favorite god, Shiva.
_	An example of this is the claim that geological strata are dated through the fossils they hold, but that fossils are in turn dated by the strata they are in.
_	Edzard Ernst has written "the claim that Carctol is of any benefit to cancer patients is not supported by scientific evidence".
_	Russell gave the book a positive review, calling it "an extensive, careful historical analysis of the claim that Western standards of rationality and morality are masculine in orientation".
_	Roosevelt's attribution of the phrase to "a West African proverb" was seen at the time as evidence of Roosevelt’s "prolific" reading habits, but the claim that it originated in West Africa has been disputed.
_	After Wei became chancellor in 870 due to his marriage with Emperor Yizong's favorite daughter Princess Tongchang, Wei carried out a series of reprisals against officials who he felt had slighted him, and in 872, as part of the reprisals against the chancellor Yu Cong, Wei also had Xiao exiled under the claim that Xiao was a close associate of Yu's, to be the military advisor to the prefect of Bo Prefecture (播州, in modern Zunyi, Guizhou).
_	There is no evidence to substantiate the claim that Brooks ceased painting after 1925.
_	In 2007, the Advertising Standards Authority in the UK told Colgate that it could no longer make the claim that 4 out of 5 dentists recommended Colgate.
_	His books include Fog a Dox, a book for young adults that won the Prime Minister's Literary Awards in 2013, "Convincing Ground" about the Convincing Ground massacre, and "Dark Emu", a book that challenges the claim that pre-colonial Australian Aboriginal peoples were hunter-gatherers.
_	Publicity material for Cole's single instead makes the claim that Johnny Mercer recommended ahbez to Cole on behalf of Capitol Records.
_	This changed during the fifteenth century, when humanist Latin scholars such as Cardinal Nicholas of Cusa noticed bizarre anachronisms (such as the claim that Clement I had based the preeminence of local churches on the presence of pagan high priests).
_	Augustine then analyzes the relationship between eloquence and teaching, including various stylistic points, a discussion of inspiration, and the claim that eloquence and teaching are both to be valued.
_	Furthermore, the claim that Ramtha led an army of 2.5 million contradicts estimates of the world population at 33,000 BC, and her claims of clairvoyant, telepathic, telekinetic and other ESP abilities, for which there is no scientific support, have been heavily criticized by skeptics and scientific communities.
_	Paul Krugman, writing in 2014, clarified that it refers to "the claim that underlying changes in the economy, such as slowing growth in the working-age population, have made episodes like the past five years in Europe and the United States, and the last 20 years in Japan, likely to happen often.
_	Theoretically, higher blood-glucuronides should help remove toxins from the body, leading to the claim that energy drinks are detoxifying.
_	(p. 113) A plausible but difficult to prove claim, as is the claim that mass extinction regimes are species selection regimes.
_	Repudiating the claim that Schoenberg was "an inevitable historical force", Popper dismissed the idea of wishing to do work "ahead of its time" as "nothing but historicist propaganda" .
_	In this last case, Schiff's attorneys again asked that the court consider the claim that Schiff had a mental disorder relating to his beliefs about taxes.
_	In addition, Elliott questioned the claim that Chinese society was traumatized by the Western victories, as many Chinese peasants (90% of the population at that time) living outside the concessions continued about their daily lives, uninterrupted and without any feeling of "humiliation".
_	The story, related in some histories, that he stole documents from Washington's headquarters, during the retreat from the Battle of Long Island, is entirely fictional, as is the claim that he was the grandson of Sir Lyonel Playters, 6th Baronet of Sotterley.
_	Laudan is particularly well known for his pessimistic induction argument against the claim that the cumulative success of science shows that science must really describe how the world really is.
_	Since the discovery of SRT1720, the claim that this compound is a SIRT1 activator has been questioned
_	The final question is "What is your response to the claim that the Government has wiped out decades of advances for its workers?", with the government responding:
_	Regarding the claim that all humans exhibit certain patterns of mind, Percival argues that these common patterns could be explained by common environments (i.e. by shared nurture, not nature).
_	"Neilson" upheld a patent on using heated air to oxidize carbon in cast iron in a Bessemer Converter against the claim that it was just a patent on the idea or principle that heating the injected air makes a blast furnace work better.
_	Binary economics rejects the claim that neoclassical economics alone promotes a 'free market' which is free, fair and efficient.
_	He maintained his belief that Holocaust denial does not benefit the Islamic Republic of Iran and he repeated the claim that the contest was the work of an NGO and not any government agency.
_	Other reviews came to similar conclusions, with a 2006 review in the "Canadian Journal of Neurological Sciences" stating that there is no convincing evidence to support the claim that thimerosal has a causal role in autism, and a 2009 review in the journal "Clinical Infectious Diseases" stating that claims that mercury can cause autism are "biologically implausible".
_	Fingleton's brother supported the claim that Bradman was responsible, repeating in 1997 the alleged view of Corbett that Bradman provided the information.
_	The Stonewall Inn was Mafia-owned and there were 200 people inside when the raid began shortly after Midnight with plainclothes officers presenting a search warrant citing the claim that liquor was being sold illegally at the bar.
_	The yolk is mostly extracellular to the oolemma, being not accumulated inside the cytoplasm of the egg cell (as occurs in frogs), contrary to the claim that the avian egg cell (in strict sense) and its yolk are a single giant cell.
_	Such medallions were one of the Renaissance motifs introduce to English Gothic architecture when Henry VIII was rebuilding Hampton Court and supporting the claim that the English Renaissance was little more than Gothic architecture with Renaissance ornament.
_	Irving's response to the claim that Hitler ordered the Holocaust in "The Eichmann Memoirs" was to claim that Eichmann wrote his memoirs in 1956 at the time of the Suez War, and was fearful that Cairo, Egypt might fall to Israel.
_	In this way, Irving argued that "The Eichmann Memoirs" were genuine but that the claim that Hitler ordered the Holocaust was false — made only to reduce Eichmann's responsibility for the Holocaust.
_	Principal criticisms of memetics include the claim that memetics ignores established advances in other fields of cultural study, such as sociology, cultural anthropology, cognitive psychology, and social psychology.
_	Reference is made to the United Nations FAO 2006 report, Livestock's Long Shadow, which makes the claim that livestock agriculture produces more greenhouse gasses than all the world's vehicles combined.
_	A 2017 systematic review of cross-disciplinary research in body memory found that the available data neither largely support or refute the claim that memories are stored outside of the brain and more research is needed.
_	One such review, written by "Washington Post"s Stephanie Merry, made the claim that "every Asian character is either a ruthless murderer or anonymous collateral damage."
_	Enders also repeated the claim that only 300 people had lived in Mozote, and it was impossible for the death toll to have reached that reported in the "Times" and "Post" stories.
_	Originating with the World Health Organization (WHO) in 2008, the claim that 80% of South Africans use traditional healers has been spread by the news media worldwide.
_	In 1929 the FDA Bureau of Chemistry stated on "Atomidine" advertised health claims "As far as our records go, all of these claims are without a scintilla of printed scientific evidence to substantiate the claim that Atomidine is superior or even the equal to tincture of iodine...".
_	Native Women's Assn of Canada v Canada, [1994] 3 S.C.R. 627, was a decision by the Supreme Court of Canada on section 2, section 15 and section 28 of the Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms, in which the Court decided against the claim that the government of Canada had an obligation to financially support an interest group in constitutional negotiations, to allow the group to speak for its people.
_	He defined post-modernism as the claim that there are no grounds for truth, objectivity, and meaning, and therefore conflicts between views are nothing more than contests of power, and argued that, while the West is required to judge other cultures in their own terms, Western culture is adversely judged as ethnocentric and racist.
_	There is currently no scientific evidence for the claim that sulfur treatment relieves eczema.
_	While one of the main critiques of the Legio Maria Church from other Christians centres on the claim that Simeo Ondeto is the “Black Messiah,” there are many ways in which the Legio Maria are in continuity with the Catholic Church.
_	The fundraising materials of HSUS do not make the claim that HSUS runs local shelters, or that donations will be applied directly to local animal shelters.
_	"Cilappatikāram" is credited with bringing folk songs to literary genre, a proof of the claim that folk songs institutionalised literary culture with the best-maintained cultures root back to folk origin.
_	While both Sunnis and Shi'as believe in respecting Ahl al-Bayt, the Shi'a believe that the successors of Muhammad were appointed from the Ahl al-Bayt, while Sunnis reject the claim that anyone was appointed as successor.
_	As of 2009 no documentary evidence from US archives or elsewhere has been provided to support the claim that the song is "traditional" (though Country singer Carl Smith did have a hit in 1953 with a song of the same title written by Boudleaux Bryant).
_	Bastiat himself argued against the claim that hiring men to be soldiers was inherently beneficial to the economy in the second chapter of "That Which is Seen, and That Which is Not Seen", "The Disbanding of Troops".
_	The hypothesis was closely related to the knuckle-walking hypothesis; the claim that early human ancestors walked on all fours when they first emerged into the savannas.
_	He dismissed the claim that the violent clashes were staged.
_	President Ma Ying-jeou reasserted the ROC's claim to be the sole legitimate government of China and the claim that mainland China is part of ROC's territory.
_	Branchflower said there was enough evidence in the public record to support the claim that Todd Palin was the principal critic of Trooper Wooten.
_	Critics of evidentialism sometimes reject the claim that a conclusion is justified only if one's evidence supports that conclusion.
_	Facts about Baker's career often sound more like myths, such as the story of his playing every second of a 73-minute game against Harvard, or the claim that he was penalized just twice during his career, and both times the mere suggestion that he had violated a rule of the game nearly drove him to tears.
_	Maček declared the elections as a "90% victory for the pro-agreement parties", emphasizing the claim that SDS won the majority among Croatian Serbs.
_	Many commentators disputed the claim that the timing of the allegations during the presidential campaign has a bearing on how likely the events were.
_	Sigmund Freud popularly made the claim that love can transform the egotist, giving him or her a new sense of humility in relation to others.
_	In addition, Elliott questioned the claim that Chinese society was traumatized by the Western victories, as many Chinese peasants (90% of the population at that time) living outside the concessions continued about their daily lives, uninterrupted and without any feeling of "humiliation".
_	The notion of reductionism supplements physical causal closure with the claim that "all" events ultimately can be reduced to physical events.
_	Although the claim that 4241 BC (July 19) is the "earliest fixed date" has been discredited since Jacobs, he noted that 6,177 years had passed between when the Egyptian calendar was established in 4241 BC and the present year (AD 1936).
_	Past research has provided empirical support to the claim that green or pro-environmental consumer behavior is a multidimensional construct which is composed of:
_	He agreed with Scruton that Plato's view that desire has no place in love should be rejected, and welcomed Scruton's defense of the claim that erotic love is a genuine possibility.
_	Grant counters the claim that he profits from the sale of casebook kits on his website by stating that it offsets some of the costs of his investigation.
_	He was the first to make the claim that programming is so inherently complex that, in order to manage it successfully, programmers need to harness every trick and abstraction possible.
_	The director of the mission, Fred Sammons, responded to these allegations with the claim that "The Indians live in fear, in fear of evil spirits and in fear of violent death because it's in their culture to kill.
_	Articles of the "Daily Mail" regularly advocated anti-German sentiments throughout the 20th century, telling British readers to refuse service at restaurants by Austrian or German waiters on the claim that they were spies and told them that if a German-sounding waiter claimed to be Swiss that they should demand to see the waiter's passport.
_	Other media commentators have disputed the claim that Sanders' campaign was sabotaged, and assert that DNC members' internal preference for Clinton did not lead to any actions that changed the outcome of the race.
_	The Archaeological Survey of India (ASI) has supported the claim that a Hindu structure once stood at the site, without commenting on a possible demolition.
_	In August 2005, rival supermarket chain Tesco challenged Asda's ability to use the claim that it was the cheapest supermarket in the country, by complaining to the Advertising Standards Agency.
_	It also drew special attention to the claim that a very high proportion of officers were obese.
_	Perhaps one of the most notable factors of this sage is the claim that he supposedly attained a divinization of the physical body.
_	Historian Christian Gerlach states that "a systematic collection of statistical data was aborted, possibly because the data did not substantiate the claim that three million had died and at least 200,000 women had been raped."
_	Part one addresses the claim that God made a promise Abraham that his descendants would become many nations.
_	And there are few more people came out with the claim that they killed that particular person and they also had evidence in their hands to prove that they are the killers.
_	When the issue arises, the court is obliged to establish whether there is a proper basis for the claim that the accused cannot answer without incriminating himself.
_	The conspiracy theory was developed by the neo-Nazi David Lane in his "White Genocide Manifesto" (, origin of the later use of the term), where he made the claim that the government policies of many Western countries had the intent of destroying white European culture and making white people an "extinct species".
_	He regarded these traits as capable of hereditary transmission, and made the claim that "Satanists are born, not made".
_	Arlene declined the offer, but after she miscarried she called Hayley to Chandler Mansion with the claim that she had reconsidered.
_	When the claim(s) are actually adjudicated by the payer, the payer will ultimately respond with a X12-835 transaction, which shows the line-items of the claim that will be paid or denied; if paid, the amount; and if denied, the reason.
_	In testing the claim that the UE BOOM produced "360-degree sound", he noted that the speaker's imaging did not suffer with different placement or listening position.
_	After the Landmark Preservation Commission threatened a $5,000 fine, the company retreated, although maintained the claim that they did not disturb the grave site.
_	Franklin Sherman, editor of volume 47 of the American Edition of "Luther's Works" in which "On the Jews and Their Lies" appears, responds to the claim that "Luther's antipathy towards the Jews was religious rather than racial in nature," Luther's writings against the Jews, he explains, are not "merely a set of cool, calm and collected theological judgments.
_	There is no evidence to substantiate the claim that her contemporary Bess of Hardwick was raised by Anne in her household.
_	"No written material supporting the claim that government and military authorities were involved in the forcible and systematic recruitment of comfort women has been discovered", and that it regarded the Asian Women's Fund, set up to compensate for wartime abuses, as a failure based on a misunderstanding of history.
_	This, together with the claim that on the cross Jesus "remained silent, as though he felt no pain", has led many early Christians to accuse the text of docetism.
_	Instead his figures feature a sense of volume and emotionalism, reminiscent of Lorenzetti and other Florentine painters, further strengthening the claim that Barna was not a native of Siena, but more likely hailed from Florence.
_	A related argument is from conscience; John Henry Newman argued that the conscience supports the claim that objective moral truths exist because it drives people to act morally even when it is not in their own interest.
_	Grant however ignored Germer's letter of expulsion, continuing to operate the New Isis Lodge under the claim that he had powers from the "Inner Plane".
_	In the interview, he repeated the claim that he heard a voice saying "Get out", but stopped short of giving it a paranormal origin.
_	Supporters of the death penalty state that the claim that the pancuronium prevents the thiopental from working, yet is still capable of causing paralysis, is not based on any scientific evidence and is a drug interaction that has never before been documented for any other drugs.
_	Although Allied World War II sources frequently make the claim that the Japanese called the Corsair the "Whistling Death", Japanese sources do not support this, and it was mainly known as the Sikorsky.
_	What has come to be called the "clinical versus statistical prediction" debate was first described in detail in 1954 by Paul Meehl, where he explored the claim that mechanical (formal, algorithmic) methods of data combination could outperform clinical (e.g., subjective, informal, "in the clinician's head") methods when such combinations are used to arrive at a prediction of behavior.
_	Since the Hinkley groundwater contamination lawsuit, a group of California-based scientists who are part of organizations such as Desert Sierra Cancer Surveillance Program (DSCSP) and ChemRisk have argued against the claim that chromium-VI is genotoxic, to downplay the number of cancer cases and to challenge that there was a "cancer cluster in the Hinkley area."
_	While the claim that he had been made a "dux" under the emperor Probus is probably a fabrication, he certainly attained the rank of "tribunus" within the army, and during the reign of Carus he was raised to the position of "Praeses", or governor, of the province of Dalmatia.
_	Given that there were several student organizations it would be difficult to make the claim that there were no controls at all.
_	On December 22, 2008, Psystar opened the claim that Apple "is prohibited from bringing action against Psystar for the alleged infringement of one or more of the plaintiff's copyrights for failure to register said copyrights with the copyright office as required" by law.
_	In 1999, a bootleg copy containing music featured in the film along with select cuts of dialogue dubbed as the "10th Anniversary Limited Edition" began to appear on Internet auction sites with the claim that Warner Bros.
_	Less than two decades later in 1717, Raja Kechil would assemble a fleet from Minangkabau and succeed temporarily in ousting Sultan Abdul Jalil's successor Sultan Sulaiman and gain the Johor Sultanate, basing his legitimacy on the claim that he was the post-humous son of Sultan Mahmud Shah II.
_	Dalin, otherwise a critic of Cornwell, is content to repeat the claim that Pacelli played a "behind-the-scenes role in silencing" Coughlin, for his own part wishing to emphasize Coughlin's personal anti-Semitism.
_	He rejects the claim that myth developed to explain ritual as an overly reductive and unknowable hypothesis.
_	It makes the claim that "certain features of the universe and of living things are best explained by an intelligent cause, not an undirected process such as natural selection."
_	The strong AI hypothesis is the claim that a computer which behaves as intelligently as a person must also necessarily have a mind and consciousness.
_	In 1956, for example, leading British Labour Party politician and author Anthony Crosland claimed that capitalism had been abolished in Britain, although others—such as Welshman Aneurin Bevan, Minister of Health in the first post-war Labour government—disputed the claim that Britain was a socialist state.
_	Later, in the Supreme Court case "United States v. Burns" (2001), the Court was faced with the claim that Canadian citizens faced with extradition to the US had a right to stay and be tried in Canada.
_	This does not reject the claim that Russia played an aggressive role in the East, which it did; rather, it means that Russia unwisely calculated that Japan would not go to war against its far larger and seemingly superior navy and army.
_	The claim that the National Guard is older than the nation itself, with over three and a half centuries of service, is based on the claim that the modern-day 101st Field Artillery Regiment, 182nd Infantry Regiment, 101st Engineer Battalion and 181st Infantry Regiment of the Massachusetts Army National Guard are directly descended from Massachusetts Bay Colony regiments formed over 375 years ago.
_	One general criticism motivating research of different explanations is that actually the theory cannot claim that "democracy causes peace", because the evidence for democracies being, in general, more peaceful is very slight or non existent; it only can support the claim that ""joint" democracy causes peace".
_	Bartov argued that the claim that it was "primary group loyalty", by which men are motivated to fight by loyalty towards their comrades in their unit with little thought to the cause that one is fighting for, cannot possibly have been what motivated the Wehrmacht to fight on the Eastern Front.
_	He disproved the claim that the Ding brothers were very famous officials in Wei by pointing out that they had neither held important appointments nor made any significant achievements.
_	Because his father had worked for the state (as a pastor) the now-fatherless Nietzsche was offered a scholarship to study at the internationally recognized Schulpforta (the claim that Nietzsche was admitted on the strength of his academic competence has been debunked: his grades were nowhere near the top of the class).
_	The reviewer dismissed the claim that Dope Stars Inc. is a copy of California band London After Midnight.
_	In a 2009 article, Patricia Crone refuted the claim that the Pope had been mistaken, by expounding the six different classical interpretations of the verse.
_	An account in cognitive semantics called the dynamic construal theory makes the claim that words themselves are without meaning: they have, at best, "default construals," which are really just ways of using words.
_	Costo and his wife Jeannette opposed the efforts within the Catholic Church to name Father Junipero Serra a saint based on the claim that he treated Native Americans in an inhumane fashion.
_	Likewise, Neill noted that the poor are nowhere to be seen in the Hollywood version of "Emma" while in the ITV version there are all sorts of starving people in the background Another critic Roger Sales noted that "frequent women in windows imaginary" suggested that the country estates of the gentry and aristocracy were in fact “genteel prisons” for women, which Irvine argued was inconsistent with the claim that the Austen films were a conservative fantasy of a lost idyll of an ordered society.
_	This myth, along with others from ancient Egypt, Israel, Mexico, etc. are used to support the claim that ""Venus was expelled as a comet and then changed to a planet after contact with a number of members of our solar system"" (Velikovsky 1972:182).
_	A critical biographer finds "no evidence of widespread contempt for Haig; the claim that ordinary soldiers universally thought him a butcher does not accord with their continued willingness to fight".
_	Méry said he had been inspired by an old Latin manuscript, and an 1842 English translation of the story made the claim that it was in fact taken from an old Latin manuscript.
_	This supports the claim that C17orf98 is involved in cancer, immune cells, and perhaps cancers of the immune system.
_	Members of the dynasty derived their title, Sayyid, or the descendants of the Prophet Muhammad, based on the claim that they belonged to the Prophet's lineage through his daughter Fatima, and son-in-law and cousin Ali.
_	Part 5: "Women of Afghanistan" debunks the claim that American troops support a feminist revolution.
_	After giving a short speech under a sign reiterating the claim that the lift was the world's longest, Knous, flanked by Paepcke and Aspen's mayor, symbolically christened the lift by breaking a bottle of champagne over one of the chairs.
_	The organization, whilst generally identified with the communists, rejected the claim that it was a communist movement.
_	Mattei made bold, unsupported claims for the efficacy of his treatments, including the claim that his treatments offered a nonsurgical alternative to cancer.
_	This information to refute the claim that corruption was the source of Nigeria's past foreign debt is supplied by Osarenren F. Asemota Former CBN Balance of Payment Staff).
_	For instance, the claim that early Christians rejected scientific findings by the Greco-Romans is false, since the "handmaiden" view of secular studies was seen to shed light on theology.
_	Also, the claim that people of the Middle Ages widely believed that the Earth was flat was first propagated in the same period that originated the conflict thesis and is still very common in popular culture.
_	Tim Ranger writes to dispute the claim that money brings happiness.
_	This definition amounted to the claim that mental properties would count as emergent if and only if philosophical zombies were metaphysically possible.
_	He noted that a star witness supporting the claim that exposure to vinyl production can cause ASL, Lori Sanzone, is missing from the DVD version.
_	Though he won that case in 2002, it was reversed on appeal in 2004 by the Florida Supreme Court, upholding the claim that the marriage was null and void because her ex-husband was still a woman and same-sex marriages are illegal in Florida.
_	Post-war controversy exists around the claim that there was a "race" within the 2nd Division for the first regiment to take the causeway to Walcheren island, implicating that the failure to take the causeway on October 31 was due to reckless determination to win the "race".
_	Goebbels swiftly realized that to use force against the women protesting on the Rosenstrasse would undermine the claim that all Germans were united in the "volksgemeinschaft", which was especially threatening as belief in the "volksgemeinschaft" held the German home front together.
_	The Chinese room argument by John Searle is a direct attack on the claim that thought can be represented as a set of functions.
_	Those who advocate the intelligent design (ID) belief sometimes cite Hoyle's work in this area to support the claim that the universe was fine tuned in order to allow intelligent life to be possible.
_	Works by the grammarian Vacca and the poet Statius may support the claim that Lucan wrote insulting poems about Nero.
_	In 2004, "Britain's Real Monarch"—a documentary broadcast on Channel 4 in the United Kingdom—repeated the claim that the Earl's father, as the senior descendant of George Plantagenet, 1st Duke of Clarence, was the rightful King of England.
_	They support the claim that Antonio Meucci was the real inventor of the telephone.
_	Despite a court challenge by the Governor of Illinois, the US District Judge ruled that there was not enough evidence to support the claim that the state would suffer major harm by the closure of the unit.
_	In an interview he motivated his choice with the claim that in everyday life one does not consciously notice colors.
_	During the trial, Channel 4 denied the claim that they had suggested Allan had an affair with Terre'Blanche.
_	However, the Task Force stated that there was no support to the claim that Chagnon and Neel began a measles epidemic.
_	She states that her father's killer served no jail time, the man's legal defence apparently resting entirely on the claim that he was justified in murdering Spheeris senior as "he was defending a black."
_	It was precisely the claim that the historians' only valid position is one of identification with the German troops fighting on the Eastern Front which invoked such widespread and vehement criticism of Hillgruber's essay.
_	Ray claimed that he had been coerced into entering a plea, and Kershaw helped his client push the claim that Ray was not responsible for the shooting, which was said to have been the result of a conspiracy of an otherwise unidentified man named "Raul" whom Ray had met in Montreal.
_	With the claim that he was "partially responsible without knowing it" as part of what Ray "thought was a gun-smuggling operation", Kershaw and his client met with representatives of the United States House Select Committee on Assassinations and convinced the committee to run ballistics tests — which ultimately proved inconclusive — that would show that Ray had not fired the fatal shot.
_	The Tamil version did not get tax exemption, due to the claim that "Jai Hind" is not a Tamil word.
_	At its Congress in 1937, he repeated the claim that "our Orthodoxy is our only criterion for differentiation, for we are the only Latin people of the Orthodox faith".
_	This was one of the earliest of the two thousand such charters that would be granted in England in the two centuries up to 1350, and may have recognised a market that was already taking place, as lawsuits of 1285 and 1308 both upheld the claim that the Birmingham market had been held without interruption since before the Norman conquest.
_	In January 2016 it was announced that Boswell would be investigated by the Parliamentary Commissioner for Standards over the claim that he did not properly record his directorship of a company in the Commons Register of Members' Interests, thus breaching parliamentary procedure.
_	In 2012 the English ornithologist and artist Julian P. Hume referred to the claim that the bird lived on Mehetia as "hearsay", but regarded it a possibility that it lived there and on other outlying islands.
_	There are other criticisms of privatization outside the classic argument of "public" versus "private", the most of fundamental example being the claim that privatization does not lead to cost savings.
_	Hoon told the inquiry that the first he heard of the claim that Iraq could launch weapons in 45 minutes was when it was published in the so-called "September Dossier".
_	Morrison's nickname, "The Duke", is based on the claim that he was related to Hollywood star John Wayne (né Marion Morrison).
_	In 1897, Baker's grandson, Fairfax Henry Wheelan sued to have the title returned to the heirs of John H. Baker citing the claim that Baker's widow did not have the legal power to mortgage the property.
_	After several weeks of speculation about the rumour, Bruford wrote a blog entry on his website in May 2010 stressing his retirement from performance in 2009, and denied any involvement in such plans with the claim that he was not invited by either member.
_	In his commentary for the 2006 DVD release of "Superman III", Ilya Salkind denied any ill will between Margot Kidder and his production team and denied the claim that her part was cut for retaliation.
_	Bolt then challenged Manne to produce ten cases in which the evidence justified the claim that children were "stolen" as opposed to having been removed for reasons such as neglect, abuse, abandonment, etc.
_	He argued that Manne did not respond and that this was an indication of unreliability of the claim that there was policy of systematic removal.
_	Researchers also looked into several different types of bat species to solidify the claim that bats are the main reservoir for gammaretroviruses.
_	Niane has advanced the claim that, the Jolofing Mansa sided with Sumaguru [or "Soumaoro"] because ""like him, he was hostile to Islam.""
_	What remained for the apologists of the regime to defend it from the Orangist attacks was the claim that it promoted "freedom" in the sense of the "True Freedom" of the De Witt regime from the previous stadtholderless regime, with all that comprised: religious and intellectual toleration, and the principle that power is more responsibly wielded, and exercised in the public interest, if it is dispersed, with the dynastic element, embodied in the stadtholderate, removed.
_	Ned Young's son, John Young, afterwards continued to dispute the claim that Hart interviewed his father in 1988.
_	Harris argues that consent initiatives, such as "no means no" and "yes means yes" use views about communication which she sees as false myths, such as the claim that communication during sex can and should be a binary, unambiguous "no" or "yes".
_	Antony C. Sutton, in his book "Wall Street and the Rise of Hitler", makes the claim that ITT subsidiaries made cash payments to SS leader Heinrich Himmler.
_	These scenarios were devised based on the claim that scenarios active in first and second generation scenario methods cannot live up to the challenge of imagining, contributing and preparing for the dynamic processes of transformative change.
_	According to Grünbaum, Freud used this argument in order to justify the claim that durable therapeutic success guarantees not only that the pertinent analytic interpretations seem appear true or credible to the analysand but also that they are veridical, or at least close to the truth.
_	This, of course, satirized the claim that gay unions would denigrate the sanctity of heterosexual marriage.
_	He visited the island and made the claim that he had discovered a new northernmost island.
_	The accuser's lawyer explained that her client had lied under oath about a "very, very minor point" unrelated to the claim that McAllister had assaulted her, and that she had advised the accuser not to continue testifying to avoid a potential charge of perjury.
_	As criticism of the claim that, in , which is the only reference in the New Testament to Christian baptism being administered in the open, the actions of "going down into the water" and "coming up out of the water" indicate that this baptism was by immersion, it is pointed out that "going down into" and "coming up out of" a river or a store of still water, actions there ascribed to both the baptizer and the baptized, do not necessarily involve immersion in the water.
_	In a 1992 article for "The New Republic", she challenged what she felt were ahistorical Afrocentric claims, such as the claim that Greek philosophy was plagiarized from African sources.
_	Arguing against the claim that fewer poor pupils would be served by its replacement, Teather claimed that it would actually be targeted better at those who actually needed government support.
_	The central argument is based on the claim that the correct way to study the dynamics of macroscopic systems is to study the transfer operator corresponding to the microscopic equations of motion.
_	The Japanese were trying to spread the lie that Chinese Muslims were one race, in order to propagate the claim that they should be separated from China into an "independent political organization".
_	Further sources which point out the centrality to the Paris Protocol have also made the claim that these have been the first protests on the Palestinian West Bank not to be purely "political".
_	As an indication of security, most inks mentioned above were already known by the end of World War I. However, in 1999, the U.S. Central Intelligence Agency successfully requested that World War I invisible ink remain exempt from mandatory declassification, based on the claim that invisible ink was still relevant to national security.
_	He is also known for the claim that he was the eponymous inventor of the sandwich.
_	Instead, "only information that supported the claim that the communists had attacked the two destroyers was given to Johnson administration officials."
_	The only Crusader leader of note to die in the battle was James d'Avesnes; a French knight of whom Ambroise made the claim that he cut down 15 Saracen cavalrymen before being killed.
_	Their criticisms of SIL ranged from the unfair and the unsubstantiated (like the claim that SIL was seeking raw materials for U.S. corporations) to the ridiculous (that it had killed indigenous babies to render their fat, so that it could be used as an ingredient in rocket fuel, explaining how the Americans had been able to land on the moon).
_	However none of the trial testimony substantiates the claim that two men shot Berardelli.
_	However, the Committee also found that the evidence did not support the claim that lowering sodium intake in the general population to less than 2,300 mg/day was associated with a lower risk of death nor with a higher risk of death.
_	The "explanatory gap" – also called the "hard problem of consciousness" – is the claim that (to date) no one has provided a convincing causal explanation of how and why we are conscious.
_	The inscription and the style of its lettering cast into doubt the claim that the statue was an original by the master sculptor Praxiteles from Attica.
_	Yun Kuen Lee's criticism of nationalist sentiment in developing an explanation of Three Dynasties chronology focuses on the dichotomy of evidence provided by archaeological versus historical research, in particular, the claim that the archaeological Erlitou Culture is also the historical Xia dynasty.
_	American and British interpretations of Bleuler led to the claim that he described its main symptoms as four "A"s: flattened "affect", "autism", impaired "association" of ideas, and "ambivalence".
_	In addition to the lack of empirical support for the claim that sexual orientation can be changed, empirical evidence indicates that attempts at changing sexual orientation can be harmful."
_	In some cases, this involved the press spreading misinformation, such as the claim that he and Phranc were recording a cover of "Don't Go Breaking My Heart"; others, such as those of Barbara Ellen in "NME", were closer to personal attack than musical review.
_	League documented one of the more common aspects of money-related antisemitism: the claim that the United States' Federal Reserve System was created by Jews and is run by them for their own financial benefit.
_	At the age of thirteen, she joined the Katipunan because her desire to fight oppression after her father was denied a Christian burial by the Spanish friars because of the claim that he did not go to confession, although the apparent reason is that they were related to José Rizal, whose novel "Noli me Tangere" exposed the abuses of the Spaniards.
_	An analysis published in the March 2001 issue of "Science & Justice" by Dr. Donald B. Thomas used a different radio transmission synchronization to put forth the claim that the National Academy of Sciences panel was in error.
_	Watson's career emerged through his work for conspiracy theorist Alex Jones, for whose website he promoted fake news and conspiracy theories such as the claim that 9/11 was an inside job, the Chemtrail conspiracy theory, the New World Order and the Illuminati.
_	Some disputed the claim that Suazo was subservient to the military, pointing out that the president refused to increase the budget of the armed forces.
_	While Sweeney endorses Olson's identification, he finds exaggerated the claim that Ahab learns from his cabin-boy just as Lear does from the Fool.
_	The 16th century or earlier dating is based on similarities between Virupaksha Pandita's (1584 CE) "Chennabasava Purana" and Lakshmisa's work, while the 17th century dating is based on the claim that no author, Brahmin or otherwise, has referenced his writing and directly mentioned his name in any literature during the period 15th century through late 17th century.
_	There is also some evidence to support the claim that increased intellectual activity and brain stimulation i.e. recording one's memories can lower the individual risk of dementia and Alzheimer's.
_	Historical data, however, contradicts the claim that "kangri" came to Kashmir from Italy, but it is known that it was used in the time of the Mughal Empire.
_	The name of the book comes from the claim that Đinđić was shot by the second sniper, unlike what the official version says.
_	Abraham Geiger, the founder of Reform Judaism, remarked the following concerning the claim that Jews believed Ezra to be the son of God: “According to the assertion of Muhammad the Jews held Ezra to be the Son of God.
_	However, Scobie made the claim that this was the cause for ""many in the chapter [to be] outraged and [offer] proposals to "go local" or to affiliate with a different national fraternity at the house meeting immediately following the visit.
_	Pro-Football, Inc. v. Harjo, 415 F.3d 44 (D.C. Cir. 2005), is a case in which the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia considered the decision of the United States Patent and Trademark Office's Trademark Trial and Appeal Board (TTAB) to cancel the registration of the Washington Redskins football team, based on the claim that the name was disparaging to Native Americans.
_	There is no factual basis for the claim that Assir was captured and his followers crushed.
_	After talking with Dagoth Ur, who attempts to sway the player to his side with the claim that he is merely following Nerevar's final orders, the player and Dagoth Ur fight.
_	Former customers contend that they were defrauded by the claim that they were trading on a "no dealing desk" system.
_	Andersen was found guilty and sentenced to death, but petitioned the District Court of the United States for the Eastern District of Virginia for a writ of habeas corpus, under the claim that he had been deprived of his right to counsel under the Sixth Amendment to the United States Constitution.
_	(d) Nihilism—which makes the claim that no objects exist, except simples, so there is no persistence problem.
_	In 1932, Pavlov made the claim that speech is signals of signals—or second signals.
_	Parsley supports the claim that Islam is an enemy of both the United States and Christianity.
_	Furthermore, the claim that Aonghus Óg was Lord of Kintyre at the time of the Dunaverty episode could be a result of the fact that, by the time "The Bruce" was composed, Eóin Mac Domhnaill was married to a daughter of the Robert II, and had gained this contested lordship by way of her tocher.
_	Anarchist communists reject the claim that wage labor is necessary because people are lazy and selfish by "human nature".
_	In a "The New Yorker" essay, Teju Cole objected to the claim that "Charlie Hebdo" cartoonists and writers were equal opportunity offenders; to him, the magazine, in recent years, had taken a turn "specifically for racist and Islamophobic provocations (...) featuring hook-nosed Arabs, bullet-ridden Korans, variations on the theme of sodomy, and mockery of the victims of a massacre".
_	Hillel Steiner provided an argument to refute the claim that liberalism cannot supply an adequate theory of exploitation.
_	As far as the claim that the structure of Pirke De Rabbi Eliezer shows signs that parts of the composition are missing, Treitl's examination demonstrates that when it comes to the conclusion of chapters with blessings from the Shemoneh Esreh, the structure is fundamentally defective and was at no point complete.
_	In the popular 1960 book "Initiation", author Elisabeth Haich makes the claim that in a past life she was the disciple and niece of Ptahhotep.
_	For the French, this validated the claim that it was impossible to operate tight ensnaring operations in Vietnam's jungle, due to the slow movement of their troops, and a foreknowledge by the enemy, which was difficult to prevent.
_	Ion Antonescu's antiziganism manifested itself as the claim that some or all Romani people, specifically nomadic ones, were given to criminal behavior.
_	The owners of "Soul Man"'s publishing rights did not agree with the claim that it was fair use of the song as a parody, and forced the campaign to stop using it.
_	Therefore, the Berlin specimen had at one point researchers arguing for both a separate genus and species name; Petronievics (1921) erected the genus "Archaeornis" and supported the claim that ""Archaeornis siemensii"" entirely lacked a pubic symphysis.
_	She asked Montgomery to provide evidence as to the claim that by giving Packingham Internet privileges, he would commit another crime.
_	Scientific examination has dated the panel and paint used to Shakespeare's lifetime, but the claim that it is of Shakespeare has been regarded with scepticism.
_	The environmental community newsletter TerraGreen agrees with Romm in the claim that "the car of the near future is the hybrid vehicle", and cites the book's good reception by Toyota's advanced technologies group.
_	However, his best known contribution, which has been described as pseudoarchaeology, is the claim that Australian Aborigianes came from Egypt, based on carvings at Devil's Rock, Wollombi, in the Royal National Park, Brunswick Heads, and other locations.
_	At a meeting arranged by the Norwegian Students' Society on 17 November 1887, Nissen had made the claim that from his personal experience, only 10% of women had libido.
_	In May 1926, the school issued one year suspensions to 53 students under the claim that their Sunday school classes served as a front for fraternity membership.
_	On January 19, 1986, the hospital was closed by the then BLP-led Government of Barbados over the claim that the institution was losing money.
_	The study was disputed by contrarian Pat Michaels with the claim that all of the warming took place between 1920 and 1935, before increased human greenhouse gas emissions.
_	Friedrich and Brzezinski explicitly reject the claim that the Party, or any other institution, could provide a significant counterweight to the power of the dictator in Nazism or Stalinism.
_	In response to an article written about Goodson in the South African "Jewish Report", which was published on 30 June 2017, Goodson explained that his disbelief of the Holocaust is predicated on the claim that in the 8,263 pages of World War II memoirs written by Winston Churchill, Charles de Gaulle, Dwight D. Eisenhower and Harry S. Truman, there is no mention of millions of Jews in Europe having been annihilated.
_	Evidence has supported the claim that patients with anxiety and SMD rely more heavily on visual cues for postural changes.
_	His argument for this position rests heavily on the claim that morally arbitrary factors (for example, the family one is born into) shouldn't determine one's life chances or opportunities.
_	Allen voice out the claim that the league wanted the sixers into the finals instead of them.
_	Based on that transcript, "The New York Times" published a light-hearted op-ed piece intended to tweak the claim that Princeton produced superior, well-rounded graduates.
_	Zitelmann ended his article with the claim that “Irving must not be ignored.
_	The first modern scholar to advance the claim that the witch trials had been designed to wipe out an anti-Christian sect was the German Karl Ernst Jarcke, a professor of criminal law at the University of Berlin.
_	In 1845, Charles Miner reported the claim that the Colonel William Plunket who commanded one of the two earliest battalions of the Northumberland Militia in Lycoming County, Pennsylvania, in 1775 was the same person as MacLaine's former accomplice.
_	This later date still allows the claim that Univ is the oldest of the Oxford colleges, although this is contested by Balliol College and Merton College.
_	For example, these regulatory bodies upheld complaints when Moyles threatened Dr Fox in October 2002 with the claim that "I'm gonna tear his head off and poo down his neck"; and also in early 2002, when he said "he would take the virginity of Charlotte Church", when she reached sixteen.
_	The group's name is derived from the claim that only three percent of the population of the Thirteen Colonies fought against the Kingdom of Great Britain during the American Revolution.
_	The Maysles brothers decided they wanted to be the first to make a nonfiction feature film (which turned out to be "Salesman") after learning that Truman Capote had made the claim that his newly released book "In Cold Blood" was a nonfiction novel.
_	When biological evolution is conflated with other evolutionary processes, this can cause errors such as the claim that modern evolutionary theory says anything about abiogenesis or the Big Bang.
_	McLachlin rejected the claim that the purpose "did not correspond to the actual needs and circumstances of the individuals" and that it effectively stereotyped youth.
_	The Sapir–Whorf hypothesis, which states that thought is inherently embedded in language, would support the claim that an effort to limit the use of words of language is actually a form of restricting freedom of thought.
_	Some authors make the claim that his family was Kurdish, a claim which is unsubstantiated.
_	They further noted the ubiquity of these pesticides in the home and at schools, citing Schettler "et al." for the claim that "The trend is toward increasingly common exposures to organophosphates.
_	It leads, however, to absurdities such as the claim that gold cannot be a subject (but is alternatively termed "an isolate").
_	However, when interviewed by the magazine about the claim that 4,000 Jewish employees did not attend work at the WTC on the day of the attacks, he avoided concrete statements ("They didn't know about it.
_	Inspection of the chart showed the signature to be similar to the form he customarily used in 1920, rather than the different form he used in 1916, while other testimony supported the claim that the ship had indeed turned a full circle.
_	Ethical subjectivism is also compatible with moral relativism when that is taken to mean the opposite of absolutism, that is, as the claim that moral precepts should be adjusted to circumstances, as in consequentialism.
_	The settlement of the lawsuit resulted in Teva changing its product marketing to remove the claim that it used the same ingredients as Yaz.
_	Some of the book's key points, such as the claim that technological innovation is a major component of economic growth, are more widely accepted now than in 1982.
_	USGS and Russian mapping dispute the claim that this is the location correctly named Keokradong; they show Keokradong at an 883m summit further north.
_	Their hopes were to change the death penalty into a life sentence on the claim that Williams had converted in prison and published many children books speaking against entering into street gangs.
_	The Court then considered "United States v. Chadwick", which held that any object associated with an arrestee may be searched incident to arrest – a precedent that supported the claim that the search of Diaz's cell phone was valid incident to his arrest.
_	The starting point for this theory is the claim that a 4,000 mile journey to the Malay Peninsula, with appropriate winds and currents from the Middle East, would have been much easier for the Jaredites, Mulekites and Lehites than a 16,000 mile voyage across the Indian and Pacific Oceans (with no appropriate currents) to the Americas.
_	Heggie was very dubious about the existence of the megalithic yard, stating that his careful analysis uncovered "little evidence for a highly accurate unit" and "little justification for the claim that a highly accurate unit was in use".
_	The single's liner notes included the claim that Truganini was the "sole surviving Tasmanian Aborigine" when she died.
_	His theory is sometimes known as the "ecological theory" because of the claim that perception can be explained solely in terms of the environment.
_	Joseph F. Smith, sixth president of the LDS Church, stated in responding to the claim that polygamy originated with Brigham Young rather than Joseph Smith:
_	Critics have disputed the claim that the Prescription Drug User Fee Amendment has improved the speed of drug approvals.
_	Part of Dennett's argument is the claim that each of us possess what he calls a ""Cartesian theater"", in which we believe there is a full representation of the visual world in our mind and that there is a place in the mind where it is observed.
_	, criticized that the claim that Nakrang Kingdom is not same as Lelang Commandery and it is ignoring the situation of Lelang Commandery in later Han dynasty.
_	Báez Figueroa's lawyer, Marino Vinicio Castillo, said in an interview that the whole affair had been trumped up for political reasons, and that the claim that RD$55 billion had been embezzled was "a fable."
_	Against Brian's express wishes, Stewie leaks the relationship onto the Internet, resulting in a media circus and the claim that Lauren is a dumb blonde.
_	IF also makes the claim that gravity is "only a theory", parodying the claims made by creationists regarding the theoretical status of evolution.
_	A Channel 5 documentary broadcast on 16 July 2009 repeated the claim that the Germans intended to restore Edward VIII to the throne in the event of a German occupation.
_	The learned judge at first instance rejected the claim that any right appertained to number 56 under the Law of Property Act 1925, section 62(2) because there was no evidence the path was used for gaining access to the back garden at the time of the conveyance.
_	His doctors were largely at a loss to explain his illness, and spurious stories about his condition spread, such as the claim that he shook hands with a tree in the mistaken belief that it was the King of Prussia.
_	It is also often invoked in defences of the right to private property, although some have contested the claim that private property necessarily enhances negative liberty."
_	In 2016 a photograph of a man resembling Grynszpan was cited as evidence to support the claim that he was still alive in Bamberg, Germany, as of 3 July 1946.
_	The preamble, which is sometimes also called "pre-characterizing portion", includes all the features of the claim that in combination are known in a prior art document, namely the closest prior art.
_	The Court also rejected the claim that the statute was "necessitated by governmental interests of the highest order".
_	Reich rescinded the claim that accumulator could provide orgastic potency, but this was not enough to stop the action.
_	It also argues that one must be careful about making the leap from arguing that certain environmental conditions might cause body dissatisfaction to the claim that those conditions can cause diagnosable eating disorders.
_	Brind is strongly anti-abortion and began lobbying politicians with the claim that abortion caused breast cancer in the early 1990s.
_	Chinese and Japanese authorities claim nearby Gangkhar Puensum is higher, and the claim that Kula Kangri is in or on the border with Bhutan is challenged here.
_	Chief Justice Warren E. Burger threw out the claim that a total ban on advertising by lawyers and law firms was in violation of the Sherman Antitrust Act.
_	Professor Keith Ward's book "Is Religion Dangerous?", responding to the Dawkins programme, analyzes the claim that religion does more harm than good and suggests that "such assertions ... ignore the available evidence... and substitute rhetoric for analysis".
_	The 67-year-old prisoner was repeatedly tortured by the reeducation team, beaten up, starved as registered to the most exhausting tasks until – under the claim that he had to go to the toilet – he headed towards the camp fence, where he was shot by the security guards.
_	The book contains controversial claims, including DeLay's assertion as fact the claim that the Clinton Administration had sought to have military uniforms banned from the White House, which has been repeatedly proven false.
_	How Gordon developed his business relationship with Reyes and Schurgin is not known but his evidently close connection to Schurgin suggests that Gordon was also based in Detroit for some time and lends some credence to the claim that he was born there (as some sources indicate) although this presently remains unconfirmed.
_	Matthew Prince stated: "I woke up this morning in a bad mood and decided to kick them off the internet", the tipping point in the decision being “that the team behind Daily Stormer made the claim that we were secretly supporters of their ideology.”
_	A key part of the case in favour of a "some territories" reading is the claim that British and American officials involved in the drafting of the Resolution omitted the definite article deliberately in order to make it less demanding on the Israelis.
_	However, Bajagić denied the claim that the song was dedicated to Perazić.
_	The Oxford English Dictionary states that it is "based on [the] Chinese 伽藍菜 gāláncài", whilst the Collins English Dictionary merely restates the claim that the generic name was derived from the local Chinese name for one of the species.
_	He also made the claim that given that they had not discovered the potter's wheel they had created very high quality ceramics.
_	The ICTY Outreach Programme notes that the claim that Bosnian Serb forces killed the prisoners from Srebrenica in revenge for crimes committed by Bosnian Muslim forces against Serbs in the villages around Srebrenica provides no defence under international law and soldiers, certainly experienced officers, would be aware of the fact.
_	Writing in 2006, Associate Professor W.A.R.(Bill) Richardson of Flinders University, South Australia suggested the claim that Cristóvão de Mendonça sailed down the east coast of Australia is sheer speculation, based on voyages about which no real details have survived.
_	Philosopher and physicist Mario Bunge has written that telepathy would contradict laws of science and the claim that "signals can be transmitted across space without fading with distance is inconsistent with physics".
_	It appears that there is no evidence to support the claim that Protest Warrior "sought out" a particular faction within the DAWN rally.
_	It begins with the claim that mental phenomena are, in some respects, non-physical.
_	Callow became involved with a variety of problems related to the work on vitamin D, including the claim that rickets was produced by the action of certain cereals.
_	In her “Brief Reply to the Late Writings of Louisa Baker”, Sperry reveals Baker’s true name as Eliza Bowen and denounces the claim that Baker, now Bowen, had ever been unwilling to serve in prostitution.
_	Among the charges directed against him were accusations that he was "bourgeois" and a "kulak", as well as the claim that he was supporting monarchy.
_	NN has continued to make the claim that Pleasant Point Reservation and surrounding Passamaquoddy territory be used to generate an environmentally sound economy.
_	In the philosophy of mathematics, realism is the claim that mathematical entities such as 'number' have an observer-independent existence.
_	Defining itself as "national and liberal", Bărnuțianism was strongly nativist and primordialist, circulating the claim that old Romanian law was purely Roman law ("see Origin of the Romanians").
_	There may be some superficial appeal in the claim that an actual flower has more reality than an idea of a flower but this needs to be unpacked.
_	The extent of warnings received by Stalin about a German invasion is controversial, and the claim that there was a warning that "Germany will attack on 22 June without declaration of war" has been dismissed as a "popular myth".
_	Rejecting the claim that fencing is just a sport, and denouncing firearms as a weapon of "vile highwaymen," he muses about the ethics and mysticism of fencing.
_	When faced with the claim that fencing masters will one day cease to exist, he laments that with them will die "all that is noble and honorable about [battle]."
_	Some officials have criticized the claim that the strong test scores prove Israel is a highly educated country, pointing out that scores from standardized tests exclude Haredi and special education students, and thus are not an accurate reflection.
_	Rosenwald testified before the Anglo-American Committee of Inquiry in 1946, urged the creation of a unitary Jewish-Arab state in Palestine, and allowing Jewish immigration to Palestine to continue only upon "renunciation of the claim that Jews possess unlimited national right to the land, and that the country shall take the form of a racial or theocratic state," and said that the United States and other UN member states should allow more Jewish immigration to solve the European-Jewish refugee problem.
_	Specifically, the claim must be formally presented to the county's governing body for an allowance, and it is only after that governing body has disallowed the claim that its decision may be appealed to the Virginia Circuit Court.
_	Some anarchists have rejected these criticisms with the claim that anarchism is innately incompatible with the concept of coercion, quoting Bakunin himself on this.
_	The incident was later given a stranger twist by the claim that the locomotive involved had been re-numbered in order to prevent a psychic's premonition that a locomotive numbered 47216 would be involved in a fatal accident.
_	It may well be that the scope of the plaintiff's case includes the claim that the railway company, having, on the faith of the alleged agreements, made a location of its line, exhausted its corporate power in reference to its establishment, or that even if it still had corporate discretion to change it, the circumstances alleged, including the agreements made on condition of its original location, may not have created a corporate duty, enforceable by mandamus, to maintain and permanently operate it.
_	After addressing the procedural illegalities, the court turned its attention to the claim that the textbooks did not "conform to the applicable legal standards".
_	This caused more offence to Temple than the claim that he had committed an assault, and a long series of character witnesses testified that Temple had never consumed anything stronger than ginger ale as long as they had known him.
_	Beauclerk supports the most radical version of the theory, which adds the claim that Oxford himself was the Queen's son, and thus the father of his own half-brother, having fathered him with his own mother.
_	The Court believed that the district court attempted to dispose all of Brown Bag's federal claims (copyright and trademark), but the District Court failed to explicitly state a decision regarding the claim that Symantec infringed trademark rights under the Lanham Act.
_	Ansar opened his talk with the claim that Muslims from Africa had colonised the pre-Columbian Americas: "trading and intermarrying with Iroquois and Algonquin Indians".
_	The self-performed task led to the best results, supporting the claim that the enactment effect exists.
_	ECtHR did "not" accept the claim that the Courts of Northern Cyprus lacked "independence and/or impartiality".
_	UK's High Court also dismissed the claim that "cooperation between UK police and law agencies in northern Cyprus was illegal".
_	In the episode "Take Your Daughter to Work Day", Michael makes the claim that he was a child star on a kids' show called "Fundle Bundle"; however, it becomes clear that he simply appeared on the show as one of many guest children who usually watched from home.
_	For example, he rejected the claim that Israel had "ended the occupation of the Gaza Strip in 2005," accusing it of intensifying its "military aggression," carrying out "frequent raids and targeted assassinations," and imposing "a comprehensive siege on the Strip," forcing Gazans to live "on the edge of starvation and without the most basic necessities of human life" and causing "a humanitarian catastrophe."
_	Furthermore, the Catholic Church makes the claim that is the one and only true Church founded by Jesus Christ, but the Eastern Orthodox and Oriental Orthodox Churches also make this claim in respect to themselves.
_	According to David Smith, "a key feature of the Tamil Saiva Siddhanta, one might almost say its defining feature, is the claim that its source lies in the Vedas as well as the Agamas, in what it calls the Vedagamas".
_	1 to 1.5 million Armenians died in the years between 1915 and 1917/1923 - denial includes the claim that they were the result of a civil war within World War I, or refusal to accept there were deaths.
_	Golitsyn also provided other information, such as the claim that Harold Wilson (then Prime Minister of the United Kingdom) was a KGB agent.
_	During the trial Katherine made the claim that Judge Barlow borrowed $25,000 from her and had promised to pay her hotel bills as partial payment.
_	On April 10, 2008, Seattle asked the Federal District Court to order the NBA to release documents related to the financial situation of each team, the claim that the SuperSonics' lease with KeyArena was financially unworkable, and the league's involvement in requiring PBC to make a good-faith effort to stay in Seattle.
_	However, skeptics claim that the video is evidence that mountains not visible at night partially obstructed views from certain angles, thereby bolstering the claim that the lights were more distant than UFO advocates claim.
_	In 2016, "The Guardian" stated: "Some left-leaning economists look with particular scepticism on the claim that the IFS has no ideology, arguing that the institute holds an excessive faith in the power of market forces.
_	Following the match, manager Klopp expressed disappointment in the equalizer counting making the claim that Britos was offside when scoring.
_	Gould compared the claim that the universe is fine-tuned for the benefit of our kind of life to saying that sausages were made long and narrow so that they could fit into modern hotdog buns, or saying that ships had been invented to house barnacles.
_	Unlike his successors, he did not emphasize the idea of the Witches' Sabbath and was skeptical of the claim that witches could fly by night.
_	Diaz and Theodoulidis presented analysis contrary to the claim that HFT firms use the tactic to provide liquidity.
_	In it he rebutted the claim that it was German big business which primarily financed and otherwise promoted the attainment of power by Adolf Hitler.
_	Documented witness reports by victims falsely arrested by RADA also support the claim that RADA has extremists within its ranks.
_	He also dismissed as “an illusion” the claim that the men's broadcasts would harm Vietnamese-Chinese relations.
_	Similar graphs were used by those disputing the findings with the claim that the graph was inaccurate.
_	A notable radical feminist work on women's sexuality is Anne Koedt's The Myth of the Vaginal Orgasm, which advances the claim that vaginal orgasm is a patriarchal myth.
_	Chief among these was the claim that Jewish political independence could only be obtained through Divine intervention, with the coming of the Jewish Messiah.
_	In early August 2002 Barnett wrote to "The Daily Telegraph" opposing the American plan of invading Iraq, rejecting the claim that those opposed to the war were the equivalent of the appeasers of Adolf Hitler in the 1930s.
_	Regional security chief Ivan Stupak rejected the claim that the murders were committed to make internet snuff videos, saying that there was no evidence of this.
_	One source supports the claim that Northwest Maidu had at least 9 dialects, designated today according to the locality in which each was spoken.
_	South African rabbi David Hoffman rejected the claim that Zionism is a 'settler-colonial undertaking' and instead characterized Zionism as a national program of affirmative action, adding that there is unbroken Jewish presence in Israel back to antiquity.
_	As with the original experiment, those who lasted the course broadly confirmed the claim that novices could become professional-level traders, making small profits or at least lower losses trading in very turbulent markets during the filming than professionals, who lost four times greater amounts over the same period.
_	Such a theory is consistent if and only if it does "not" prove a particular sentence, called the Gödel sentence of the theory, which is a formalized statement of the claim that the theory is indeed consistent.
_	It found nothing to support the claim that "the drug trafficking activities of Blandón and Meneses were motivated by any commitment to support the Contra cause or Contra activities undertaken by CIA."
_	Kennedy noted that there were facts for and against the claim that Alvarado was in custody.
_	Christianity differs most significantly from the other religions in the claim that Jesus Christ is God the Son, but throughout its history, it has weathered schisms and theological disputes that have resulted in many distinct churches.
_	According to the narrative, Nimrod became extremely arrogant due to his wealth and power, to the point that he made the claim that he possessed the power of creation.
_	Joan was later to describe the relationship in her book "Lady Don't Fall Backwards", including the claim that her husband readily forgave the affair; if it had been anyone else, he is quoted as saying, he wouldn't have understood it, but with Tony Hancock, it made sense.
_	Meanwhile, the claim that the airstrike was cleared by Pakistani authorities was categorically denied by Pakistan which claimed that the attack continued for two hours, even after Pakistani officials alerted coalition forces to stop.
_	Writing against Marcion, Melito focused on Christ's divinity and humanity in order to counter the claim that Jesus was simply and uniquely divine; having no material counterpart.
_	At the end of 1868 his review in the "Archiv für Anthropologie" wondered about the claim that the work was "popular and scholarly", doubting whether the second was true, and expressed horror about such public discussion of man's place in nature with illustrations such as the evolutionary trees being shown to non-experts.
_	According to a House Committee on Government Reform report, however, "The arguments made by Garment, [William Bradford] Reynolds and Libby [in their testimony] focused on the claim that the SDNY was criminalizing what should have been a civil tax case.
_	The Court also rejected the Albanian argument that Greece might have been responsible, as well as the claim that the mines had been laid after 22 October, as being nothing more than conjecture.
_	FAIR uses this study to support the claim that media bias is propagated down from the management, and that individual journalists are relatively neutral in their work.
_	Another photo exists of a gun mounted on an armoured rail car with the caption of "Railway battery used in siege of Petersburg" although no textual evidence survives in support of the caption, which makes the claim that it is a photo of the Confederate gun from 1862 dubious.
_	Wildavsky makes the claim that presidents would prefer to focus foremost on foreign policy because he is granted more traditional, constitutional, and statutory authority when compared to his domestic policy powers.
_	The students were then immediately ejected for going onto the court, despite the claim that it was done to elicit "team spirit" from the crowd.
_	In February 3, 2015, an opinion piece in Guns Magazine passed criticism that Berman received for putting profit over principle was countered with the claim that critics have not "made that case with examples of documented unethical practices, or by refuting anything the man, who decries a government nanny state and endorses personal responsibility, claims."
_	Thus, the association of Rama with Ayodhya may be a result the claim that he was a member of the Ikshvaku family, and this family's association with Ayodhya.
_	Lasker himself denied the claim that he deliberately played bad moves, and most modern writers agree.
_	Given the inhospitable environment and lack of historical references in Roman, Persian and Indian sources, historians including Patricia Crone and Tom Holland have cast doubt on the claim that Mecca was a major historical trading outpost.
_	In August 2009 Jovanovic added to his court papers the claim that Rzucek's psychologist "engaged in some sort of sadomasochistic activity ... which explains the physical injuries apparent on [her] body when she went to the cops."
_	However numerous studies dispute the claim that discrimination accounts for the majority of the pay gap.
_	Even today, all witnesses reject the claim that Trimmi threatened the killer and his companion (both of whom had allegedly snorted cocaine minutes before the incident).
_	Foyle retires (or resigns) more than once, resigning at the end of the fourth series when his arrest of two murder suspects is thwarted by a bureaucrat with the claim that their work is too important to the war effort.
_	A further volume by the same authors, "Britannia Unchained", contained the claim that "Once they enter the workplace, the British are among the worst idlers in the world".
_	John is startled when Charlotte turns up on the Street with the claim that Colin is returning home, but when he questions her further, it transpires that she had only received text messages stating that he was not completely happy in Canada.
_	On American Family Talk radio, Fischer repeated the claim that Hitler was a homosexual, and stated that Hitler recruited homosexuals to be stormtroopers, because "homosexual soldiers basically had no limits and the savagery and brutality they were willing to inflict."
_	The Dodo bird verdict (or Dodo bird conjecture) is a controversial topic in psychotherapy, referring to the claim that all psychotherapies, regardless of their specific components, produce equivalent outcomes.
_	In his ruling, the judge wrote that the claim that the experts representing the IAA failed to notice the natural patina film or that no such film exists, is clearly unreasonable and cannot be accepted.
_	"His 1988 book, The Birth of the Palestinian Refugee Problem, 1947–1949, drove a coach and horses through the claim that the Palestinians left Palestine of their own accord or on orders from their leaders.
_	The police report makes the claim that the warning sent to the French Consulate was received five minutes "after" the main explosion.
_	The dollar was attacked on ground it would be too small; the double eagle on the claim that it would be heavily abraded in circulation, and would become lightweight.
_	These give an impression of historical realism, even though Barker tends to refute the claim that the novel is "historical fiction".
_	Evidence based in human anatomy also refutes the claim that the footprints are of human origin.
_	To respond to the claim that the mining operation would destroy Roşia Montană's "quaint" appeal, McAleer also points out that one of the Romanian government's stipulations was that Gabriel Resources would be required to clean up the existing pollution (the soil and water near the village contain high levels of cadmium and lead), and also would be required to maintain a fund with $30 million to be used for further clean-up of the area after the mining company discontinues its operations there.
_	Englert puts forward the claim that lies to the West of the island.
_	Rampant misinformation about "Eminem Presents: The Re-Up" included many false internet track listings and the claim that the mixtape would be a tribute to the late Proof of D12.
_	As stated earlier, the historians doubt the claim that the Tomaras established Delhi in 736 CE.
_	Some of these comics were used as the basis for a British TV Annual, a hardcover collection produced in time for Christmas, which also made the claim that man would venture into space in 1970 and would reach the moon by 2000.
_	"Silappatikaram" is also credited to bring folk songs to literary genre, a proof of the claim that folk songs institutionalised literary culture with the best maintained cultures root back to folk origin.
_	Sautman also stated that the claim that Tibet was the region most hit by China’s famine of 1959–1962 is based not on statistics gathered in Tibetan areas, but on anonymous refugee reports lacking in numerical specificity.
_	Finnis argues that the state should deter public approval of homosexual behaviour while refusing to persecute individuals on the basis of their sexual orientation, basing this position not on the claim that homosexual sex is unnatural but on the idea that it cannot involve the union of procreation and emotional commitment that heterosexual sex can, and is therefore an assault on heterosexual union.
_	These findings might give some support to the claim that modern humans from Africa arrived at southern China about 100,000 years ago (Zhiren Cave, Zhirendong, Chongzuo City: 100,000 years ago; and the Liujiang hominid (Liujiang County): controversially dated at 139,000–111,000 years ago ).
_	Children are advised not to befriend Jews, are given false information about them (such as the claim that Jews worship the Devil), and are encouraged to engage in "jihad" against Jews.
_	The Coronation Mass in C major, K. Deest is a parody mass based on Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart's opera "Così fan tutte" that was offered to Simrock by Carl Zulehner who had also sold the manuscript of the Mass in G major, K. Anh. 232 to the music publisher, with the claim that it was a Mozart "Coronation Mass".
_	Reynolds was a friend of the Welsh scholar and academic Sir John Rhys, and helped in 1893 to publish the essay written by Thomas Stephens that disproved the claim that Prince Madoc had discovered America.
_	Ann Carey, author of "Sister in Crisis", takes issue with the claim that those signing the letter represented over 50,000 religious sisters.
_	In 1972, the "Guinness Book of World Records" found no authoritative sources to support the claim that 35 people were killed by Renczi in early 20th-century Romania.
_	Excerpts from an April 2006 report compiled from sixteen U.S. government intelligence agencies has strengthened the claim that engaging in Iraq has increased terrorism in the region.
_	However, while Pushkin certainly made the claim that he was writing a historically-accurate poem, Babinski points out "for all his insistence upon historicity, Pushkin slanted the facts."
_	This includes the claim that events like terrorist bombings are more politically motivated than religious.
_	However, Jam later denied the claim that "Scandal" was ever suggested, although he confirmed there was encouragement to produce a "Control II".
_	On the third claim she rejects the claim that the law is vague and overbroad on grounds that the law "delineates a risk zone for criminal sanction".
_	Plantinga has stated that EAAN is not directed against "the theory of evolution, or the claim that human beings have evolved from simian ancestors, or anything in that neighborhood".
_	Serious doubts have been raised about the claim that a species of Ephedra synchronizes its pollination peak to the full moon in July.
_	But then it cannot validate the claim that percepts are subjective.
_	Antiquarian Charles Smith is the originator of the claim that the building is an early Irish stone church although no historical information is available prior to 1756 regarding its use.
_	In addition, the US military provided the media with "photocopies of the original handwritten Arabic letter" which were then translated, muddying the claim that it had been a computer document.
_	Numbers has also argued, "Despite the manifest shortcomings of the claim that Christianity gave birth to science—most glaringly, it ignores or minimizes the contributions of ancient Greeks and medieval Muslims—it too, refuses to succumb to the death it deserves."
_	Though he proclaimed himself a goldsmith, he employed a number of jewelers and manufacturers who may have done much of the work; that he was never a member of the goldsmith's guild further substantiates the claim that he subcontracted his work.
_	It is this use of an 'extra year' in the accounts which added further fuel to the claim that Hunt has knowingly misled the public on public health funding.
_	Ambrose points out that the US and the UK had to cope with a major logistical problem in order to maintain the huge number of surrendered German personnel and finds the claim that Eisenhower and the US military deliberately withheld support for the German POW to be without merit.
_	Even the claim that science is based upon testability of its theories has been met with qualifications.
_	Hirsch says there was a peer-reviewed study by the Endocrine Society supporting the claim that subjects lost over thirty pounds using Sensa.
_	One of his bombshells is the claim that the Grand Army based at Boulogne was never meant to invade England, too chancy an enterprise: it was a diversion to keep British forces at home.
_	In separate interviews in 2012 and 2014, James specified that he has sex with women but still identifies as a gay man, making the claim that "Regardless of whether I sleep with women or not, I’m still sleeping with men so I’m gay."
_	As the district court noted, we have repeatedly rejected the claim that the Sixteenth Amendment was improperly ratified.
_	As an expression of a cultural attitude descending from Aristotle, Sidney, when stating that the poet "never affirmeth," makes the claim that all statements in literature are hypothetical or pseudo-statements.
_	In 2001 Johnston investigated the claim that estate taxes, which Republicans call "death taxes," were so high that farm families were being forced to sell their family farms in order to pay the taxes.
_	In response to the claim that protesters assaulted a woman wearing a headscarf which was later proved to be fabricated, Davutoğlu claimed that the victim was the wife of one of his close students.
_	Goetz then expanded his motion to dismiss to include the claim that Ramseur and Canty, who had testified before the Grand Jury, must have committed perjury.
_	So the conspiracy theorists must instead challenge the claim that the attack even occurred.
_	Finally, whereas Socrates' willingness to face the death penalty is in Plato's "Apology" explained by Socrates' unwavering commitment to his divinely appointed mission to keep philosophizing at all costs, it is explained in the Xenophon/Hermogenes version by the claim that it is better for him to die now than to face the pains and limitations of advanced old age.
_	This theory of Truth has two levels: the claim that a proposition is true if it corresponds to things in reality; and that a proposition can be true if it conforms with the actual thing itself.
_	Joanna Sullivan, Philip Morris's main PR in Europe, advised her American superiors (June 1994) on how GEP might be used to combat the IARC's report, since this would give United Nations weight to the claim that second-hand smoke was potentially cancerous to non-smokers.
_	Kadyrov's spokesman Alvi Karimov rejected the allegations and described the report in the Russian newspaper, "Novaya Gazeta", as "absolute lies and disinformation", basing his denial on the claim that "you cannot detain and persecute people who simply do not exist in the republic.
_	Andrina Colquhoun, Archer's former mistress, confirmed that they had been having an affair in the 1980s, thus contradicting the claim that he and Mary Archer had been “happily married” at the time of the trial.
_	As there are no appearances of these entities in the phenomenal, Kant is able to make the claim that they cannot be known to a mind that works upon "such knowledge that has to do only with appearances".
_	Shotton's work seriously questions the legitimacy of the claim that computers cause addiction.
_	The UVSS rejected the claim that it owed money and took the CFS to court on February 17.
_	The melody of "Happy Birthday to You" comes from the song "Good Morning to All", which has traditionally been attributed to American sisters Patty and Mildred J. Hill in 1893, although the claim that the sisters composed the tune is disputed.
_	Addressing the claim that Bardulia was simply a scholarly term, the 20th century medievalist and statesman Claudio Sánchez-Albornoz y Menduiña defends
_	There is nothing to support the claim that Haijby was seduced by the King as a 14-year-old boy, but most commentators believe that he had a sexual relationship with the King in the 1930s.
_	Here he makes the claim that the Black Death caused the death of as much as 60% of the population of Europe.
_	Bikpakpaam however have vehemently and consistently refused the claim that they were in the battle against Dagombas.
_	In chapter 5 of her 2011 book, Braintrust, Churchland points out that the claim that mirror neurons are involved in understanding intentions (through simulating observed actions) is based on assumptions that are clouded by unresolved philosophical issues.
_	The fossil is about 125 million years old, making it one of the oldest metatherian fossils found and gives support to the claim that Asia was probably the center for diversification during the early Cretaceous.
_	Heidi Ravven argues that the claim that texts have "multiple levels of meaning" is a "pre-modern fiction" that, "With the advent of scientific historical scholarship of texts we can no longer claim [to be true]."
_	Volokh concludes by claiming that the analysis in his article "implicitly rebuts the argument that slippery slope arguments are inherently logically fallacious: the claim that A's will inevitably lead to B's as a matter of logical compulsion might be mistaken, but the more modest claim that A's may make B's more likely seems plausible."
_	In that trial, Blinder testified that White was suffering from depression and pointed to several behavioral symptoms of that depression, including the claim that White had gone from being highly health-conscious to consuming sugary foods and drinks such as Twinkies and Coca-Cola.
_	These reasons include the claim that the legislature is "sufficiently numerous to feel all the passions which actuate a multitude, yet not so numerous as to be incapable of pursuing the objects of its passions" and that its powers are both "more extensive, and less susceptible of precise limits".
_	It was closed in March 2006 without any proof brought to its various controversial allegations, including the claim that Romano Prodi, former and current Prime minister of Italy and former President of the European Commission, was the "KGB's man in Europe."
_	Similar scams involve making alleged job candidates pay money upfront in person for training materials or services, with the claim that upon successful completion, they will be offered a guaranteed job, which never materializes.
_	Hinton v Donaldson (1773, 5 Brn 508) was a case by which the Court of Session rejected the claim that copyright in Scots law existed beyond the limited term which had been introduced under the Statute of Anne.
_	John B. Quigley in "The Genocide Convention: An International Law Analysis" points out that at Macías Nguema's trial for genocide that Equatorial Guinea had not ratified the Genocide convention and that records of the court proceedings show that there was some confusion over whether Nguema and his co-defendants were tried under the laws of Spain (the former colonial power), or whether the trial was justified on the claim that the Genocide Convention was part of customary international law.
_	No records exist to support the claim that Thompson ever left the British Isles let alone lived in the area.
_	Some people, such as scholar Shiri Eisner, say that some make the claim that the term "erases nonbinary genders and sexes out of existence", as many dictionaries define bisexuality as "of, relating to, or having a sexual orientation to persons of either sex", "sexually attracted to both men and women" and other similar definitions.
_	The coherences of the whole enterprise is justified by Boole in what Stanley Burris has later called the "rule of 0s and 1s", which justifies the claim that uninterpretable terms cannot be the ultimate result of equational manipulations from meaningful starting formulae (Burris 2000).
_	This propaganda leaned on Jewish stereotypes to explain the claim that the Jewish people belong to an "inferior" race.
_	In the documentary style movie Green plays himself; Will Barratt, loyal Green's collaborator since 1997, is cameraman; and actor Ray Wise portrays Detective William Dekker, an eccentric and mysterious man who contacts Green with the claim that, monsters not only exist, but he knows where to find them.
_	Louis Fédié (1815–1899), the 19th-century author, amateur historian and president of the "Société des Arts et Sciences" in Carcassonne, popularised the claim that "Rhedae" was the village of Rennes-le-Château in his 1880 book "Le Comté de Razès et le diocèse d'Alet".
_	In a rebuttal of the claim that God might have implanted a false history of the age of the Universe in order to test our faith in the truth of the Torah, Rabbi Natan Slifkin, an author whose works have been banned by several Haredi rabbis for going against the tenets of the Talmud, writes:
_	Many examples from politics and theology (e.g., the claim that the Roman Emperor was in fact a "god") demonstrate that this principle was known by effective propagandists from early times, and continues to be applied to this day.
_	By contrast, the Charismatic Movement emphasizes the claim that prophecy is available to contemporary believers.
_	Philosophical theories of time do not usually interpret time to be in any unique way a production of human phenomenology, and the claim that we have some faculty by which we are aware of successive states of consciousness is trivially true.
_	Unlike other former ministers Goran Bogdanović, Božidar Đelić and Dragan Šutanovac were allowed to stay MPs under the claim that the party needs them in parliament.
_	These included the claim that the four-year interval was a lacuna in the manuscript, where the original author was supposed to have left off and a "more modern hand" continued the manuscript; there are many subsequent breaches in the narrative where the original was supposed to have been defaced by damp.
_	Ryanair countered with the claim that the ASA had "demonstrated a repeated lack of independence, impartiality and fairness".
_	In George Lawton's 1983 publication "Within the Rock of Ages" the author finds the claim that "Rock of Ages" was written at Burrington Combe to be only a legend, although he does state that "It is extremely doubtful whether at this distance of time, the legend that it was written in a cleft there can be proved or disproved."
_	A group of eleven petitioners, not including their children, entreated the Council of New Netherland for freedom, based on the claim that it was impossible for them to support their growing families under slavery.
_	He argued too that the very life-and-death nature of the AIDS crisis made the group's purpose political, rather than academic, rejecting the claim that the group's insistence on the complexity of the issues it addressed was "dangerous relativism".
_	He argues that very few people would answer "yes", undermining the claim that religion is needed to make us behave morally.
_	In a paper in "American Statistician", Michael Goodman makes the claim that doubleheaders are swept more often than they are split.
_	He accepted the claim that the Celestial Master of Mount Longhu was descended from Zhang Daoling and granted the school the right to control affairs relating to Daoism in the Jiangnan area.
_	Werner (1995), for instance, is sceptical of the claim that "Tattvopaplavasimha" is a Cārvāka text.
_	The locavore movement has been criticized by Dr. Vasile Stănescu, the co-senior editor of the "Critical Animal Studies" book series, as being idealistic and for not actually achieving the environmental benefits of the claim that the reduced food miles decreases the amount of gasses emitted.
_	For example, Rusiński limits himself to the claim that, "as an economic phenomenon, the settlement must undoubtedly be assessed positively."
_	Cicero secured a meeting with Caesar, who seemed receptive, but then an order was made to arrest Ligarius on charges that are no longer clear, but appear to have involved the claim that he conspired with King Juba I of Numidia.
_	In one article Celso Bianco, the executive vice president for America's Blood Centers, noted the difficulty in believing the claim that Saddam donated 27 liters of blood in only a 2-year period; "The amount of donation allowed for a blood donor in the United States is five or six pints over the course of a year, or less than a gallon, Bianco said.
_	It establishes sovereignty over all areas of human experience based on the claim that it "'thinks' better than we can".
_	Thus, despite the public awareness of the whereabouts of convicted sex offenders, there has been little evidence to back the claim that mandatory registration has made society safer.
_	A speech by Isaeus, a 4th-century BCE speechwriter, rests on the claim that the speaker's mother only became an "epikleros" after her young brother died following their father's death.
_	He further justified his support for the election results with the claim that, in any case, all African elections were known to be rigged at that time.
_	While making remarks on rape and abortion on August 19, 2012, Akin made the claim that women victims of what he described as "legitimate rape" rarely experience pregnancy from rape.
_	When DeWald is called in to contest the claim that Axel was attacked by the security men without prior challenge, Axel immediately recognizes DeWald as Todd's killer, but Rosewood and Flint refuse to believe that claim because DeWald is keeping an impeccable public reputation.
_	His posthumous work "Bilibra Veritatis" was written to substantiate the claim that the Targums prove the doctrine of the Trinity.
_	There is also no evidence for the claim that Tsuru went by the nickname "Chōchō-san" (Ms Butterfly).
_	An increasing minority of pastors has expressed concern that there is a lack of biblical support for the claim that Spirit baptism must always be accompanied with speaking in tongues.
_	In response to the claim that Operation Streamline is an effective deterrent, critics of the program claim that the incentives to cross the border in order to work or be with family are much stronger.
_	Similarly, this account discusses the publication Time, and its cover story of Carl Sagan in 1980 as propagating the claim that popular science has "turned into enthusiasm".
_	Rick Alan Ross, an anti-cultist and deprogrammer, referred to the murder trial of Scott Peterson, in which the defense made the claim that the killings were by a "Satanic cult" rather than the defendant.
_	Moreover, the claim that the Hewlett Study demonstrated that AES can be as reliable as human raters has since been strongly contested, including by Randy E. Bennett, the Norman O. Frederiksen Chair in Assessment Innovation at the Educational Testing Service.
_	Joseph Kimble, a modern plain-English expert and advocate, rejects the claim that legalese is less ambiguous in "The Great Myth that Plain Language is not Precise".
_	On 11 September 2015, ACF Fiorentina filed a complaint to FIFA with the claim that Chelsea alleging breach of contract when they allowed Salah to join Roma on loan.
_	Joseph Fitzmyer disputes the claim that the "Apostolic Decree" is based on "Noahide Law" () and instead proposes as the basis, see also Leviticus 18.
_	The film advances the claim that terrorist networks derive much of their income from poached ivory.
_	The "Zonaras proviso", the claim that Easter must always follow Nisan 14 in the Hebrew calendar, was not formulated until after some centuries.
_	But the claim that Hitler and the Thule Society conspired to create a New World Order (a conspiracy theory, put forward on some webpages) is completely unfounded.
_	In this work, Coman describes the historical economic processes that led to the Far West coming under the control of American settlers, making the claim that American settlers were economically superior to explorers, traders, trappers, and local indigenous peoples because they formed stable settlements, reproduced themselves through their family structures, and established networks of collaboration.
_	These theories were developed in opposition to Nordicism, the claim that the Nordic race was of pure Aryan stock and naturally superior to other Europeans.
_	The third reason for the emphasis on sexual orientation may be due to the belief in the Just World Hypothesis, i.e., the claim that we live in a world where people generally get what they deserve.
_	Abu Hayyan al-Gharnati in Al-Bahr al-Muhti has made the claim that the majority of scholars regard it as a Madani Surah.
_	In his book, Morag brings evidence against the claim that the Talmud was not commonly taught in Yemen, and points out the Yemenite manuscripts of the Babylonian Talmud and their value for determining the characteristics of the Yemenite tradition.
_	While the CPUC did not refute the claim that there was not media or public focus on the southern route, the CPUC has stated that the legally required notifications occurred.
_	For example, the claim that sailors entered the house in the 1870s was invented by Elliott O'Donnell and there is no evidence to confirm any part of the story.
_	Kuper rejects the claim that Muslims are any kind of demographic threat, asserting that Muslims comprise "less than 4 percent" of the EU population, and that their allegedly high birth rates are rapidly falling into line with that of other Europeans.
_	According to some scholars, Rousseau exercised minimal influence on the American founders like Thomas Jefferson despite the similarities between their ideas, such as shared beliefs regarding the self-evidence of the claim that "all men are created equal," their shared conviction that citizens of a republic be educated at public expense, and the evident parallel between the United States Constitution framers' concept of the "general welfare" and Rousseau's concept of the "general will"; and the parallels between Jeffersonian democracy, and Rousseau's praise of Switzerland and Corsica's economies of isolated and self-sufficient independent homesteads and his endorsement of a well-regulated citizen militia, such as those of the Swiss cantons.
_	By describing these events Jacobs II does a good job of supporting the claim that Campus Martius was culturally significant.
_	Brandon's most influential work, "Jesus and the Zealots," was published in 1967, wherein he advanced the claim that Jesus fitted well within the ideology of the anti-Roman Zealot group.
_	Unfortunately, Whitehead's attribution of this coin to Kujula, and the claim that the seated figure on the obverse represents the Buddha, is now known to be incorrect.
_	This seriously undercuts the claim that earthquakes at Parkfield are quasi-periodic, and suggests the individual events differ sufficiently in other respects to question whether they have distinct characteristics in common.
_	Then the boy returned with the claim that dogs were worrying the cows; Covan said he could not have driven the dogs out in the time it took to reach him.
_	Among their conclusions was the claim that "difficult to culture and dormant bacteria are involved in the latency of infection and that these persistent bacteria may be pathogenic."
_	Soil survey geological evidences and lack of human occupation artefacts led scientists to formulate the claim that the Netherlands was largely underwater between the 3rd century and 1050.
_	Their chief grievance is the claim that, in their coverage of the 2012 Mexican presidential election, the national television duopoly Televisa and TV Azteca have been biased towards Peña Nieto, who leads the polls with one month to go When their protest was dismissed as paid for and ignored by the mass media, hundreds protested in front of Televisa's studios, and at least 46,000 people responded by taking their protest to Mexico City's main avenue.
_	The claims made by the Church of Scientology were not challenged by some early writers; C.H. Rolph quoted without comment a 1968 Scientology biographical sketch circulated to British Members of Parliament in which Hubbard's war service was summarized, and in 1971 Paulette Cooper described as "true" the claim that Hubbard "was severely injured in the war (and in fact was in a lifeboat for many days, badly injuring his body and his eyes in the hot Pacific sun)."
_	Talich re-orchestrated "Taras Bulba" and the Suite from "Cunning Little Vixen" justifying the latter with the claim that "it was not possible to perform it in the Prague National Theatre unless it was entirely re-orchestrated".
_	Toi-yeung dismissed the claim that they incited the violent clashes and stated that they were only there to defend the street hawkers.
_	Very widespread is also the claim that it was used in the White House in Washington, D.C.
_	This pays the debt for the wounded peasant; and for the claim that Lady Rohanne had the forest burned, she demands an apology or vindication, and all agree upon trial by combat between Dunk and Ser Lucas, to be fought in the stream as the only neutral ground present.
_	To begin, notice that it quickly implies the claim that if formula_13 is complete, then its completion is the group formula_21 defined above.
_	He disputes the claim that the Jews served a defeated God and were naturally hostile to Roman civilization.
_	Jean-Paul Sartre offers a critique of Freud's theory of the unconscious in "Being and Nothingness", based on the claim that consciousness is essentially self-conscious.
_	To the claim that European and Asian civilizations are, at the time, more advanced than African societies, Boas objected that against the total history of humankind, the past two thousand years is but a brief span.
_	His more recent transport activities oppose the claim that road congestion reduction is obtained from improving urban mass transit.
_	This incident immediately gave rise to the claim that the woman was being held in the convent against her will; a mob invaded and then burned down the convent in an effort to free her.
_	The first premise makes the claim that a theory is underdetermined.
_	She shows that the claim that such a semantics leads to contradictions is false.
_	In the book, he questions not only the content of the interview, which portrays Staley as using his lyrics in casual conversation, it dispels the claim that she held the interview at all.
_	Also supporting the claim that this is the Fanum Voltumnae is the fact that the area was used continuously for religious purposes right from the 6th century BC up to the 15th century.
_	According to Oldson, the claim that Jews were economic "vampires" was entirely unsubstantiated, even hypocritical: "[Iorga was] a Moldavian and fully aware of the complex causes of that province's poverty".
_	Grey, who had recently returned from a term as Governor of the Cape Colony in South Africa, where the military settlement of Xhosa land had been undertaken, embraced the idea and in a dispatch to the Colonial Office a month later set out details of the plan, repeating the claim that Māori planned the wholesale destruction of some European settlements.
_	Loosely based on the real life events of Alessandro Cagliostro, the film has many historical inaccuracies, including the claim that Giuseppe Balsamo and Cagliostro were two different persons.
_	Another twelfth-century writer, William of Malmesbury, added the claim that Joseph of Aramathea had arrived in Glastonbury in his "Gesta Regum Anglorum".
_	Foote denied making the claim that Duggan had fired at police, saying he was "surprised" that early reports of the incident described a "shoot out".
_	The basis for the suit was the claim that Bakiyev broke the law by being an active member of the Ak Jol political party The Court rejected the claim.
_	Even if "E&N" defeated the claim that 'at least 90% of our beliefs are true,' they considered that Plantinga must show that it also defeats the more modest claim that 'at least a non-negligible minority of our beliefs are true'.
_	The contradiction between the claim that "all men are created equal" and the existence of American slavery attracted comment when the Declaration of Independence was first published.
_	In August 2011, responding to the claim that his work inspired Norwegian murderer Anders Behring Breivik, Trifković rejected the idea that his work was a basis for the actions of this "mentally deranged narcissistic psychopath" any more than the "Beatles have inspired Charles Manson."
_	Radford is also a contributor to the Snopes.com urban legends web site, where he has researched and written articles debunking fakelore and a variety of popular myths including The Amityville Horror and the claim that humans only use 10% of their brains.
_	One major difficulty with the argument relates to the claim that pregnancy and child-bearing are within the scope of the term "servitude".
_	Further, the claim that these works, on their true interpretation, are harmless metaphorical imagery fully compatible with monotheism is disingenuous: the origins of most Kabbalistic concepts in pagan systems such as Neoplatonism and Gnosticism are too glaringly obvious to be ignored.
_	Other common objections turn on the claim that the embryo is the pregnant woman's child whereas the violinist is a stranger (the stranger versus offspring objection); that abortion kills the embryo whereas unplugging the violinist merely lets him die (the killing versus letting die objection); or, similarly, that abortion intentionally causes the embryo's death whereas unplugging the violinist merely causes death as a foreseen but unintended side-effect (the intending versus foreseeing objection; cf the doctrine of double effect).
_	A final investigation, led by White House independent Counsel Kenneth Starr also concluded that there was no evidence to support the claim that Foster was murdered.
_	According to the scholars, there are good reasons to doubt the claim that the author was a close companion of Guru Nanak and accompanied him on many of his travels.
_	The increased incidence of IBD since World War 2 has been linked to the increase in meat consumption worldwide, supporting the claim that animal protein intake is associated with IBD.
_	When investigation reveals that the claim that Will is alive originates from Dr Rolf, this ignites hope that it is true.
_	Historically, laws against suicide and mercy killing have developed from religious doctrine, for example, the claim that only God has the right to determine when a person will die.
_	According to the U.S. Senate Select Committee on Intelligence report on CIA torture and the report itself as reported in "The New York Times", Kessler's book, "The CIA at War", "included inaccurate claims about the effectiveness of CIA interrogations" provided by the CIA to Kessler and "New York Times" reporter Douglas Jehl, such as the claim that the arrests of terrorist suspects were based on information from interrogations of other terrorists under torture.
_	On 28 November Mary Harney defended herself with the claim that she was "not on holiday", had not used public taxes for her own personal grooming, blamed the use of the government jet on the Taoiseach and had followed "advice" in claiming her expenses.
_	In a 2009 interview with guitarist Rick Nielsen, the interviewer asked if Nielsen would comment on the claim that Comita wrote the song.
_	Villon fled, and was sentenced to banishment – a sentence which was remitted in January 1456 by a pardon from King Charles VII after he received the second of two petitions which made the claim that Sermoise had forgiven Villon before he died.
_	Although the Ninth Circuit allowed the plaintiffs to proceed with their claims of conversion, unjust enrichment, restitution, and an accounting against the Vatican Bank, it agreed to the dismissal of the claims against the Croatian Liberation Movement and the claim that the Vatican bank supported the Ustaše in committing genocide and other war crimes.
_	These scripts may include medically inaccurate information intended to persuade the patient not to have an abortion, such as the claim that the abortion will increase the risk of breast cancer or of psychological problems, which are not supported by mainstream medical organizations or scientific consensus.
_	Wilson called the claim that sociobiology is biological determinism "academic vigilantism" and the Sociobiology Study Group response "a largely ideological argument".
_	Another critic, T.J. Naftali, writes: "The Intrepid myth included the claim that Sir William [Stephenson] had contributed to the actual process of decryption by providing British codebreakers with a copy of the German Enigma machine and by encouraging them to use computers to 'unbutton' German signals."
_	However, Mendelsohn does not find the claim that the song was inspired by Princess Anne to be very credible.
_	The organisation was outlawed and Ioseliani imprisoned, although many regarded the claim that it had been involved in the bombing as being inconclusively proven.
_	LGE did not challenge the claim that the intended and reasonable use of the microprocessor products was to incorporate them into computers, but it claimed that some noninfringing uses existed: they could be sold overseas, as repair parts, or by disabling the features that made them patented.
_	Milton begins his argument with the claim that "the increase of popery is at this day no small trouble and offence to the greatest part of the nation."
_	Of these 608 citations, the analysis also showed that 72.2% of them cited it in support of the claim that patients treated with opioids rarely developed addiction, and 80.8% did not mention that the letter only included data on prescriptions given to hospitalized patients.
_	This resulted in a lawsuit against the then-Olugbo by another royal family in the same lineage who demanded that he should be dethroned with the claim that his family had occupied the seat for over 200 years.
_	An 1826 book posing to be the autobiography of a French Sergeant Robert Guillemard contains the claim that it was he who shot Nelson.
_	The cosmological argument is closely related to the principle of sufficient reason as addressed by Gottfried Leibniz and Samuel Clarke, itself a modern exposition of the claim that "nothing comes from nothing" attributed to Parmenides.
_	The Campaign was formed to raise awareness of how housework and childcare are the base of all industrial work and to stake the claim that these unavoidable tasks should be compensated as paid wage labor.
_	Officials have not confirmed these reports, while the BBC has characterised the claim that this can be heard on a video, as a false social media rumour.
_	Some free market advocates argue that political and civil liberties have simultaneously expanded with market-based economies, and present empirical evidence to support the claim that economic and political freedoms are linked.
_	In February 2006, team management went public with the claim that without the revenue from the Rose Garden, the Blazers have found it difficult to turn a profit.
_	Ellen Willis (who coined the term "pro-sex feminism") states "As we saw it, the claim that 'pornography is violence against women' was code for the neo-Victorian idea that men want sex and women endure it."
_	James Beilby wrote: "Plantinga's argument should "not" be mistaken for an argument against evolutionary theory in general or, more specifically, against the claim that humans might have evolved from more primitive life forms.
_	Động 24h broadcast a program pointing out problems with the birth certificate, the program also published more documents to back up the claim that Công Phượng born in 1993 and asked Công Phượng to speak up.
_	A reason given was the claim that it was in poor condition.
_	Two other witnesses corroborated the claim that Asgedom had jumped in front of the truck.
_	This opinion was based on the claim that the ancient Macedonian language had Slavic components in it, and thus, the ancient Macedonians were Slavic, and that modern Macedonians were descendants of them.
_	Mitchel's statement supports the claim that Forrest had offered a number of times three of four guineas for assistance in the removal of bodies from the graveyard.
_	A Philosophical Critique is a 1984 book by the philosopher Adolf Grünbaum, in which the author offers a philosophical critique of Sigmund Freud and psychoanalysis, evaluating the claim that it is a natural science.
_	If Alex is not aware that Hesperus and Phosphorus are the same planet, then it seems that he could believe that Hesperus is visible in the evening while rejecting the claim that Phosphorus is visible in the evening (perhaps he thinks Phosphorus, the morning star, is only visible in the morning).
_	Knöchlein's defence hinged on the claim that he was not present at the massacre, although his lawyers did not deny that the event took place.
_	In the telegram, they made the claim that the routine proficiency flights performed by pilots caused unnecessary stress on the aircraft.
_	Goetz (2010) published a study that supported the claim that gentrification led to the scarcity of public housing, which disproportionately affected residents that rely on the availability of public housing.
_	Responding to the claim that the situated knowledge thesis reifies essentialism, Wylie thus argues that it is "an open (empirical) question whether such structures obtain in a given context, what form they take, and how they are internalized or embodied by individuals" (Wylie, p. 62).
_	Before 1999, Articles 2 and 3 made the claim that the whole island formed one "national territory".
_	On May 9, 1991, he appeared on "The Tonight Show" to speak about the cancer and to condemn the tabloid press for their sensational headlines and inaccurate stories, including the claim that he and his wife were trying to have another child.
_	After a group of scholars from Harvard promoted the claim that Ericcson discovered America, he proposed a motion to the Cambridge City Council that officially renamed Harvard Square to Columbus Square.
_	Specifically there is no evidence in the corpus of nuclear science to substantiate the claim that nickel will spontaneously ionize hydrogen gas and therefore 'absorb' the resulting proton".
_	Marx deepens and expands this idea into the claim that humankind itself can adapt society to its own purposes rather than adapting themselves to it.
_	Though there is no documentary evidence to support it, Carmelite tradition suggests that a community of Jewish hermits had lived at the site from the time of Elijah until the Carmelites were founded there; prefixed to the Carmelite Constitution of 1281 was the claim that from the time when Elijah and Elisha had "dwelt devoutly on Mount Carmel", priests and prophets, Jewish and Christian, had lived "praiseworthy lives in holy penitence" adjacent to the site of the "fountain of Elisha" in an uninterrupted succession.
_	In response to state budget woes, UC Berkeley Chancellor Robert Birgeneau in 2011 made the claim that his own university is turning into a federal and not a state institution because of the inversion of the proportion of funds given by each jurisdiction since he became Chancellor in 2004.
_	Ruddock said the letter contained "new evidence supporting the claim that seamen of Bristol had already discovered land across the ocean before John Cabot's arrival in England."
_	As the most sustained series of Australian comedian comedies produced before World War II, these films provide some support for the claim that George Wallace is Australia's equivalent of Charles Chaplin.
_	That is, he rests his case against belief in miracles upon the claim that laws of nature are supported by exceptionless testimony, but testimony can only be accounted exceptionless if we discount the occurrence of miracles.
_	A gluten "friendly" base was also on the menu for the first time, with an Eagle Boys spokesperson claiming it was more transparent than claiming it could offer a gluten-free base—only food prepared in a gluten-free kitchen can make the claim that it is truly offering a gluten free range.
_	The actor-observer asymmetry is often confused with the hypothesis of a self-serving bias in attribution — the claim that people choose explanations in a strategic way so as to make themselves appear in a more positive light.
_	The paternalistic portion of the term "lies in the claim that it is legitimate for choice architects to try to influence people's behavior in order to make their lives longer, healthier, and better".
_	In 1944, the American Rembrandt scholar Julius S. Held contested the claim that the subject was Polish and suggested the rider's costume could be Hungarian.
_	Further research has found the claim that William was married to "Hermingerda", daughter of Fulk IV of Anjou is based on the very unreliable chronicle of William of Tyre, written between 1169 and 1187, more than 70 years after the events in question would have taken place.
_	However, according to Castoriadis' analysis, since the mode of distribution of the social product is inseparable from the mode of production, the claim that one can have control over distribution while not having control over production is meaningless.
_	This essentially sets the framework for the entire case and the claim that will be held noteworthy throughout the entire lawsuit.
_	It is one of the most important paradigms used in Neoanalytic scholarship on Homer because of strong similarities between its story of Achilles, Antilochus, and Memnon, and the Iliadic story of Achilles, Patroclus, and Hector; the claim that such a similarity exists is known as the "Memnon theory".
_	There are no records or firsthand accounts of this illegal activity but an investigative newspaper article did identify that such a doctor did exist and that local lore supported the claim that he performed many abortions.
_	Though in "Moby-Dick" Ishmael, with a nod to Sir Thomas Browne's wording, denies the claim that land animals find their counterparts in the sea,For though some old naturalists have maintained that all creatures of the land are of their kind in the sea; and though taking a broad general view of the thing, this may very well be; yet coming to specialties, where, for example, does the ocean furnish any fish that in disposition answers to the sagacious kindness of the dog?
_	Strong rule utilitarianism (SRU) gives a utilitarian account for the claim that moral rules should be obeyed at all places and times.
_	Four out of the five Chicago Police districts throughout which the program was initially tested in 1993 are characterized by a majority African-American population and high crime rates, backing the claim that little was done within these communities to curb illegal activities.
_	As well as this, McIvor also makes the claim that New Zealand women are overrepresented in less serious types of crimes such as theft and fraud and underrepresented in more serious types of crime such as crimes of violence.
_	An argument is the claim that obscene fictional images portray children as sex objects, thereby contributing to child sexual abuse.
_	Henry rejects the claim that Treasury acted improperly, saying "We rejected that charge at the time.
_	Soucy's judicious comparisons demolish the claim that the PSF was not fascist because it played the electoral game.
_	Fernando Cangiano of the 10th Armoured Cavalry Reconnaissance Squadron that fought in the Falklands War, has also dismissed the claims about the "supposed widespread sadism present among the Argentine officers and NCOs" and the claim that the conscripts had not handled themselves well in the fighting.
_	Pastore contrasted this with the claim that behaviorists were more likely to be liberals or leftists, that they believe economic disadvantage and structural problems in the social order were to blame for group differences.
_	The town proves to be his idea, and the claim that it is respectable to take in boarders proves false.
_	A common way of explaining the thesis invokes the claim that amoralists are possible – that there could be someone who makes moral judgments without feeling the slightest corresponding motivation.
_	The Founding Church of Scientology of Washington, D.C. had obtained tax-exempt status in 1956 on the claim that it was "a corporation organized and operated exclusively for religious purposes, no part of the earnings of which inures to any individual".
_	The identification of Europa in this myth gives weight to the claim that the civilization of the European continent was born on the island of Crete.
_	The Hindu supports the claim that Temple was built in the 1960s and produced pictures of Charminar taken in the year 1957 and 1962 showing that no temple existed at the said location.
_	Negatives also make the claim that fairness arguments cannot be evaluated because there will always be some amount of unfairness in debate.
_	While this is a large number of children, the claim that Fath-Ali holds the record is not true.
_	Tehrik-i-Taliban spokesman Maulvi Omar, himself captured five days after the attack, denied the claim that al-Masri had been killed.
_	Some types of premium goods (such as expensive French wines, or celebrity-endorsed perfumes) are sometimes called Giffen goods—via the claim that lowering the price of these high status goods decreases demand because they are no longer perceived as exclusive or high status products.
_	The basis of opposition to the bill was the claim that it gave full control over the black population to the Crown, and the counter-claim that it did not put the black population under the control of the British government.
_	However, general second-language research has failed to support the critical period hypothesis in its strong form (i.e., the claim that full language acquisition is impossible beyond a certain age).
_	An example is the claim that he was an Arab whose real name was "Sheikh Zubayr".
_	The idea of unidirectionality is an important one when trying to predict language change through grammaticalization (and for making the claim that grammaticalization can be predicted).
_	According to Serve the People, Marxism distinguishes itself from other forms of socialism (e.g. utopian socialism) by building on scientific theories regarding the development of human society, and the claim that through praxis, humans can influence this societal development:
_	In a review for the Hoover Institution, author Aaron Mannes says that "Now They Call Me Infidel" provides support for the claim that "improving the status of women is essential to reform in the Muslim world."
_	The investigation cited as evidence the claim that no blast was audible on recordings of the collapse and that no blast was reported by witnesses, stating that it would have been audible at a level of 130-140 decibels at a distance of half a mile.
_	Spooner challenged the claim that the text of the Constitution permitted slavery.
_	Advocates of counterfactual history often respond that all statements about causality in history contain implicit counterfactual claims—for example, the claim that a certain military decision helped a country win a war presumes that if that decision had not been made, the war would have been less likely to be won, or would have been longer.
_	The fault for these violations may or may not lie with the sender, and such assertions may or may not relieve the sender of liability, but the assertion would invalidate the claim that the signature necessarily proves authenticity and integrity.
_	It makes the claim that the "vimānas" mentioned in ancient Sanskrit epics were advanced aerodynamic flying vehicles.
_	During the Second World War he worked as a war artist on behalf of the Wehrmacht, covering the western campaign and the invasion of France, including the depiction of undamaged French cathedrals amidst the ruins of bombed cities, which was used to propagate the claim that German forces gave "magnanimous protection to architectural cultural heritage".
_	Evidence of an urban, orthogonal layout was found, dating to the EB II, supporting the claim that the city was one of the regional urban centers of the period.
_	Besides, they noticed that some web pages — which were being investigated by the authorities — were deleted out of the blue by the website owner, despite the claim that Ripoff Report does not remove reports.
_	There is the claim that "Hispania" derives from the Basque word "Ezpanna" meaning "edge" or "border", another reference to the fact that the Iberian Peninsula constitutes the southwest corner of the European continent.
_	Its study is motivated by the claim that the human race will have to get the control problem right "the first time", as a misprogrammed superintelligence might rationally decide to "take over the world" and refuse to permit its programmers to modify it after launch.
_	He also highlights the Cedillo v. Secretary of Health and Human Services, beginning on June 11, 2007, in which the Cedillo family's lawsuit made the claim that Thiomersal, a compound found in Hepatitis B, DPT, and Hib vaccines, weakened their daughter’s immune system such that the live measles virus found within the MMR vaccine overwhelmed her system and thereby caused Autism.
_	Unnamed sources have leaked the claim that the gunshot was self-inflicted, though no autopsy has been completed.
_	Tyler D. Parry, Associate Professor of African American Studies, contests the claim that no literal jump was used in Britain, arguing that enslaved people of African descent and British migrants engaged in numerous cultural exchanges during the 18th and 19th centuries.
_	Simon Pieters researched the XML-compliance of mobile browsers and concluded “the claim that XHTML would be needed for mobile devices is simply a myth”.
_	"The Telegraph" quoted from his JTF-GTMO assessment, the claim that Moqbil had acknowledged participating in hostilities.
_	Circumstantial evidence makes nearly impossible the claim that it was Squanto among the three taken by Gorges, and no modern historian entertains this as fact.
_	The report reiterated the claim that the MBH method created a hockey-stick shape from random red noise, but Wegman failed to respond when the issue was shown to have been caused by an error in McIntyre and McKitrick's methodology, and despite repeated requests did not provide his code for comparison.
_	Contrary to the claim that there was no sign that Duggan had come into contact with the cars, there were "traces on the underside of the Golf," according to Cecilia Ivimy on behalf of the Attorney General.
_	There is no evidence supporting the claim that Ganapathy was born in 1912 in Thambikkottai Keelakkadu Sundaram Village in Thanjavur District, Tamil Nadu, South India.
_	During the 51st Golden Orange Festival in 2014, which was organized by Justice and Development Party (Turkey)'s municipality, Reyan Tuvi's feature-length documentary on the 2013-2014 Gezi protests, titled Yeryüzü Aşkın Yüzü Oluncaya Dek (Until The Earth's Face Becomes Love's Face), was removed from the festival with the claim that the documentary violated articles 125 and 299 of the Turkish Penal Code.
_	Objective law is distinguished from law in the subjective sense, which is "a network of legal relationships and messes among legal subjects," and which deals with rights, or "the claim that a legal subject has on a legal object."
_	Recent studies also support the claim that only children are not markedly different from their peers with siblings.
_	Many young adults took interest in the claim that Rawat could impart direct knowledge of God to his followers, and some have said to have experienced it.
_	Jonathan Zimmerman, a historian at New York University, wrote that the claim that gay people helped bring Nazism to Germany "is a flat-out lie."
_	They also reiterated the claim that the Coast Guard had delayed cleanup by refusing to give permission to immediately use chemical dispersants on the spill.
_	He endorsed the most hostile policies toward his Jewish subjects, partly due to the claim that the Jews were aiding the Ottoman Turks during the local uprising against them.
_	Building on this tradition, the Australian poet James McAuley (1917–76) wrote an epic called "Captain Quiros" (1964), in which he depicted Queirós as a martyr for the cause of Catholic Christian civilisation (although he did not repeat the claim that Queirós had discovered Australia).
_	A police surgeon who performed an autopsy on the deceased, Dr. Baqir Shah, while testifying in court, rejected the claim that the foreigners had attacked the police with hand grenades.
_	According to ""Te Rii Ni Banaba—The Backbone of Banaba"" by Raobeia Ken Sigrah, Banaban oral history supports the claim that the people of the Te Aka clan, which originated in Melanesia, were the original inhabitants of Banaba (Ocean Island), having arrived before the arrival of later migrations from the East Indies and Kiribati.
_	Stalingrad was renamed for him on the claim that he had single-handedly, and against orders, saved it in the civil war.
_	He has repeatedly made the claim that "Over the protests of colleagues, Teller mislead the highest officials of the United States government into the deadly folly known as Star Wars".
_	Complaints are dismissed by American politicians and other government legislators with the claim that the racism that may East Asian Americans still face is less important than or not as bad as the racism faced by other minority races, thus establishing an systematically deceptive racial hierarchy.
_	Some critics and Progressive Adventists, typically reject the claim that the three angels' messages find unique fulfillment in the Seventh-day Adventist Church.
_	City calls itself the City of Fountains and has more than 200 fountains (with the claim that only Rome, Italy has more fountains).
_	According to K0SR the claim that quads "open the band earlier", which suggests that they exhibit a lower angle of radiation than Yagis, has persisted for 50 years in spite of the fact that computer models disagree.
_	Neoconservatives endorse democracy promotion by the U.S. and other democracies, based on the claim that they think that human rights belong to everyone.
_	In 1885, Leopold II established the Congo Free State under the auspices of the International Association of the Congo, by securing the European community's agreement with the claim that he was involved in humanitarian and philanthropic work.
_	The report added that there was "no evidence to support the claim that President Kennedy was struck by a bullet fired from either the grassy knoll or any other position to his front, right front, or right side …
_	The traditional application of the Christian Sabbath to Sunday is based on the claim that the Sabbath was moved to the Lord's Day, the day that Jesus rose from the dead.
_	After defeating a strong Haskell Indian team, 23–7, Hakell's manager praised the work of the Texas line, and the "Galveston Daily News" reported: "Louis Jordan proved his right to the claim that he is one of the best guards Texas has ever produced, the big blond captain of the orange fighting throughout the game like a demon."
_	Since the time of her death there have been various conflicting rumors or allegations that she worked for the Soviet KGB and/or the East German Stasi; along with the claim that she and Che Guevara were lovers while in Bolivia, and that she may have even been carrying his child when she was killed; this was finally refuted in 2017 by Bolivian [living in Puebla, Mexico for about 50 years]
_	A major criticism has been the claim that "V. shiloi" was misidentified as the causative agent of coral bleaching, and that its presence in bleached "O. patagonica" was simply that of opportunistic colonization.
_	Thus, according to the complaint, the claim that Ecstacy is safe and side effect free is both false and unsubstantiated.""
_	He subsequently made the claim that Beausoleil was responsible for the theft of the footage.
_	However, their opposition to the reforms was based on the argument that no similar provisions would be applied for the Muslims on the claim that they weren't sufficiently advanced.
_	Marat then published his work, with the claim that the Academy approved of its contents.
_	His ends with the claim that "in a time ... when both rights and reason are under several kinds of open and covert attack, the life and writing of Thomas Paine will always be part of the arsenal on which we shall need to depend."
_	The observation of homosexual behavior in animals can be seen as both an argument for and against the acceptance of homosexuality in humans, and has been used especially against the claim that it is a "peccatum contra naturam" ("sin against nature").
_	They also found that the claim that drying out of ligaments would make the position does not seem believable either.
_	Breaches of Indigenous autonomy by the U.S. Government are often justified by the claim that the development of Indigenous lands would increase economic opportunity for localsclaims that are rarely supported by evidence.
_	Other formalizations of the claim that "F" is consistent may be inequivalent in "F", and some may even be provable.
_	Also adding weight to the claim that the mass is cyclic is the possibility that the piece was written or assembled for performance at a specific celebration.
_	One of these is the claim that during the American Civil War goods seized by armies were sold at auction by the colonel of the division.
_	Among the "standard forms of NF propaganda" was the claim that immigrants carried diseases like leprosy and tuberculosis, that it was these diseased immigrants who were placing a heavy burden on the National Health Service (NHS), and that incompetent and poorly trained migrant staff were detrimental to the NHS.
_	Two popular books among Gospel Halls — "The Pilgrim Church" by E.H. Broadbent and "Church History" by Andrew Miller make the claim that throughout the centuries of church history, there has always been a remnant independent evangelical testimony, and that the modern Gospel Hall movement, which began in the 1800s, with hundreds of new independent assemblies appearing almost simultaneously in various places around the world (particularly in Ireland, Scotland, England, and continental Europe) was a recovery of numerous New Testament beliefs and practices which had been largely lost in Christendom over the centuries.
_	Brock also advanced the claim that both black and white nationalists needed to be racists in order to keep their identities intact.
_	According to Wise, the Lipset quote does not support the claim that opposition to Zionism was inherently anti-Semitic, and the comment in question may have been limited to the specific circumstances:
_	Daniel Wallace, however, disputes the claim that "ekeinos" is connected with "pneuma" in John 14:26 and 16:13-14, asserting instead that it belongs to "parakletos".
_	Wolff disputed the efficacy of torture and the claim that it contributed to the discovery of bin Laden.
_	The performance of the 45 W A8-7600 Kaveri APU was found to be similar to that of the 100 W Richland part, leading to the claim that AMD made significant improvements in on-die graphics performance per watt; however, CPU performance was found to lag behind similarly-specified Intel processors, a lag that was unlikely to be resolved in the Bulldozer family APUs.
